ECONOMIC  ASPECTS  OF

NUCLEAR  FUEL  REPROCESSING

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JULY  12,  2005

Serial No. 109–22

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

22–295PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
DENNIS  MOORE,  Kansas

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY

JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois,  Chair

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
VACANCY
SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York

MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas

BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

KEVIN  CARROLL  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member
CHARLES  COOKE  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

COLIN  HUBBELL  Staff  Assistant

MIKE  HOLLAND  Chairwoman’s  Designee

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

July  12,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Judy  Biggert,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  En-
ergy, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ...........................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Michael  M.  Honda,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee on Energy, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Jerry  F.  Costello,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Energy,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Sheila  Jackson  Lee,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Energy,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................

Witnesses:

Dr. Richard K. Lester, Director, the Industrial Performance Center; Professor
of Nuclear Science and Engineering, Massachusetts Institute of Technology
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Donald  W.  Jones,  Vice  President  of  Marketing  and  Senior  Economist

at RCF Economic and Financial Consulting, Inc.

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Dr. Steve Fetter, Dean, School of Public Policy, University of Maryland

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Mr.  Marvin  S.  Fertel,  Senior  Vice  President  and  Chief  Nuclear  Officer,  The

Nuclear Energy Institute

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr. Richard K. Lester, Director, the Industrial Performance Center; Professor
of Nuclear Science and Engineering, Massachusetts Institute of Technology
Dr.  Donald  W.  Jones,  Vice  President  of  Marketing  and  Senior  Economist
.............................................
Dr. Steve Fetter, Dean, School of Public Policy, University of Maryland ...........

at RCF Economic and Financial Consulting, Inc.

(III)

8
9

10
11

12

13

14
17
20

20
22
23

23
25
28
29

29
31
35
36

60

61
62

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Mr.  Marvin  S.  Fertel,  Senior  Vice  President  and  Chief  Nuclear  Officer,  The
Nuclear Energy Institute .....................................................................................

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

The Economic Future of Nuclear Power, A Study Conducted at the University
of Chicago, August 2004, Executive Summary ..................................................
The  Future  of  Nuclear  Power,  An  Interdisciplinary  MIT  Study,  Executive
Summary ...............................................................................................................

Page

63

66

104

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

ECONOMIC  ASPECTS  OF  NUCLEAR  FUEL

REPROCESSING

TUESDAY,  JULY  12,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  2:00  p.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Judy  Biggert
[Chairwoman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Economic Aspects of

Nuclear Fuel Reprocessing

TUESDAY, JULY 12, 2005

2:00 P.M.–4:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Tuesday,  July  12,  the  Energy  Subcommittee  of  the  House  Committee  on
Science will hold a hearing to examine whether it would be economical for the U.S.
to  reprocess  spent  nuclear  fuel  and  what  the  potential  cost  implications  are  for  the
nuclear  power  industry  and  for  the  Federal  Government.  This  hearing  is  a  follow-
up to the June 16 Energy Subcommittee hearing that examined the status of reproc-
essing  technologies  and  the  impact  reprocessing  would  have  on  energy  efficiency,
nuclear waste management, and the potential for proliferation of weapons-grade nu-
clear materials.
2. Witnesses
Dr.  Richard  K.  Lester  is  the  Director  of  the  Industrial  Performance  Center  and
a  Professor  of  Nuclear  Science  and  Engineering  at  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of
Technology. He co-authored a 2003 study entitled The Future of Nuclear Power.
Dr. Donald W. Jones is Vice President of Marketing and Senior Economist at RCF
Economic  and  Financial  Consulting,  Inc.  in  Chicago,  Illinois.  He  co-directed  a  2004
study entitled The Economic Future of Nuclear Power.
Dr.  Steve  Fetter  is  the  Dean  of  the  School  of  Public  Policy  at  the  University  of
Maryland.  He  co-authored  a  2005  paper  entitled  The  Economics  of  Reprocessing  vs.
Direct Disposal of Spent Nuclear Fuel.
Mr.  Marvin  Fertel  is  the  Senior  Vice  President  and  Chief  Nuclear  Officer  at  the
Nuclear Energy Institute.

3. Overarching Questions

• Under  what  conditions  would  reprocessing  be  economically  competitive,  com-
pared to both nuclear power that does not include fuel reprocessing, and other
sources  of  electric  power?  What  major  assumptions  underlie  these  analyses?
• What government subsidies might be necessary to introduce a more advanced
nuclear fuel cycle (that includes reprocessing, recycling, and transmutation—
‘‘burning’’ the most radioactive waste products in an advanced reactor) in the
U.S.?

4. Brief  Overview  of  Nuclear  Fuel  Reprocessing  (from  June  16  hearing

charter)
• Nuclear reactors generate about 20 percent of the electricity used in the U.S.
No  new  nuclear  plants  have  been  ordered  in  the  U.S.  since  1973,  but  there
is  renewed  interest  in  nuclear  energy  both  because  it  could  reduce  U.S.  de-
pendence on foreign oil and because it produces no greenhouse gas emissions.
• One  of  the  barriers  to  increased  use  of  nuclear  energy  is  concern  about  nu-
clear  waste.  Every  nuclear  power  reactor  produces  approximately  20  tons  of
highly  radioactive  nuclear  waste  every  year.  Today,  that  waste  is  stored  on-
site at the nuclear reactors in water-filled cooling pools or, at some sites, after
sufficient  cooling,  in  dry  casks  above  ground.  About  50,000  metric  tons  of
commercial spent fuel is being stored at 73 sites in 33 states. A recent report
issued by the National Academy of Sciences concluded that this stored waste
could be vulnerable to terrorist attacks.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

• Under  the  current  plan  for  long-term  disposal  of  nuclear  waste,  the  waste
from around the country would be moved to a permanent repository at Yucca
Mountain in Nevada, which is now scheduled to open around 2012. The Yucca
Mountain  facility  continues  to  be  a  subject  of  controversy.  But  even  if  it
opened  and  functioned  as  planned,  it  would  have  only  enough  space  to  store
the nuclear waste the U.S. is expected to generate by about 2010.

• Consequently,  there  is  growing  interest  in  finding  ways  to  reduce  the  quan-
tity  of  nuclear  waste.  A  number  of  other  nations,  most  notably  France  and
Japan,  ‘‘reprocess’’  their  nuclear  waste.  Reprocessing  involves  separating  out
the  various  components  of  nuclear  waste  so  that  a  portion  of  the  waste  can
be  recycled  and  used  again  as  nuclear  fuel  (instead  of  disposing  of  all  of  it).
In addition to reducing the quantity of high-level nuclear waste, reprocessing
makes  it  possible  to  use  nuclear  fuel  more  efficiently.  With  reprocessing,  the
same amount of nuclear fuel can generate more electricity because some com-
ponents of it can be used as fuel more than once.

• The  greatest  drawback  of  reprocessing  is  that  current  reprocessing  tech-
nologies  produce  weapons-grade  plutonium  (which  is  one  of  the  components
of the spent fuel). Any activity that increases the availability of plutonium in-
creases the risk of nuclear weapons proliferation.

• Because of proliferation concerns, the U.S. decided in the 1970s not to engage
in  reprocessing.  (The  policy  decision  was  reversed  the  following  decade,  but
the  U.S.  still  did  not  move  toward  reprocessing.)  But  the  Department  of  En-
ergy  (DOE)  has  continued  to  fund  research  and  development  (R&D)  on  nu-
clear  reprocessing  technologies,  including  new  technologies  that  their  pro-
ponents claim would reduce the risk of proliferation from reprocessing.

• The  report  accompanying  H.R.  2419,  the  Energy  and  Water  Development  Ap-
propriations  Act  for  Fiscal  Year  2006,  which  the  House  passed  in  May,  di-
rected  DOE  to  focus  research  in  its  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Initiative  program
on  improving  nuclear  reprocessing  technologies.  The  report  went  on  to  state,
‘‘The  Department  shall  accelerate  this  research  in  order  to  make  a  specific
technology recommendation, not later than the end of fiscal year 2007, to the
President  and  Congress  on  a  particular  reprocessing  technology  that  should
be  implemented  in  the  United  States.  In  addition,  the  Department  shall  pre-
pare  an  integrated  spent  fuel  recycling  plan  for  implementation  beginning  in
fiscal year 2007, including recommendation of an advanced reprocessing tech-
nology  and  a  competitive  process  to  select  one  or  more  sites  to  develop  inte-
grated spent fuel recycling facilities.’’

• During  floor  debate  on  H.R.  2419,  the  House  defeated  an  amendment  that
would  have  cut  funding  for  research  on  reprocessing.  In  arguing  for  the
amendment,  its  sponsor,  Mr.  Markey,  explicitly  raised  the  risks  of  weapons
proliferation. Specifically, the amendment would have cut funding for reproc-
essing  activities  and  interim  storage  programs  by  $15.5  million  and  shifted
the funds to energy efficiency activities, effectively repudiating the report lan-
guage. The amendment was defeated by a vote of 110–312.
• But  nuclear  reprocessing  remains  controversial,  even  within  the  scientific
community. In May 2005, the American Physical Society (APS) Panel on Pub-
lic Affairs, issued a report, Nuclear Power and Proliferation Resistance: Secur-
ing Benefits, Limiting Risk. APS, which is the leading organization of the Na-
tion’s  physicists,  is  on  record  as  strongly  supporting  nuclear  power.  But  the
APS  report  takes  the  opposite  tack  of  the  Appropriations  report,  stating,
‘‘There  is  no  urgent  need  for  the  U.S.  to  initiate  reprocessing  or  to  develop
additional national repositories. DOE programs should be aligned accordingly:
shift  the  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Initiative  R&D  away  from  an  objective  of  lay-
ing  the  basis  for  a  near-term  reprocessing  decision;  increase  support  for  pro-
liferation-resistance R&D and technical support for institutional measures for
the entire fuel cycle.’’
• Technological as well as policy questions remain regarding reprocessing. It is
not clear whether the new reprocessing technologies that DOE is funding will
be  developed  sufficiently  by  2007  to  allow  the  U.S.  to  select  a  technology  to
pursue.  There  is  also  debate  about  the  extent  to  which  new  technologies  can
truly reduce the risks of proliferation.
• It  is  also  unclear  how  selecting  a  reprocessing  technology  might  relate  to
other  pending  technology  decisions  regarding  nuclear  energy.  For  example,
the U.S. is in the midst of developing new designs for nuclear reactors under
DOE’s  Generation  IV  program.  Some  of  the  potential  new  reactors  would

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

produce  types  of  nuclear  waste  that  could  not  be  reprocessed  using  some  of
the technologies now being developed with DOE funding.

5. Brief Overview of Economics of Reprocessing

• The economics of reprocessing are hard to predict with any certainty because
there  are  few  examples  around  the  world  on  which  economists  might  base  a
generalized model.
• Some of the major factors influencing the economic competitiveness of reproc-
essing are: the availability and cost of uranium, costs associated with interim
storage  and  long-term  disposal  in  a  geologic  repository,  reprocessing  plant
construction  and  operating  costs,  and  costs  associated  with  transmutation,
the  process  by  which  certain  parts  of  the  spent  fuel  are  actively  reduced  in
toxicity to address long-term waste management.
• Costs associated with reducing greenhouse gas emissions from fossil fuel-pow-
ered  plants  could  help  make  nuclear  power,  including  reprocessing,  economi-
cally competitive with other sources of electricity in a free market.
• It  is  not  clear  who  would  pay  for  reprocessing  in  the  U.S.  The  options  are:
the  government  paying,  the  utilities  themselves  paying  (not  likely)  or  con-
sumers paying in the form of higher electric rates. Passing the cost increases
on  to  the  consumer  may  not  be  as  simple  as  it  seems  in  the  context  of  the
current regulatory environment. In States with regulated utilities, regulators
generally insist on using the lowest-cost source of electricity available and in
States with competing electricity providers, the utilities themselves favor the
lowest-cost solutions for the power they provide. To the extent that reprocess-
ing  raises  the  cost  of  nuclear  power  relative  to  other  sources,  reprocessing
would be less attractive in both of these situations. As a result, utilities have
shown little interest in reprocessing.
• Three  recent  studies  have  examined  the  economics  of  nuclear  power.  In  a
study  completed  at  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology  in  2003,  The
Future of Nuclear Power, an interdisciplinary panel, including Professor Rich-
ard  Lester,  looked  at  all  aspects  of  nuclear  power  from  waste  management
to economics to public perception. In a study requested by the Department of
Energy  and  conducted  at  the  University  of  Chicago  in  2004,  The  Economic
Future of Nuclear Power, economist Dr. Donald Jones and his colleague com-
pared costs of future nuclear power to other sources, and briefly looked at the
incremental  costs  of  an  advanced  fuel  cycle.  In  a  2003  study  conducted  by  a
panel  including  Matthew  Bunn  (a  witness  at  the  June  16  hearing)  and  Pro-
fessor  Steve  Fetter,  The  Economics  of  Reprocessing  vs.  Direct  Disposal  of
Spent  Nuclear  Fuel,  the  authors  took  a  detailed  look  at  the  costs  associated
with  an  advanced  fuel  cycle.  All  three  studies  seem  more  or  less  to  agree  on
cost  estimates:  the  incremental  cost  of  nuclear  electricity  to  the  consumer,
with  reprocessing,  could  be  modest—on  the  order  of  1–2  mills/kWh  (0.1–0.2
cents  per  kilowatt-hour);  on  the  other  hand,  this  increase  represents  an  ap-
proximate  doubling  (at  least)  of  the  costs  attributable  to  spent  fuel  manage-
ment,  compared  to  the  current  fuel  cycle  (no  reprocessing).  Where  they
strongly  disagree  is  on  how  large  an  impact  this  incremental  cost  will  have
on  the  competitiveness  of  nuclear  power.  The  University  of  Chicago  authors
conclude  that  the  cost  of  reprocessing  is  negligible  in  the  big  picture,  where
capital  costs  of  new  plants  dominate  all  economic  analyses.  The  other  two
studies  take  a  more  skeptical  view—because  new  nuclear  power  would  al-
ready  be  facing  tough  competition  in  the  current  market,  any  additional  cost
would  further  hinder  the  nuclear  power  industry,  or  become  an  unacceptable
and unnecessary financial burden on the government.

6. Background

For  a  detailed  background  on  the  advanced  fuel  cycle  (sometimes  referred  to  as
the  closed  fuel  cycle),  including  reprocessing  technologies,  waste  management  and
non-proliferation  concerns,  please  refer  to  the  charter  from  our  June  16  hearing  on
Nuclear Fuel Reprocessing (attached).
Economic Future of Nuclear Power

The  single  biggest  cost  associated  with  nuclear  power  is  the  capital  cost,  i.e.,  the
upfront  money  required  to  build  a  new  plant.  The  100+  nuclear  plants  now  oper-
ating in the U.S. were built in a highly regulated electricity market in which it was
a  given  that  the  costs  would  be  passed  on  to  the  consumers.  As  a  result,  most  of
the  utilities  that  own  these  plants  today  have  long  since  paid  off  the  capital  costs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

With  low  operations  and  maintenance  costs,  existing  plants  are  competitive  with
other sources of electric power. Nuclear power currently supplies 20 percent of U.S.
electricity  and,  for  some  States,  nuclear  power  represents  more  than  50  percent  of
their  electricity  supply.  Demand  for  electricity  in  the  U.S.  is  growing  rapidly.  In
order for nuclear power to continue to supply at least 20 percent of U.S. electricity,
several  new  plants  will  need  to  be  built  in  next  5–10  years.  The  economic  future
of  nuclear  power,  however,  could  depend  on  the  costs  of  building  new  plants  in  ei-
ther a deregulated, competitive environment, or a regulated environment that favors
the  lowest-cost  option.  In  both  of  these  cases,  the  capital  costs  for  new  plants  are
not so easily passed on to the consumers.

In  a  larger  context,  concerns  about  global  warming  have  led  to  a  different  view
of the economic competitiveness of new nuclear generating capacity. Right now, coal
is  the  cheapest  source  of  electricity,  and  coal  resources  are  abundant  in  the  U.S.  If
the government were to enforce a carbon cap or tax on the utilities, the price of coal-
fired  power  would  go  up.  Some  utilities  and  DOE  are  already  investing  in  tech-
nologies to reduce emissions in anticipation of such a cap. DOE’s R&D plan for coal
calls  for  greenhouse  gas  capture  and  disposal  to  add  no  more  than  10  percent  to
the  cost  of  coal-fired  power,  but  it  remains  unclear  to  what  extent  that  goal  is
achievable.  In  general,  any  significant  changes  in  energy  demand  patterns  will  in-
fluence the economic attractiveness of nuclear, a source of power that does not emit
greenhouse gases.
Economics of Reprocessing versus Direct Disposal

Spent  fuel  management  is  only  a  small  part  of  the  total  cost  of  nuclear  power,
but  it  is  the  part  at  issue  in  the  reprocessing  debate.  There  is  general  agreement
between  economic  analyses1,2,3 that,  given  the  market  price  of  uranium  (approxi-
mately  $60/kg),  and  international  experience  with  reprocessing,  it  remains  cheaper
to  mine  and  enrich  uranium  ore  than  to  reprocess  and  recycle  spent  fuel.  Other
major factors that will influence the economic balance between reprocessing and di-
rect  disposal  include  the  costs  of  uranium  enrichment,  interim  storage,  long-term
disposal  in  a  geologic  repository  (including  construction  costs  for  the  repository),
mixed  oxide  (MOX)  fuel  fabrication,  construction  and  operation  of  the  reprocessing
plant itself, construction and operation of facilities to ‘‘burn’’ or transmute the unus-
able parts of the waste, and various transportation and security requirements. Good
data  are  available  for  the  costs  of  enrichment,  interim  storage,  transportation  and
security.  All  of  the  other  costs  have  to  be  estimated,  and  estimates  vary  widely  in
some  cases.  There  are  also  (or  will  also  be)  differences,  for  some  steps  in  the  fuel
cycle,  between  the  underlying  costs  and  the  market  price.  Uranium  supply  and  en-
richment,  for  example,  operate  in  a  competitive  market  environment,  keeping  the
profit margin fairly predictable. On the other hand, a lack of competition in reproc-
essing  and  MOX  fuel  fabrication,  at  least  internationally,  results  in  a  more  ambig-
uous relationship between cost and price.

Nuclear  power  in  the  U.S.  has  long  been  subsidized  by  the  Federal  Government.
The commercial nuclear industry grew out of multi-billion dollar government-funded
research and development programs on nuclear weapons. The DOE has ongoing pro-
grams of research, development and demonstration of advanced nuclear technologies
in addition to the Nuclear Power 2010 Program (funded at nearly $50 million in fis-
cal year 2005) to subsidize the costs of siting and licensing new commercial reactors
this  decade.  Pending  energy  legislation  in  the  109th  Congress  authorizes  continued
tax credits and other incentives for future nuclear energy. If the market price of re-
processing  is  higher  than  electricity  producers  are  willing  or  able  to  bear,  and  the
government  decides  that  the  public  benefits  exceed  the  costs,  some  form  of  govern-
ment  funding  will  be  necessary  to  bring  reprocessing  into  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle  in
the U.S.
7. Witness Questions
Dr. Lester:

• Under  what  conditions  would  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing  be  economically  com-
petitive  with  the  open  fuel  cycle  and  with  other  sources  of  electric  power?
What  major  assumptions  underlie  your  analysis?  What  steps  might  be  avail-
able to reduce the costs of reprocessing?

1 Harvard  University  study,  Project  on  Managing  the  Atom,  The  Economics  of  Reprocessing

vs. Direct Disposal of Spent Nuclear Fuel, December 2003.

2 MIT Nuclear Energy Study, The Future of Nuclear Power, 2003.
3 University of Chicago Study, The Economic Future of Nuclear Power, August 2004.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

• What would it cost to efficiently manage nuclear waste by further integrating
the fuel cycle through development of a system that includes reprocessing, re-
cycling, and transmutation (‘‘burning’’ the most radioactive waste products in
an advanced reactor)?
• What government subsidies might be necessary to introduce a more advanced
nuclear  fuel  cycle  in  the  U.S.?  What  assumptions  underlie  those  estimates?
• How would a decision to reprocess affect the economic future of nuclear power

in the U.S.?

Dr. Jones:

• Under  what  conditions  would  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing  be  economically  com-
petitive  with  the  open  fuel  cycle  and  with  other  sources  of  electric  power?
What major assumptions underlie your analysis?
• How  will  a  decision  to  reprocess  affect  the  economic  future  of  nuclear  power

in the U.S.?

Dr. Fetter:

• Under  what  conditions  would  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing  be  economically  com-
petitive  with  the  open  fuel  cycle  and  with  other  sources  of  electric  power?
What  major  assumptions  underlie  your  analysis?  What  steps  might  be  avail-
able to reduce the costs of reprocessing?
• What would it cost to efficiently manage nuclear waste by further integrating
the fuel cycle through development of a system that includes reprocessing, re-
cycling, and transmutation (‘‘burning’’ the most radioactive waste products in
an advanced reactor)?
• What government subsidies might be necessary to introduce a more advanced
nuclear  fuel  cycle  in  the  U.S.?  What  assumptions  underlie  those  estimates?
• How would a decision to reprocess affect the economic future of nuclear power

in the U.S.?

Mr. Fertel:

• Is there a consensus position among the nuclear plant-owning utilities regard-
ing whether the U.S. should introduce reprocessing into the nuclear fuel cycle
within the next five or ten years?
• What government subsidies might be necessary to introduce a more advanced
nuclear fuel cycle (that includes reprocessing, recycling, and transmutation—
‘‘burning’’ the most radioactive waste products in an advanced reactor) in the
U.S.? What assumptions underlie those estimates?
• How  would  a  U.S.  move  to  reprocessing  affect  utilities’  long-term  business

planning?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  The  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  on  En-

ergy of the Science Committee will come to order.

Good  afternoon  to  all  of  you,  and  I  apologize  that  we  had  votes,

but I am glad you stayed around.

Welcome  to  today’s  hearing  on  the  Economic  Aspects  of  Nuclear
Fuel  Reprocessing.  As  promised,  this  hearing  is  a  follow-up  to  our
June 16 Energy Subcommittee hearing that examined the status of
reprocessing  technologies  and  the  impact  reprocessing  would  have
on energy efficiency, nuclear waste management, and the potential
for proliferation of weapons-grade nuclear materials.

Today, we are going to hear from a representative of the nuclear
utility  industry  and  from  a  number  of  renowned  economists  and
scientists  on  the  economics  of  the  nuclear  fuel  recycle.  In  par-
ticular,  we  are  going  to  discuss  what  additional  costs  or  savings
might result if we switched from an open fuel cycle to an advanced
fuel  cycle  and  how  those  costs  and  savings  compare  with  other
sources of energy, especially fossil fuels.

There  are  many  reasons  why  the  United  States  should  embrace
an advanced fuel cycle that uses reprocessing, recycling, and trans-
mutation,  or  the  burning  of  the  most  radioactive  parts  of  spent
fuel, as a way to deal with our nuclear waste problem.

First,  if  we  were  to  recycle  what  we  call  ‘‘nuclear  waste,’’  which
is  actually  nuclear  fuel,  we  will  increase  the  amount  of  energy  ob-
tained  from  uranium  resources  by  a  factor  of  10.  Second,  by  the
time Yucca Mountain opens, it technically will be filled to capacity
with  all  of  the  waste  generated  up  to  2010,  requiring  the  second
repository,  or  an  expanded  Yucca  Mountain,  for  future  waste.
Third, the advanced fuel cycle promises to reduce the volume of our
high-level  nuclear  waste,  potentially  by  a  factor  of  60.  Fourth,  it
also  could  reduce  the  toxicity  the  heat  and  radioactivity  of  the
waste  so  that  it  would  only  have  to  be  stored  for  300  years  rather
than 10,000. And last, the advanced fuel cycle could render another
Yucca  Mountain  unnecessary  even  if  the  nuclear  power  industry
grows.

Why didn’t I include economics as one of the reasons the United
States should embrace the advanced fuel cycle? Because as long as
uranium  is  cheap  and  abundant,  mining  and  enriching  it  will  con-
tinue  to  cost  less  than  reprocessing  and  recycling  spent  fuel.  But
let us face it, the Federal Government does a lot that isn’t economi-
cal  often  because  doing  so  is  in  the  best  interest  of  the  Nation  for
other reasons.

For instance, federal tax credits make renewable energy economi-
cal.  As  a  result  of  our  growing  use  of  wind  and  solar  power,  our
energy  supplies  are  more  diverse,  and  our  nation  is  more  energy
independent and secure. And the economics could change. Concerns
about global climate change and clean air may, in the future, make
it  more  expensive  to  produce  electricity  using  fossil  fuels.  If,  or
when this happens, nuclear energy becomes much more economical.
Current  analysis  of  the  competitiveness  of  nuclear  power  doesn’t
account  for  the  billions  we  will  have  to  spend  to  address  green-
house gas emissions from fossil fuels and global climate change.

While  economies  alone  should  not  dictate  a  decision  to  close  a
fuel  cycle,  it  is  still  extremely  important  that  we,  as  lawmakers,
understand  the  relationship  between  costs  and  benefits  in  order  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

make  informed  decisions  about  managing  the  growing  stockpile  of
spent  nuclear  fuel.  Understanding  the  economics  of  the  advanced
fuel  cycle  will  allow  us  to  prioritize  research  and  development  to
greatly  reduce  costs  and  significantly  improve  the  economic  feasi-
bility of closing the fuel cycle.

Besides,  continued  R&D  costs  can  be  reduced  based  on  lessons
learned  from  international  programs  and  a  well  reasoned  inte-
grated  plan.  In  this  way,  we  can  help  the  Department  of  Energy,
energy  producers,  and  other  interested  parties  develop  the  best
policies and plans possible to deal with growing quantities of spent
nuclear  fuel.  Once  we  understand  what  the  costs  are,  a  decision
will have to be made about who most appropriately should assume
those costs. Under the Nuclear Waste Policy Act, consumers already
pay 1/10 of one cent per kilowatt-hour for the Federal Government
to  take  possession  and  dispose  of  the  Nation’s  spent  nuclear  fuel.
Until, or unless, the law changes, the responsibility falls to us to
use  this  money  wisely  and  to  explore  ways  to  reduce  the  volume
and  toxicity  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  and  maximize  the  capability  of
Yucca  Mountain.  As  someone  who  supports  nuclear  power  and
whose  home  state  derives  50  percent  of  its  electricity  from  emis-
sions-free  nuclear  power,  I  would  hate  to  see  the  industry’s  future
growth  constrained  when  Yucca  Mountain  is  full  and  no  plan  has
been  developed  to  manage  the  waste  from  new  nuclear  power
plants.

That  is  why  we  are  here  today  to  make  sure  we  have  the  right
plan  for  managing  our  growing  inventory  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  in
the  most  efficient,  economical,  and  environmentally-sensitive  way
possible.

I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here  to  enlighten  us

today, and I look forward to their testimony.

But  before  we  get  to  that,  I  will  yield  to  the  Ranking  Member,

Mr. Honda, for his opening statement.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Biggert follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN JUDY BIGGERT

I want to welcome everyone to this hearing on what impact reprocessing and recy-
cling  might  have  on  the  economics  of  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle  should  we,  as  a  nation,
choose  to  use  these  technologies  to  better  manage  our  growing  inventory  of  spent
nuclear fuel.

This  is  the  Energy  Subcommittee’s  second  hearing  on  the  topic  of  reprocessing
and recycling of nuclear waste. Our first hearing, which occurred less than a month
ago,  focused  on  technology  decisions  and  proliferation  issues.  At  that  hearing,  we
heard  about  reprocessing  technologies  in  various  stages  of  development,  and  how
these  advanced  technologies  are  more  proliferation-resistant  than  the  30-year-old
technologies currently used throughout the world.

Today  we  are  going  to  hear  from  a  representative  of  the  nuclear  utility  industry
and  from  a  number  of  renowned  economists  and  scientists  on  the  economics  of  the
nuclear  fuel  cycle.  In  particular,  we  are  going  to  discuss  what  additional  costs  or
savings might result if we switch from an open fuel cycle to an advanced fuel cycle,
and  how  those  costs  and  savings  compare  with  other  sources  of  energy,  especially
fossil fuels.

There are many reasons why the United States should embrace an advanced fuel
cycle  that  uses  reprocessing,  recycling,  and  transmutation—or  the  burning  of  the
most radioactive parts of spent fuel—as a way to deal with our nuclear waste prob-
lem.

First, if we were to recycle what we call nuclear ‘‘waste,’’ which is actually nuclear
‘‘fuel,’’ we could increase the amount of energy obtained from uranium resources by
a factor of 10.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

Second, by the time Yucca Mountain opens, it technically will be filled to capacity
with  all  the  waste  generated  up  to  2010,  requiring  a  second  repository  or  an  ex-
panded Yucca Mountain for future waste.

Third, the advanced fuel cycle promises to reduce the volume of our high-level nu-

clear waste, potentially by a factor of 60.

Fourth,  it  also  could  reduce  the  toxicity—the  heat  and  the  radioactivity—of  the

waste so that it would only have to be stored for 300 years, rather than 10,000.

And  last,  the  advanced  fuel  cycle  could  render  another  Yucca  Mountain  unneces-

sary even if the nuclear power industry grows.

Why didn’t I include economics as one of the reasons the U.S. should embrace the
advanced  fuel  cycle?  Because  as  long  as  uranium  is  cheap  and  abundant,  mining
and enriching it will continue to cost less than reprocessing and recycling spent fuel.
But  let’s  face  it,  the  Federal  Government  does  a  lot  that  isn’t  economical—often
because doing so is in the best interest of the Nation for other reasons. For instance,
federal  tax  credits  make  renewable  energy  economical.  As  a  result  of  our  growing
use  of  wind  and  solar  power,  our  energy  supplies  are  more  diverse  and  our  nation
is more energy independent and secure.

And the economics could change. Concerns about global climate change and clean
air  may  in  the  future  make  it  more  expensive  to  produce  electricity  using  fossil
fuels. If or when this happens, nuclear energy becomes much more economical. Cur-
rent  analyses  of  the  competitiveness  of  nuclear  power  don’t  account  for  the  billions
we  will  have  to  spend  to  address  greenhouse  gas  emissions  from  fossil  fuels  and
global climate change.

While  economics  alone  should  not  dictate  a  decision  to  close  the  fuel  cycle,  it  is
still  extremely  important  that  we,  as  lawmakers,  understand  the  relationship  be-
tween  costs  and  benefits  in  order  to  make  informed  decisions  about  managing  the
growing  stockpile  of  spent  nuclear  fuel.  Understanding  the  economics  of  the  ad-
vanced fuel cycle will allow us to prioritize research and development to greatly re-
duce costs and significantly improve the economic feasibility of closing the fuel cycle.
Besides  continued  R&D,  costs  can  be  reduced  based  on  lessons  learned  from  inter-
national  programs  and  a  well-reasoned,  integrated  plan.  In  this  way,  we  can  help
the  Department  of  Energy,  energy  producers,  and  other  interested  parties  develop
the best policies and plans possible to deal with growing quantities of spent nuclear
fuel.

Once  we  understand  what  the  costs  are,  a  decision  will  have  to  be  made  about
who most appropriately should assume those costs. Under the Nuclear Waste Policy
Act,  consumers  already  pay  one-tenth  of  one  cent  per  kilowatt-hour  for  the  Federal
Government to take possession and dispose of the Nation’s spent nuclear fuel. Until
or  unless  the  law  changes,  the  responsibility  falls  to  us  to  use  this  money  wisely,
and  to  explore  ways  to  reduce  the  volume  and  toxicity  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  and
maximize the capacity of Yucca Mountain.

As  someone  who  supports  nuclear  power,  and  whose  home  state  derives  50  per-
cent of its electricity from emissions-free nuclear power, I would hate to see the in-
dustry’s  future  growth  constrained  when  Yucca  Mountain  is  full  and  no  plan  has
been developed to manage the waste from new nuclear power plants.

That’s why we are here today—to make sure we have the right plan for managing
our  growing  inventory  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  in  the  most  efficient,  economical,  and
environmentally-sensitive way possible. I want to thank the witnesses for being here
to  enlighten  us  today.  I  look  forward  to  their  testimony.  But  before  we  get  to  that,
I will yield to the Ranking Member, Mr. Honda, for his opening statement.

Mr.  HONDA.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chair.  Thank  you  for  holding

this important hearing today.

The timing of this hearing is critical, because recently the Presi-
dent has been talking more and more about encouraging the devel-
opment of nuclear power for electricity generation.

As  I  noted  at  our  previous  meeting  on  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing,
the  original  ‘‘plan’’  for  our  nation’s  nuclear  energy  program  was  to
recycle the fuel used in the reactors to reduce the amount of mate-
rial  defined  as  waste  and  stretch  the  supply  of  available  material
needed for fuel.

The  plan  never  took  hold  due  to  two  principle  factors:  concerns

about nuclear weapons proliferation and economics.

At our last hearing, we heard about some of the technical issues
surrounding  reprocessing  and  the  nonproliferation  implications  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

reprocessing.  Today,  I  am  hoping  the  witnesses  can  help  us  get  a
handle on the economic viability of nuclear waste reprocessing, be-
cause  if  we  are  going  to  use  the  power,  we  must  deal  with  the
waste.

Up  until  now,  it  has  not  made  economic  sense  to  develop  a  do-
mestic recycling capacity, partly because of the stagnation that de-
veloped in the U.S. nuclear energy construction program.

Also,  the  so-called  ‘‘megatons  to  megawatts’’  program  that  takes
Russian  weapons-grade  uranium  and  down-blends  it  to  lower  con-
centrations  needed  for  nuclear  power  reactors  has  helped  to  keep
down the cost of reactor fuel, making reprocessing uneconomical.

And  if  the  Administration  succeeds  in  increasing  the  use  of  nu-
clear  energy  for  the  production  of  electricity  over  the  next  several
decades,  there  will  be  significant  consequences  in  terms  of  nuclear
fuel demand and nuclear waste disposal.

On the one hand, the new demand for fuel may drive up the cost
of fuel and make the economics of reprocessing as a means of sup-
plying material for fuel more favorable.

On  the  other  hand,  extended  operations  of  existing  reactors  and
any  new  reactors  that  are  built  will  exceed  Yucca  Mountain’s  ca-
pacity, leaving limited options for what to do with the waste.

Building  a  new  repository  would  face  significant  siting  and  li-
censing  challenges  and  is  unlikely.  Absent  a  new  repository,  our
options  are  limited.  On-site  storage  via  dry  casks  is  an  option,  but
one  which  is  inconsistent  with  the  Federal  Government’s  commit-
ment to take control of the waste.

Reprocessing  is  another  answer,  but  it  may  well  drive  the  cost
of  nuclear  power  above  that  of  other  fuel  sources,  making  it  eco-
nomically non-competitive without government subsidies.

It is critical that we determine what the true cost of dealing with
the waste material from nuclear power plants is going to be before
we follow the Administration’s plan to rely more heavily on nuclear
power for electricity generation.

And to do that, it is critical that we know how much reprocessing
may  cost.  We  need  to  understand  the  cost  if  we  use  today’s  tech-
niques,  as  well  as  how  much  we  will  need  to  spend  on  research  to
develop  new  techniques,  and  how  much  those  techniques  will  cost.
To  pursue  the  President’s  desire  to  expand  the  use  of  nuclear
power without having a good idea of how we are going to deal with
the waste and how much dealing with it will cost is unwise.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  the  witnesses  on  what  they  be-
lieve  the  true  costs  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing  are  and
whether it will ever be a viable, economical alternative.

Again,  thank  you,  Madame  Chairwoman,  and  I  yield  back  the

balance of my time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Honda follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE MICHAEL M. HONDA

Madam Chairwoman, thank you for holding this important hearing today.
The  timing  of  this  hearing  is  critical,  because  recently  the  President  has  been
talking  more  and  more  about  encouraging  the  development  of  nuclear  power  for
electricity generation.

As  I  noted  at  our  previous  hearing  on  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing,  the  original
‘‘plan’’  for  our  nation’s  nuclear  energy  program  was  to  recycle  the  fuel  used  in  the
reactors,  to  reduce  the  amount  of  material  defined  as  waste  and  stretch  the  supply
of available material needed for fuel.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

The  plan  never  took  hold  due  to  two  principal  factors:  concerns  about  nuclear

weapons proliferation and economics.

12

At  our  last  hearing,  we  heard  about  some  of  the  technical  issues  surrounding  re-
processing and the nonproliferation implications of reprocessing. Today, I am hoping
that  the  witnesses  can  help  us  get  a  handle  on  the  economic  viability  of  nuclear
waste  reprocessing,  because  if  we  are  going  to  use  the  power,  we  must  deal  with
the waste.

Up until now, it has not made economic sense to develop a domestic recycling ca-
pacity,  partly  because  of  the  stagnation  that  developed  in  the  U.S.  nuclear  energy
construction program.

Also, the so-called ‘‘megatons to megawatts’’ program that takes Russian weapons-
grade  uranium  and  down-blends  it  to  the  lower  concentrations  needed  for  nuclear
power  reactors  has  helped  to  keep  down  the  cost  of  reactor  fuel,  making  reprocess-
ing uneconomical.

If the Administration succeeds in increasing the use of nuclear energy for the pro-
duction  of  electricity  over  the  next  several  decades,  there  will  be  significant  con-
sequences in terms of nuclear fuel demand and nuclear waste disposal.

On the one hand, the new demand for fuel may drive up the cost of fuel and make
the economics of reprocessing as a means of supplying material for fuel more favor-
able.

On the other hand, extended operations of existing reactors and any new reactors
that  are  built  will  exceed  Yucca  Mountain’s  capacity,  leaving  limited  options  for
what to do with the waste.

Building  a  new  repository  would  face  significant  citing  and  licensing  challenges
and  is  unlikely.  Absent  a  new  repository,  our  options  are  limited—on-site  storage
via  dry  casks  is  an  option,  but  one  which  is  inconsistent  with  the  Federal  Govern-
ment’s commitment to take control of the waste.

Reprocessing  is  another  answer,  but  it  may  well  drive  the  cost  of  nuclear  power
above that of other fuel sources, making it economically noncompetitive without gov-
ernment subsidies.

It is critical that we determine what the true cost of dealing with the waste mate-
rial  from  nuclear  power  plants  is  going  to  be  before  we  follow  the  Administration’s
plan to rely more heavily on nuclear power for electricity generation.

And  to  do  that,  it  is  critical  that  we  know  how  much  reprocessing  may  cost.  We
need  to  understand  the  cost  if  we  use  today’s  techniques,  as  well  as  how  much  we
will need to spend on research to develop new techniques and how much those tech-
niques will cost.

To pursue the President’s desire to expand the use of nuclear power without hav-
ing  a  good  idea  of  how  we  are  going  to  deal  with  the  waste  and  how  much  dealing
with it will cost is unwise.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  the  witnesses  what  they  believe  the  true  costs  of
spent nuclear fuel reprocessing are and whether it will ever be a viable, economical
alternative.

Thank  you  again  Madam  Chairwoman  and  I  yield  back  the  balance  of  my  time.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much.
Any  additional  opening  statements  submitted  by  the  Members

may be added into the record.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Good morning. I want to thank the witnesses for appearing before our committee
to  examine  the  economic  aspects  of  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing  technologies  in  the
United States. Currently the U.S. does not reprocess spent fuel from nuclear power
reactors and defense facilities. However, other countries, notably France and Japan,
do  reprocess  their  spent  fuel.  Generally,  reprocessing  has  been  prohibited  because
of concerns that the process preferred by the U.S. called PUREX, would make pluto-
nium  available  in  a  form  suitable  for  the  fabrication  of  weapons  by  terrorists  or
countries  seeking  to  become  nuclear  powers.  Today’s  oversight  hearing  will  explore
the  costs  of  locating,  permitting  and  building  an  additional  repository  site.  It  will
also discuss the risks and difficulties of pursuing the reprocessing options.

Within  my  home  State  of  Illinois,  the  only  nuclear  engineering  department  is  at
the University of Illinois. This is particularly alarming because our state has 11 op-
erating  nuclear  power  reactors,  Argonne  National  Laboratory,  where  Dr.  Phillip
Finck  is  from,  and  other  nuclear  facilities.  Illinois  residents  have  paid  more  than
$2.4  billion  on  the  federal  Nuclear  Waste  Fund.  My  state  has  a  large  stake  in  nu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

clear power and technology and under-supported programs and initiatives that could
improve upon our nuclear capabilities are quite troubling.

I  am  aware  that  Congress  may  be  called  on  to  consider  policy  options  on  waste
reprocessing  in  the  next  few  years  as  the  Administration  moves  to  change  nuclear
waste  policies  that  essentially  have  been  in  place  since  the  Carter  Administration.
Therefore, I am pleased we are holding this hearing today to gather information on
the economics of nuclear waste processing.

I welcome our witnesses and look forward to their testimony.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Jackson Lee follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE SHEILA JACKSON LEE

Chairwoman Biggert, Ranking Member Honda,
I  want  to  thank  you  for  organizing  this  very  important  Energy  Subcommittee
hearing  on  the  economic  aspects  of  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing.  This  is  not  an  issue
that is embedded in the public consciousness, but it should be. The issue of nuclear
waste  and  what  to  do  with  it  is  one  that  we  have  grappled  with  for  decades  and
is  a  question  that  will  only  gain  in  importance  as  time  goes  on.  I  welcome  the  wit-
nesses  to  this  subcommittee  and  hope  that  through  their  testimony  we  get  closer
to understanding all the complexities of this issue.

Nuclear energy is very much apart of our national energy policy and in fact reac-
tors generate about 20 percent of the electricity used in the U.S. However, with nu-
clear  energy  comes  the  concern  about  nuclear  waste.  The  fact  is  that  every  nuclear
power  reactor  produces  approximately  20  tons  of  highly  radioactive  nuclear  waste
every  year.  Currently  there  are  a  few  different  methods  to  deal  with  this  waste,
some  of  it  is  stored  on-site  at  the  nuclear  reactors  in  water-filled  cooling  pools,  or
at  some  other  sites,  waste  is  stored  in  dry  casks  above  ground  after  sufficient  cool-
ing.  About  50,000  metric  tons  of  commercial  spent  fuel  is  being  stored  at  73  sites
in 33 states.

Unfortunately  the  issue  of  nuclear  waste  is  not  only  a  scientific  one,  but  also  a
security  issue.  As  a  member  of  the  Homeland  Security  Committee  I  know  that  nu-
clear materials of any kind represent a threat to our safety if targeted by terrorists.
In  addition,  the  reprocessing  of  waste  is  also  a  homeland  security  threat  because
current  reprocessing  technologies  produce  weapons-grade  plutonium.  Clearly,  in-
creasing the availability of such dangerous materials only heightens the risk to our
nation.

I hope that through the course of this hearing that we will be able to move closer
to  finding  a  method  for  nuclear  reprocessing  that  will  not  result  in  weapons-grade
plutonium. I applaud the report accompanying H.R. 2419, the Energy and Water De-
velopment Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 2006, which the House passed in May,
which directed the DOE to focus research in its Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative pro-
gram  on  improving  nuclear  reprocessing  technologies.  The  report  stated,  ‘‘The  De-
partment  shall  accelerate  this  research  in  order  to  make  a  specific  technology  rec-
ommendation, not later than the end of fiscal year 2007, to the President and Con-
gress  on  a  particular  reprocessing  technology  that  should  be  implemented  in  the
United  States.  In  addition,  the  Department  shall  prepare  an  integrated  spent  fuel
recycling  plan  for  implementation  beginning  in  fiscal  year  2007,  including  rec-
ommendation  of  an  advanced  reprocessing  technology  and  a  competitive  process  to
select  one  or  more  sites  to  develop  integrated  spent  fuel  recycling  facilities.’’  Cur-
rently,  the  situation  as  it  stands  with  nuclear  waste  is  much  akin  to  being  stuck
between  a  rock  and  a  hard  place.  I  have  full  faith  in  our  scientific  community  to
devise a solution to this vital issue.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. And at this time, I would like to introduce
all of our witnesses, and thank you for coming before us this after-
noon.

First,  we  have  Dr.  Richard  K.  Lester,  who  is  the  Director  of  the
Industrial  Performance  Center,  and  a  Professor  of  Nuclear  Science
and  Engineering  at  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology.  He
co-authored  a  2003  study  entitled  ‘‘The  Future  of  Nuclear  Power.’’
Thank  you.  Dr.  Donald  W.  Jones  is  Vice  President  of  Marketing
and  Senior  Economist  at  RCF  Economic  and  Financial  Consulting
in Chicago, Illinois. He co-directed a 2004 study entitled ‘‘The Eco-
nomic  Future  of  Nuclear  Power.’’  Welcome  to  you.  And  then  Dr.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Steven Fetter is the Dean of the School of Public Policy at the Uni-
versity of Maryland. He co-authored a 2005 paper entitled ‘‘The Ec-
onomics of Reprocessing vs. Direct Disposal of Spent Nuclear Fuel.’’
And  last,  but  not  least,  is  Mr.  Marvin  Fertel,  who  is  the  Senior
Vice President and Chief Nuclear Officer at the Nuclear Energy In-
stitute.

As  the  witnesses  know,  spoken  testimony  will  be  limited  to  five
minutes each, after which Members will have five minutes each to
ask questions.

So we will begin with Dr. Lester.

bery.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  RICHARD  K.  LESTER,  DIRECTOR,  THE  IN-
DUSTRIAL  PERFORMANCE  CENTER;  PROFESSOR  OF  NU-
CLEAR  SCIENCE  AND  ENGINEERING,  MASSACHUSETTS  IN-
STITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY
Dr. LESTER. Thank you, Madame Chairman and Members of the
Committee.  It  is  a  great  honor  to  be  called  before  you  to  discuss
the  subject  of  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing.  I  would  like  to  ask  your
indulgence and request a short delay in submitting my written tes-
timony. The theft of my computer in the United Kingdom two days
ago, unfortunately, makes this necessary.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Yes,  we  understand  that  you  had  a  rob-

Dr. LESTER. Thank you.
Closing the nuclear fuel cycle, that is reprocessing spent fuel and
recycling the recovered plutonium, has long been a dream of many
in  the  nuclear  power  industry.  Here  in  the  United  States,  that
dream  has  been  elusive,  but  lately  it  has  been  rekindled  as  atten-
tion focuses once again on the future role of nuclear in meeting our
nation’s energy needs.

I  firmly  believe  that  a  major  expansion  of  nuclear  power  will  al-
most certainly be necessary if our offices, industries, and homes are
to be assured of access to adequate supplies of energy at reasonable
costs and with proper regard for the environment. However, in my
judgment,  an  attempt  to  introduce  spent  fuel  reprocessing  here  in
the  United  States  in  the  near-term  would  not  only  not  help  to  en-
sure a greater role for nuclear power, but would actually make this
outcome less likely.

There is no disagreement that the operations needed to close the
fuel cycle, reprocessing and the fabrication of mixed oxide fuel, are
costly  and  that  their  introduction  would  cause  an  increase  in  the
overall  cost  of  nuclear  electricity  relative  to  the  once-through  cycle
with direct disposal of spent fuel.

Opinions  differ  as  to  how  large  the  cost  penalty  would  be.  But
given  that  unfavorable  economics  is  one  of  the  main  barriers  to
new nuclear energy investment, any course of action that would re-
sult  in  an  increase  in  nuclear-generating  costs  should  be  viewed
with caution.

Those  advocating  near-term  reprocessing  make  three  arguments

in response to these concerns.

First, that the closed nuclear fuel cycle is indeed more costly, but
the  cost  penalty  isn’t  large,  and  so  we  shouldn’t  worry  too  much
about it.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

Second,  that  although  the  closed  fuel  cycle  is  more  expensive
than  the  open  cycle  under  current  economic  conditions,  in  the  fu-
ture this comparison is likely to be reversed.

And  third,  that  the  economic  penalty  associated  with  reprocess-
ing  and  recycle  is  outweighed  by  the  non-economic  benefits  that
would  accrue.  In  the  past,  advocates  of  reprocessing  have  empha-
sized its contributions to extending fuel supplies and to energy sup-
ply security. Today the principal claim is that reprocessing will fa-
cilitate  and  simplify  the  management  and  disposal  of  nuclear
waste.

These  arguments  are,  on  the  surface,  attractive,  but  on  closer
analysis,  none  of  them  is  persuasive.  I  would  like  briefly  to  com-
ment on each point in turn.

First,  how  large  is  the  cost  penalty  associated  with  reprocessing
and  recycle  likely  to  be?  An  exact  answer  is  not  possible,  because
some of the most important contributing factors are uncertain.

However,  under  current  economic  conditions,  and  making  gen-
erally  optimistic  assumptions  about  how  much  reprocessing  and
mixed  oxide  fabrication  services  would  cost  were  they  to  be  avail-
able  in  the  United  States,  I  estimate  that  a  U.S.  nuclear  power
plant  opting  to  use  these  services  would  incur  a  total  nuclear  fuel
cycle  cost  of  about  1.8  cents  per  kilowatt  hour  of  electricity,  which
is just over three times the total cost of the once-through fuel cycle
used by nuclear plants today. Since fuel cycle expenses account for
about  10  percent  of  the  total  cost  of  nuclear  electricity  from
unamortized  nuclear  power  plants,  with  capital-related  costs  ac-
counting  for  most  of  the  remainder,  this  would  be  equivalent  to
adding about 20 percent to the total nuclear generation cost.

The impact of reprocessing is often expressed in terms of the av-
erage  cost  for  the  entire  fleet  of  nuclear  power  plants,  with  just
enough  plants  using  mixed  oxide  fuel  to  consume  all  of  the  pluto-
nium  recovered  by  reprocessing  the  spent  fuel  from  the  rest  of  the
plant  population.  In  that  case,  and  using  the  same  economic  as-
sumptions,  the  effect  of  reprocessing  and  plutonium  recycle  would
be  to  increase  the  fleet  average  fuel  cycle  cost  by  a  little  over  0.2
cents per kilowatt hour, or about 40 percent. The total nuclear elec-
tricity cost in that case would increase by about four percent. How-
ever,  while  fleet  averaging  may  be  appropriate  for  a  centrally-
planned nuclear power industry like that of, say, France, where the
enforcement  of  cross-subsidy  arrangements  ensuring  uniformity  of
cost  impacts  across  the  entire  industry  is  perhaps  plausible,  this
would  not  be  the  case  in  the  United  States.  Here,  in  the  absence
of a federal subsidy, nuclear plant owners opting for the closed fuel
cycle  would  either  have  to  absorb  the  entire  cost  increase  them-
selves or pass part or all of it on to their customers. In the competi-
tive wholesale regional power markets in which many U.S. nuclear
power  plants  today  are  operating,  it  is  unlikely  that  either  option
would be attractive to plant owners.

Could today’s negative economic prognosis for reprocessing be re-
versed in the future? For at least the next few decades, this seems
extremely unlikely. For example, the purchase price of natural ura-
nium  would  have  to  increase  to  almost  $400  per  kilogram  for  re-
processing to be economic. By comparison, the average price of ura-
nium delivered to U.S. nuclear power reactors under long-term con-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

tract  last  year  was  about  $32  per  kilogram.  Alternatively,  the  cost
of reprocessing would have to fall to less than 25 percent of the al-
ready  optimistic  referenced  reprocessing  cost  I  have  assumed.  In
neither  of  these  scenarios  do  the  necessary  price  movements  fall
within the bounds of the credible.

Indeed, the needed reduction in reprocessing costs would be par-
ticularly  implausible  given  the  requirement  to  select  a  specific  re-
processing  technology  for  large-scale  implementation  as  early  as
2007,  as  is  called  for  in  recent  legislation.  This  requirement  would
effectively force the adoption of the PUREX technology currently in
use  in  France,  the  United  Kingdom,  and  Japan,  since  no  alter-
native  would  be  available  in  that  time  scale.  And  there  is  simply
no  possibility  of  achieving  a  cost  reduction  of  75  percent,  or  any-
thing close to it, for this relative mature technology. Nor would the
adoption  of  PUREX  technology  fundamentally  change  either  the
impending problem of inadequate interim spent fuel storage capac-
ity or the problem of finding a suitable site for final waste disposal.
Advanced  reprocessing  technologies,  if  coupled  with  transmuta-
tion schemes, could, in principle, improve the prospects for success-
ful  disposal.  The  goals  would  be  to  reduce  the  thermal  load  on  the
repository,  thereby  increasing  its  storage  capacity,  and  to  shorten
the  time  for  which  the  waste  must  be  isolated  from  the  biosphere.
But  even  in  the  best  case,  these  technologies  will  not  be  available
for  large-scale  deployment  for  at  least  two  or  three  decades,  and
perhaps not on any time scale. Furthermore, they would very likely
be  more  costly  than  conventional  PUREX  reprocessing  and  MOX
recycle  technologies  since  they  would  entail  more  complex  separa-
tions  processes,  more  complete  recovery  of  radionuclides,  a  more
complex  fuel  fabrication  process,  and  the  need  to  transmute  a
broader array of radionuclides than just plutonium.

The  MIT  Study  on  the  Future  of  Nuclear  Power  considered  a
range of advanced fuel cycle options from a waste management per-
spective  and  reached  the  following  conclusion:  ‘‘We  do  not  believe
that a convincing case can be made on the basis of waste manage-
ment considerations alone that the benefits of advanced, closed fuel
cycle schemes would outweigh the attendant safety, environmental,
and security risks and economic costs.’’

The MIT report further concluded that waste management strat-
egies in the open fuel cycle are available that could yield long-term
risk  reduction  benefits  at  least  as  great  as  those  claimed  for  ad-
vanced  reprocessing  and  transmutation  schemes  and  with  fewer
short-term risks and lower development and deployment costs.

For all of these—I am sorry.
Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  If  you  could  just  sum  up  and  we  will  get

to the rest of it with questions, I am sure.

Dr. LESTER. For all of these reasons, as well as others I have not
discussed  here,  the  MIT  study  concluded  that  reprocessing  and
MOX  recycle  is  not  an  attractive  option  for  nuclear  energy  for  at
least  the  next  50  years,  even  assuming  a  major  expansion  of  the
nuclear industry, both in the United States and overseas.

Thank you, Madame Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Lester follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD K. LESTER

Madam Chairwoman and Members of the Committee:

It is an honor to be called before you to discuss the subject of nuclear fuel reproc-
essing—a matter of considerable importance to the future of nuclear energy, as well
as to the effort to prevent the further spread of nuclear weapons.1

Closing  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle—that  is,  reprocessing  spent  nuclear  fuel  and  recy-
cling  the  recovered  plutonium—has  been  a  dream  of  many  in  the  nuclear  industry
from its earliest days. Here in the U.S. that dream has long been elusive, but lately
it  has  been  rekindled  as  attention  focuses  once  more  on  the  future  role  of  the  nu-
clear  industry  in  meeting  our  nation’s  energy  needs.  I  believe  that  a  major  expan-
sion  of  nuclear  power  will  almost  certainly  be  necessary  if  our  industries,  offices,
and homes are to be assured of access to adequate supplies of energy at reasonable
cost  and  with  proper  regard  for  the  environment,  especially  given  the  crucial  need
to  curtail  carbon  dioxide  emissions.  However,  in  my  judgment  an  attempt  to  intro-
duce  spent  fuel  reprocessing  here  in  the  U.S.  in  the  near-term  would  not  only  not
help  to  ensure  a  greater  role  for  nuclear  power  but  would  actually  make  this  out-
come less likely.

Spent  nuclear  fuel  from  commercial  light  water  reactors  typically  contains  about
one  percent  of  plutonium.  Recovering  this  plutonium  and  recycling  it  in  so-called
MOX or mixed uranium-plutonium oxide fuel would reduce the requirement for nat-
ural uranium ore by about 17 percent and the requirement for uranium enrichment
services by a similar amount. But the operations needed to accomplish this—reproc-
essing and the fabrication of mixed-oxide fuel—are costly, and adopting them would
cause  an  increase  in  the  overall  cost  of  nuclear  electricity  relative  to  the  open  or
once-through  fuel  cycle  with  direct  disposal  of  spent  fuel.  There  is  no  disagreement
about  this,  although  opinions  differ  as  to  how  large  the  cost  penalty  would  be.  But
given  that  unfavorable  economics  has  been  one  of  the  main  barriers  to  nuclear  en-
ergy investment for decades, and that it remains a major issue today, any proposed
course of action that would result in an increase in nuclear generating costs should
be viewed with caution.

Those who advocate near-term reprocessing make three arguments in response to

these concerns:

First,  that  the  closed  fuel  cycle  is  indeed  more  costly,  but  that  the  cost  penalty
is not large, and so we should not worry too much about it.
Second,  that  although  the  closed  fuel  cycle  is  more  expensive  than  the  open
cycle under current economic conditions, in the future this comparison is likely
to be reversed.
Third,  that  the  economic  penalty  associated  with  reprocessing  and  recycle  is
outweighed  by  the  non-economic  benefits  that  would  accrue.  In  the  past,  advo-
cates  of  reprocessing  have  emphasized  its  contributions  to  extending  fuel  sup-
plies and to energy supply security. Today the principal claim is that reprocess-
ing  will  facilitate  and  simplify  the  management  and  disposal  of  nuclear  waste.
These  arguments  are  superficially  attractive,  but  on  closer  analysis  none  of  them
carries real weight. Indeed, the preponderance of evidence in each case points in the
opposite  direction,  to  the  need  to  avoid  the  implementation  of  reprocessing  in  the
near-term. I will briefly comment on each point in turn.

First, how large is the cost penalty associated with reprocessing and recycle likely
to be? An exact answer is not possible, because some of the most important contrib-
uting  factors  are  uncertain  or  otherwise  difficult  to  estimate.  The  biggest  source  of
uncertainty, with the largest impact on overall cost, is associated with reprocessing
itself. Other important uncertainties center on the cost of MOX fuel fabrication, and
the  cost  of  disposing  of  reprocessed  high-level  waste  relative  to  the  direct  disposal
of spent fuel.

Under current economic conditions, and making generally optimistic assumptions
about  how  much  reprocessing  and  MOX  fabrication  services  would  cost  were  they
to be available in the U.S., I estimate that a U.S. nuclear power plant opting to use
these services would incur a total nuclear fuel cycle cost of about 1.8 cents per kilo-
watt hour of electricity. By comparison, the total cost of the once through fuel cycle
is  a  little  under  0.6  cents  per  kilowatt  hour.  In  other  words,  nuclear  power  plants
operating on the closed fuel cycle would experience a nuclear fuel cycle cost increase
of  about  300  percent.  Since  fuel  cycle  expenses  account  for  about  10  percent  of  the

1 A  previous  hearing  of  this  subcommittee  reviewed  the  security  aspects  of  reprocessing.  In

this testimony I focus on the economic dimension.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

total  cost  of  nuclear  electricity  from  unamortized  nuclear  power  plants  (capital-re-
lated  costs  account  for  most  of  the  remainder),  this  would  be  equivalent  to  an  in-
crease of about 20 percent in the total nuclear generation cost.2

In  this  analysis,  disposing  of  reprocessed  high-level  waste  was  assumed  to  be  25
percent less expensive than disposing of spent fuel directly. In fact, there can be lit-
tle  confidence  today  in  any  estimate  of  such  cost  savings,  especially  if  the  need  to
dispose  of  non-high-level  waste  contaminated  with  significant  quantities  of  long-
lived  transuranic  radionuclides  generated  in  reprocessing  and  MOX  fabrication  is
also  taken  into  account.  But  even  if  the  cost  of  disposing  of  reprocessed  high-level
waste  were  zero,  the  basic  conclusion  that  reprocessing  is  uneconomic  would  not
change.

The impact of reprocessing is often expressed in terms of the average cost for the
entire  fleet  of  nuclear  power  plants.  The  usual  assumption  is  that  the  fleet  would
be  configured  so  as  to  be  in  balance  with  respect  to  plutonium  flows,  with  just
enough power plants using MOX fuel to consume all the plutonium recovered by re-
processing  the  spent  fuel  from  the  rest  of  the  plant  population.  In  that  case,  and
using the same economic assumptions as before, the effect of reprocessing and pluto-
nium  recycle  would  be  to  increase  the  fleet-average  fuel  cycle  cost  by  about  0.23
cents/kilowatt hour, or about 40 percent. The total nuclear electricity cost would in-
crease by about four percent. However, while fleet-averaging may be appropriate for
a  centrally-planned  nuclear  power  industry  like  that  of,  say,  France,  where  the  en-
forcement of cross-subsidy arrangements ensuring uniformity of cost impacts across
the entire industry is perhaps plausible, this would not be the case in the U.S. Here,
in the absence of a direct federal subsidy, nuclear plant owners opting for the closed
fuel  cycle  would  either  have  to  absorb  the  entire  cost  increase  themselves  or  pass
part  or  all  of  it  on  to  their  customers.  In  the  competitive  wholesale  regional  power
markets in which many U.S. nuclear power plants operate, it is unlikely that either
option would be attractive to plant owners.

Could  today’s  negative  economic  prognosis  for  reprocessing  be  reversed  in  the  fu-
ture? For at least the next few decades this seems extremely unlikely. For example,
even  with  the  same  optimistic  assumptions  for  reprocessing  and  MOX  fabrication
costs as before, the purchase price of natural uranium would have to increase to al-
most  $400/kg  for  reprocessing  to  be  economic.  By  comparison,  the  average  price  of
uranium  delivered  to  U.S.  nuclear  power  reactors  under  long-term  contract  during
2004 was about $32/kg.3 In recent months uranium prices have moved sharply high-
er,  with  long-term  contract  prices  as  of  mid-May  reportedly  exceeding  $70/kg.  But
this is still far below the break-even price of $400/kg. Alternatively, could reprocess-
ing  costs  decline  to  the  point  at  which  MOX  fuel  would  be  competitive  with  low-
enriched  uranium  fuel?  At  current  uranium  prices  the  cost  of  reprocessing  would
have to fall below about $260/kgHM, a reduction of about 75 percent relative to the
(already  optimistic)  reference  reprocessing  cost  assumed  here.  In  neither  of  these
scenarios  do  the  necessary  price  movements  fall  within  the  bounds  of  the  credible.
Indeed,  the  needed  reduction  in  reprocessing  costs  would  be  particularly  implau-
sible given a requirement to select a specific reprocessing technology for large-scale
implementation  as  early  as  2007,  as  is  called  for  in  recent  House  legislation.  This

2 In this analysis, the cost of reprocessing is assumed to be $1,000 per kilogram of heavy metal
in  spent  fuel.  This  is  an  optimistic  assumption,  and  is  considerably  lower  than  the  estimate
made by Matthew Bunn and his colleagues for a new reprocessing plant with the same technical
and cost characteristics as BNFL’s Thermal Oxide Reprocessing Plant (THORP) at Sellafield in
the  UK.  (See  Matthew  Bunn,  Steve  Fetter,  John  Holdren,  and  Bob  van  der  Zwaan,  ‘‘The  Eco-
nomics  of  Reprocessing  versus  Direct  Disposal  of  Spent  Fuel,’’  Project  on  Managing  the  Atom,
Kennedy  School  of  Government,  Harvard  University,  December  2003.)  Any  new  reprocessing
plant committed for construction for at least the next decade would necessarily be modeled close-
ly on the PUREX technology employed at THORP and at the French fuel cycle firm Areva’s re-
processing complex at La Hague. According to the Harvard study, the cost at such a plant would
range  from  $1,350  to  $3,100  per  kilogram,  depending  on  the  financing  arrangements  used.  The
low  end  of  the  range  assumes  a  government-owned  plant,  with  access  to  capital  at  risk-free  in-
terest  rates;  the  upper  end  would  apply  to  a  privately-owned  plant  with  no  guaranteed  rate  of
return  on  investment.  Reports  over  the  last  few  years  indicate  that  reprocessing  contracts  of-
fered  by  THORP  and  by  Areva’s  UP–3  reprocessing  plant  at  La  Hague  have  recently  been  in
the $600–$900 per kilogram range. But both of these plants have now been fully amortized, and
the  offered  prices  are  believed  only  to  cover  operating  costs.  Earlier  contracts  at  these  plants,
for  which  the  price  included  a  capital  cost  recovery  component,  were  reportedly  in  the  $1,700–
$2,300/kg  range  (see  Bunn  et  al.,  op.cit.)  Thus  the  $1,000/kg  cost  assumed  here  is  conservative
even  with  respect  to  past  experience.  Moreover,  future  reprocessing  plants  would  almost  cer-
tainly be required to meet more stringent and hence more costly safety and environmental speci-
fications than the plants at Sellafield and La Hague, including a zero-emission requirement for
gaseous  fission  products  and  the  need  to  harden  facilities  against  the  risk  of  terrorist  attack.
3 Energy Information Administration, ‘‘Uranium Marketing Annual Report—2004 Edition,’’ re-

lease date: 29 April 29 2005, at http://www.eia.doe.gov/cneaf/nuclear/umar/umar.html.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

requirement  would  effectively  force  the  adoption  of  the  PUREX  technology  that  is
currently  in  use  in  France,  the  United  Kingdom,  and  Japan,  since  no  alternative
would be available on that time scale. And there is simply no possibility of achieving
a  cost  reduction  of  75  percent—or  anything  close  to  it—for  this  relatively  mature
technology.

A similar point can be made about the waste management implications of reproc-
essing.  The  selection  of  PUREX  reprocessing  technology  would  not  fundamentally
change  either  the  impending  problem  of  inadequate  interim  spent  fuel  storage  ca-
pacity  or  the  problem  of  finding  a  suitable  site  for  final  waste  disposal.  The  need
for  additional  storage  capacity  and  for  a  final  repository,  whether  at  Yucca  Moun-
tain or elsewhere, would still remain.

Advanced reprocessing technologies, if coupled with transmutation schemes, could
in principle improve the prospects for successful disposal. Such schemes would par-
tition  plutonium  and  other  long-lived  actinides  from  the  spent  fuel—and  possibly
also  certain  long-lived  fission  products—and  transmute  them  into  shorter-lived  and
more  benign  species.  The  goals  would  be  to  reduce  the  thermal  load  on  the  reposi-
tory,  thereby  increasing  its  storage  capacity,  and  to  shorten  the  time  for  which  the
waste  must  be  isolated  from  the  biosphere.  It  is  important  for  research  to  continue
on advanced fuel cycle technologies potentially capable of achieving these goals. But
even in the best case these technologies are not likely to be available for large-scale
deployment for at least two or three decades. Indeed, there is no guarantee that the
desired  performance  objectives  could  be  achieved  on  any  time  scale.  The  eventual
economic impact of such schemes cannot now be predicted with confidence. But the
strong  likelihood  is  that  they  would  be  more  costly  than  conventional  PUREX  re-
processing and MOX recycle, since they would entail more complex separations proc-
esses, more complete recovery of radionuclides, a more complex fuel fabrication proc-
ess, and the need to transmute a broader array of radionuclides than just the pluto-
nium isotopes.

The  MIT  Study  on  the  Future  of  Nuclear  Power  considered  a  range  of  advanced
fuel cycle options from a waste management perspective, and reached the following
conclusion:4

‘‘We  do  not  believe  that  a  convincing  case  can  be  made  on  the  basis  of  waste
management  considerations  alone  that  the  benefits  of  advanced,  closed  fuel
cycle schemes would outweigh the attendant safety, environmental, and security
risks and economic costs.’’

The MIT report further concluded that waste management strategies in the open
fuel  cycle  are  available  that  could  yield  long-term  risk  reduction  benefits  at  least
as  great  as  those  claimed  for  advanced  reprocessing  and  transmutation  schemes,
and  with  fewer  short-term  risks  and  lower  development  and  deployment  costs.
These  strategies  include  both  relatively  incremental  improvements  to  the  currently
preferred approach of building mined geologic repositories as well as more far-reach-
ing innovations such as deep borehole disposal.

For  all  these  reasons,  as  well  as  others  I  have  not  discussed  here,  including  the
adequacy  of  natural  uranium  resources  and  the  risks  of  nuclear  weapons  prolifera-
tion, the MIT Study concluded that reprocessing and MOX recycle is not an attrac-
tive  option  for  nuclear  energy  for  at  least  the  next  fifty  years,  even  assuming  sub-
stantial  expansion  of  the  nuclear  industry  both  here  in  the  U.S.  and  overseas,  and
that the open, once-through fuel cycle is the best choice for the nuclear power sector
over that period. The report recommends that:

‘‘For  the  next  decades,  government  and  industry  in  the  U.S.  and  elsewhere
should  give  priority  to  the  deployment  of  the  once-through  fuel  cycle,  rather
than  the  development  of  more  expensive  closed  fuel  cycle  technology  involving
reprocessing and new advanced thermal or fast reactor technologies.’’

Research  on  advanced  reprocessing,  recycling,  and  transmutation  technologies
should certainly continue. A closed fuel cycle will be necessary if fast-neutron breed-
er  reactors  ever  become  competitive.  But  that  does  not  seem  likely  for  the  foresee-
able  future,  and  for  now  the  primary  goal  of  fuel  cycle  research  should  be  to  maxi-
mize the economic competitiveness, the proliferation resistance, and the safety both
short- and long-term of the once-through fuel cycle.

What if, in spite of these arguments, Congress still seeks to intervene to stimulate
large scale reprocessing in the near-term? Because a purely private initiative would
be  economically  unviable,  such  an  intervention,  to  be  effective,  would  inevitably  re-

4 MIT  Study  Group,  The  Future  of  Nuclear  Power,  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology,

2003.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

quire  a  major  commitment  of  federal  funds.5 The  need  for  direct  government  in-
volvement  would  also  place  heavy  demands  on  the  government’s  nuclear-skilled
human  resources,  who  would  necessarily  be  involved  in  the  selection  of  a  site,  the
development  of  a  licensing  framework,  the  management  of  contractors,  and  so  on.
The resources—both human and financial—that are potentially available to the gov-
ernment to support the development of nuclear power are not unlimited. A new fed-
eral  reprocessing  initiative  would  therefore  risk  diverting  resources  from  other  pol-
icy  initiatives  that  are  likely  to  make  a  greater  positive  contribution  to  the  future
of nuclear power over the next few decades.

BIOGRAPHY FOR RICHARD K. LESTER

Richard Lester is the founding Director of the MIT Industrial Performance Center
and a Professor of Nuclear Science and Engineering at MIT. His research and teach-
ing  focus  on  industrial  innovation  and  technology  management,  with  an  emphasis
on the energy and environmental industries. He has led several major studies of na-
tional  and  regional  competitiveness  and  innovation  performance  commissioned  by
governments and industrial groups around the world.

Professor  Lester  is  also  internationally  known  for  his  research  on  the  manage-
ment  and  control  of  nuclear  technology,  and  at  MIT  he  continues  to  teach  and  su-
pervise students in the fields of nuclear waste management and nuclear energy eco-
nomics and policy.

Professor  Lester  is  a  widely  published  author.  His  recent  books  include  Innova-
tion—The  Missing  Dimension  (Harvard  University  Press,  2004),  jointly  authored
with Michael J. Piore; Making Technology Work: Applications in Energy and the En-
vironment  (Cambridge  University  Press,  2003),  with  John  M.  Deutch;  and  Global
Taiwan  (M.E.  Sharpe,  2005),  co-edited  with  Suzanne  Berger.  Other  books  include
The Productive Edge: How American Industries Are Pointing the Way to a New Era
of  Economic  Growth  (W.W.  Norton,  1998),  Made  By  Hong  Kong  (Oxford  University
Press, 1997) with Suzanne Berger, and Made in America (MIT Press, 1989) with Mi-
chael  Dertouzos  and  Robert  Solow.  (With  over  300,000  copies  in  print  in  eight  lan-
guages, Made in America is the best-selling title in the history of MIT Press.)

Dr. Lester recently served as a member of the MIT study team that produced the
2003 report, The Future of Nuclear Power, and is currently participating in a follow-
up MIT study on the global future of coal. Early in his career, Dr. Lester developed
the Nation’s first graduate-level course on nuclear waste management, and he is co-
author,  with  Mason  Willrich,  of  Radioactive  Waste:  Management  and  Regulation
(Free Press, 1978).

Professor Lester obtained his undergraduate degree in chemical engineering from
Imperial  College  and  a  doctorate  in  nuclear  engineering  from  MIT.  He  has  been  a
member of the MIT faculty since 1979. He serves as an advisor or consultant to nu-
merous  corporations,  governments,  foundations  and  non-profit  groups,  and  lectures
frequently to academic, business and general audiences throughout the world.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much.
Dr. Jones, you are recognized.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  DONALD  W.  JONES,  VICE  PRESIDENT  OF
MARKETING  AND  SENIOR  ECONOMIST  AT  RCF  ECONOMIC
AND FINANCIAL CONSULTING, INC.
Dr.  JONES.  Good  afternoon,  Madame  Chairman,  Ranking  Mem-
ber Honda, and Members of the Energy Subcommittee of the House
Committee on Science.

I  am  Dr.  Donald  W.  Jones,  Vice  President  of  RCF  Economic  and
Financial  Consulting.  Our  firm,  headquartered  in  Chicago,  con-
ducts analysis of energy and environmental issues, as well as other
economic  topics.  Together  with  Dr.  George  S.  Tolley,  Professor
Emeritus  of  Economics  at  the  University  of  Chicago,  I  co-directed
a  study  conducted  at  the  University  of  Chicago  entitled  ‘‘The  Eco-
nomic  Future  of  Nuclear  Power.’’  Our  study  was  published  in  Au-

5 A  large  new  reprocessing  facility  using  the  same  PUREX  technology  now  in  use  in  France
and  the  UK  would  cost  several  billion  dollars  to  build.  The  capital  cost  of  the  new  Japanese
PUREX reprocessing plant at Rokkasho-Mura reportedly exceeds $20 billion.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

gust  2004  and  was  funded  by  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy.  My
prepared  statement  today  is  based  on  the  findings  of  our  study.  I
ask that our study be submitted for the record.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Without objection.
(The  information  appears  in  Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for

the Record, p. 66.)

Dr.  JONES.  I  have  been  asked  by  the  Subcommittee  to  focus  on
the economics aspects of nuclear fuel reprocessing. In addition, the
Subcommittee identified the following questions that should be spe-
cifically  addressed.  One,  under  what  conditions  would  nuclear  fuel
reprocessing  be  economically  competitive  with  the  open  fuel  cycle
and  with  other  sources  of  electric  power?  What  major  assumptions
underlie your analysis? And two, how would a decision to reprocess
affect  the  economic  future  of  nuclear  power  in  the  United  States?
The  financial  model  developed  in  our  study  projects  that,  in  the
absence  of  federal  financial  policies  aimed  at  the  nuclear  industry,
for  example  loan  guarantees,  accelerated  depreciation,  and  invest-
ment or production tax credits, the first new nuclear plants coming
on  line  will  have  a  levelized  cost  of  electricity,  or  LCOE,  which  is
the price required to cover operating and capital costs, that ranges
from  $47  to  $71  per  megawatt  hour.  This  price  range  exceeds  pro-
jections  of  $33  to  $41  for  coal-fired  plants  and  $35  to  $45  for  gas-
fired  plants.  Our  assumptions  for  new  nuclear  plants  included  ac-
cepted  ranges  of  capital  costs,  $1,200  to  $1,800  per  kilowatt  over-
night costs, with a three percent risk premium on loans and equity,
and  seven-year  estimated  construction  time.  We  found  that  capital
cost  is  the  single  most  important  factor  determining  the  economic
competitiveness  of  nuclear  power.  After  first-of-a-kind  engineering
costs  are  paid  and  the  construction  of  the  first  few  nuclear  plants
has been completed, there is a good prospect that lower LCOEs can
be  achieved  that  would  allow  nuclear  to  be  directly  competitive  in
the  marketplace,  without  subsidies.  For  fossil  generation,  the  as-
sumptions included conservative, or low, ranges of capital and fuel
costs. Recent increases in coal and gas prices will raise LCOEs for
coal-fired  and  gas-fired  plants.  In  the  long-term,  the  competitive-
ness  of  new  nuclear  plants  will  be  markedly  enhanced  by  policies
that  required  fossil-fired  plants  to  control  greenhouse  gas  emis-
sions.

Our  projected  costs  for  new  nuclear  plants  included  nuclear  fuel
costs  estimated  at  $4.35  per  megawatt  hour.  This  estimate  in-
cluded the cost of raw uranium ore, its conversion, its enrichment,
and  the  cost  to  fabricate  the  nuclear  fuel.  An  additional  $1  per
megawatt hour was included for the nuclear waste fee. The on-site
storage  cost  was  estimated  to  be  about  10  cents  per  megawatt
hour.  Thus,  the  total  nuclear  fuel  cycle  cost,  assuming  direct  dis-
posal, is less than 10 percent of overall LCOE for the first few nu-
clear  plants.  The  back-end  costs  are  estimated  to  even  a  smaller
percentage, about two percent of the cost of electricity.

Our  study  also  examined  the  costs  of  reprocessing  spent  nuclear
fuel.  We  used  publicly  available  estimates:  estimates  reported  by
the  Nuclear  Energy  Agency;  work  done  at  Harvard  University,
under  the  auspices  of  Matthew  Bunn  et  al.,  ‘‘Project  on  Managing
the Atom;’’ and work done by Simon Lobdell, ‘‘The Yucca Mountain
Repository  and  the  Future  of  Reprocessing.’’  NEA  estimated  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

reprocessing  costs  were  about  $2.40  per  megawatt  hour,  Bunn  et
al.’s estimate is about $1,000 per kilogram of heavy metal, or about
$2.65 per megawatt hour, and Lobdell’s estimate is about $2.80 per
megawatt hour. Thus, the average of these estimates is about $2.65
per megawatt hour, which still represents a small percentage of the
LCOE,  a  little  less  than  five  percent  for  the  first  new  nuclear
plants.  The  study  did  not  include  the  added  fabrication  costs  with
recycling  plutonium  and  uranium,  or  any  net  costs  beyond  the
levelized cost estimates for an advanced reactor to consume the re-
maining actinides.

While the first new nuclear plants would not be competitive with
fossil  generation  without  some  form  of  temporary  assistance,  re-
processing would have little influence on the assistance required to
make it competitive. If carbon sequestration were to be required for
fossil-fired  generation,  even  the  first  new  nuclear  plants,  with  re-
processing, would be competitive.

To summarize, reprocessing would not be an important economic
influence  on  the  competitiveness  of  new  nuclear  plants  under  cur-
rent regulatory and fuel-price circumstances. In addition, as point-
ed  out  in  our  study,  there  are  broad  policy  issues  that  will  more
likely  influence  the  choice  to  pursue  reprocessing  and  more  ad-
vanced fuel cycles than the economic factors.

Thank  you  very  much,  Madame  Chairman  and  Subcommittee
Members. This concludes my statement, and I would be pleased to
answer any questions you might have.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Jones follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DONALD W. JONES

Good  morning,  Madame  Chairwoman,  Ranking  Member  Honda,  and  Members  of
the Energy Subcommittee of the House Committee on Science. I am Dr. Donald W.
Jones,  Vice  President  of  RCF  Economic  and  Financial  Consulting.  Our  firm,
headquartered in Chicago, conducts analysis of energy and environmental issues, as
well  as  other  economic  topics.  Together  with  Dr.  George  S.  Tolley,  Professor  Emer-
itus  of  Economics  at  The  University  of  Chicago,  I  co-directed  a  study  conducted  at
The  University  of  Chicago,  entitled  ‘‘The  Economic  Future  of  Nuclear  Power.’’  Our
study  was  published  in  August  2004,  and  was  funded  by  the  U.S.  Department  of
Energy.  My  prepared  statement  today  is  based  on  the  findings  of  our  study.  I  ask
that our study be submitted for the record.

I  have  been  asked  by  the  Subcommittee  to  focus  on  the  economic  aspects  of  nu-
clear fuel reprocessing. In addition, the Subcommittee identified the following ques-
tions that should be specifically addressed:

1. Under what conditions would nuclear fuel reprocessing be economically com-
petitive  with  the  open  fuel  cycle  and  with  other  sources  of  electric  power?
What major assumptions underlie your analysis?

2. How  would  a  decision  to  reprocess  affect  the  economic  future  of  nuclear

power in the U.S.?

The financial model developed in our study projects that, in the absence of federal
financial  policies  aimed  at  the  nuclear  industry  (e.g.,  loan  guarantees,  accelerated
depreciation, and investment or production tax credits), the first new nuclear plants
coming on line will have a levelized cost of electricity (LCOE, i.e., the price required
to cover operating and capital costs) that ranges from $47 to $71 per megawatt-hour
(MWh).  This  price  range  exceeds  projections  of  $33  to  $41  for  coal-fired  plants  and
$35  to  $45  for  gas-fired  plants.  Our  assumptions  for  new  nuclear  plants  included
accepted  ranges  of  capital  costs  ($1,200  to  $1,800  per  kW  overnight  costs),  with  a
three percent risk premium on loans and equity, and seven-year estimated construc-
tion time. We found that capital cost is the single most important factor determining
the  economic  competitiveness  of  nuclear  power.  After  first-of-a-kind  engineering
costs  are  paid  and  construction  of  the  first  few  nuclear  plants  has  been  completed,
there is a good prospect that lower LCOEs can be achieved that would allow nuclear

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

to  be  directly  competitive  in  the  marketplace  (without  subsidies).  For  fossil  genera-
tion,  the  assumptions  included  conservative  (low)  ranges  of  capital  and  fuel  costs.
Recent increases in coal and gas prices will raise LCOEs for coal-fired and gas-fired
plants. In the long-term, the competitiveness of new nuclear plants would be mark-
edly enhanced by policies that required fossil-fired plants to control greenhouse gas
emissions.

Our  projected  costs  for  new  nuclear  plants  included  nuclear  fuel  costs  estimated
at  $4.35  per  MWh.  This  estimate  included  the  cost  of  raw  uranium  ore,  its  conver-
sion, its enrichment, and the cost to fabricate the nuclear fuel. An additional $1 per
MWh was included for the nuclear waste fee. The on-site storage cost was estimated
to be about $0.10 per MWh. Thus, the total nuclear fuel cycle cost, assuming direct
disposal,  is  less  than  ten  percent  of  overall  LCOE  for  the  first  few  nuclear  plants.
The  back-end  costs  are  estimated  to  be  even  a  smaller  percentage,  about  two  per-
cent of the cost of electricity.

Our  study  also  examined  the  costs  of  reprocessing  spent  nuclear  fuel.  We  used
publicly  available  estimates:  estimates  reported  by  Nuclear  Energy  Agency;  work
done at Harvard University, under the auspices of Mathew Bunn et al., ‘‘Project on
Managing  the  Atom;’’  and  work  done  by  Simon  Lobdell,  ‘‘The  Yucca  Mountain  Re-
pository  and  the  Future  of  Reprocessing.’’  NEA  estimated  that  reprocessing  costs
were  about  $2.40  per  MWh,  Bunn  et  al.’s  estimate  is  about  $1,000  per  kilogram  of
heavy  metal  or  about  $2.65  per  MWh,  and  Lobdell’s  estimate  is  about  $2.80  per
MWh. Thus, the average of these estimates is about $2.65 per MWh, which still rep-
resents  a  small  percentage  of  the  LCOE,  about  five  percent,  for  the  first  new  nu-
clear  plants.  The  study  did  not  include  the  added  fabrication  costs  with  recycling
plutonium and uranium, or any net costs beyond the levelized cost estimates for an
advanced reactor to consume the remaining actinides.

While the first new nuclear plants would not be competitive with fossil generation
without some form of temporary assistance, reprocessing would have little influence
on  the  assistance  required  to  make  it  competitive.  If  carbon  sequestration  were  to
be  required  for  fossil-fired  generation,  even  the  first  new  nuclear  plants,  with  re-
processing, would be competitive.

To summarize, reprocessing would not be an important economic influence on the
competitiveness  of  new  nuclear  plants  under  current  regulatory  and  fuel-price  cir-
cumstances.  In  addition,  as  pointed  out  in  our  study,  there  are  broad  policy  issues
that will more likely influence the choice to pursue reprocessing and more advanced
fuel cycles than the economic factors.

Thank  you  very  much  Madame  Chairwoman  and  Subcommittee  Members.  This
concludes my statement, and I would be pleased to answer any questions you might
have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR DONALD W. JONES

Donald  Jones  is  Vice  President  and  Senior  Economist  at  RCF  Economic  and  Fi-
nancial Consulting in Chicago. In 2003 and 2004, he co-directed, with George Tolley
of  the  University  of  Chicago’s  Economics  Department,  the  Chicago  study  of  the  fu-
ture of nuclear power in the United States. Prior to joining RCF, he has been a re-
search  staff  member  at  Oak  Ridge  National  Laboratory  and  has  served  on  the  fac-
ulties of the University of Chicago, the University of Colorado-Boulder, and the Uni-
versity of Tennessee. His background in energy includes price impacts of electricity
deregulation,  electricity  reliability,  energy  conservation,  renewable  energy,  environ-
mental  aspects  of  energy  supply,  strategic  petroleum  reserves,  the  macroeconomic
impacts  of  oil  supply  disruptions,  international  trade  in  energy  technologies,  and
various  aspects  of  energy  in  economic  development.  He  received  his  Ph.D.  from  the
University of Chicago in 1974.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much.
Dr. Fetter, you are recognized.

STATEMENT OF DR. STEVE FETTER, DEAN, SCHOOL OF

PUBLIC POLICY, UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND

Dr.  FETTER.  Madame  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  it  is  an  honor  to  be  invited  here  today  to  discuss  the
economics of reprocessing.

In  a  recent  study  of  this  issue  with  colleagues  at  Harvard  Uni-
versity,  we  searched  for  information  on  the  costs  of  reprocessing

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

and  other  fuel  cycle  services  and  examined  studies  by  the  OECD,
the  governments  of  France  and  Japan,  the  National  Academy  of
Sciences,  MIT  Chicago,  and  others.  I  draw  on  these  studies  to  ad-
dress the specific questions raised in your letter to me.

First,  under  what  conditions  would  reprocessing  be  economically
competitive?  There  is  widespread  agreement  that  reprocessing  is
significantly more expensive than direct disposal. Official studies in
France and Japan agree with this conclusion. At last year’s average
uranium prices, reprocessing would have to cost less than $400 per
kilogram of spent fuel to be competitive with the once-through fuel
cycle. For comparison, we estimate that reprocessing in a new U.S.
facility  built  and  operated  by  a  private  entity,  similar  to  those  in
the  United  Kingdom  and  France,  would  cost  over  $2,000  per  kilo-
gram,  five  times  more.  But  even  if  it  only  costs  $1,000  per  kilo-
gram,  which  might  be  possible  with  government  subsidies,  the
price  of  uranium  would  have  to  rise  eight  fold,  to  about  $400  per
kilogram,  to  break  even  with  the  once-through  fuel  cycle.  We  be-
lieve  it  is  extremely  unlikely  that  uranium  prices  will  rise  to  this
level in the next 50 years, even if nuclear power expands dramati-
cally.

The  PUREX  process  that  has  been  in  use—the  PUREX  process
has been in use for more than five decades, and it is unlikely that
dramatic  cost  reductions  could  be  achieved  with  this  or  similar
processes,  such  as  UREX+.  In  fact,  increasingly  stringent  environ-
mental  and  safety  regulations  will  put  countervailing  pressures  on
costs.  The  experience  at  the  facility  in  Japan,  which  has  seen  cap-
ital  cost  estimates  triple  to  $18  billion,  should  serve  as  a  cau-
tionary tale to any country contemplating reprocessing.

Pyroprocessing has also received attention, but a 1996 review by
the  National  Academy  concluded  that  it  is  by  no  means  certain
that  pyroprocessing  will  be  more  economical  than  PUREX.  And
more recent reviews concluded that it would be substantially more
expensive.

Second,  what  would  it  cost  to  manage  nuclear  waste  through  a
system  of  reprocessing  and  transmutation?  It  is  important  to  note
that  traditional  approaches  to  reprocessing  and  recycle,  as  prac-
ticed  in  France  and  planned  in  Japan,  do  not  have  waste  disposal
advantages. That is because the required repository space is deter-
mined  by  the  heat  output  of  the  wastes,  not  by  their  mass  or  vol-
ume.  If  just  the  plutonium  recovered  during  reprocessing  is  recy-
cled  in  existing  reactors,  the  build  up  of  heat-generating  isotopes
results in greater overall waste heat output.

Substantial  reductions 

in  repository  requirements  can  be
achieved  only  if  all  of  the  major,  long-lived  heat  generating  radio-
nuclides  are  separated  and  transmuted.  But  a  separation  and
transmutation system would be far more expensive than direct dis-
posal.

How  much  more  expensive?  The  1996  National  Academy  report
concluded  that  the  excess  cost  would  be  ‘‘no  less  than  $50  billion
and easily could be over $100 billion for 62,000 tons of spent fuel.’’
This is in addition to the cost of Yucca Mountain, which would still
be needed for the disposal of high-level reprocessing waste.

Third,  what  government  subsidies  might  be  necessary?  Because
there  is  no  commercial  incentive  to  develop  a  system  that  is  more

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

expensive  for  waste  disposal,  the  U.S.  Government  would  have  to
build  and  operate  the  required  separations  and  transmutation  fa-
cilities  or  create  a  legal  framework  that  required  reactor  operators
to  reprocess  their  spent  fuel.  Based  on  the  Academy  estimate,
which I think is conservative, the extra cost would be $100 to $200
billion  to  separate  and  transmute  all  of  the  spent  fuel  that  has
been  or  will  be  discharged  by  current  reactors,  assuming  they  all
receive license extensions. These extra costs could be funded by tri-
pling  or  quintupling  the  nuclear  waste  fund  fee,  thereby  passing
the  extra  costs,  perhaps  $2  to  $3  billion  per  year  at  current  levels
of nuclear generation, along to the rate payer.

Fourth, how would reprocessing affect the economic future of nu-
clear  power?  I  think  nuclear  power  will  become  more  attractive  as
natural gas prices rise and as we attempt to reduce carbon dioxide
emissions. But nuclear will still have to compete with alternatives.
Traditional  reprocessing  would  add,  perhaps,  seven  percent  to  the
price of nuclear electricity. A separation and transmutation system
would add still more. This can only hurt nuclear power in the eco-
nomic competition with alternatives and could make the difference
between a revitalized industry and continued stagnation.

Advocates of reprocessing point to the difficulty in opening Yucca
Mountain  as  a  barrier  to  the  expansion  of  nuclear  power.  Reproc-
essing would not eliminate the need for Yucca Mountain, but a sep-
aration  and  transmutation  system  could  delay,  or  perhaps  even
eliminate, the need to expand Yucca Mountain or build a second re-
pository if nuclear expands. But I believe it would be far more dif-
ficult to gain public acceptance and licensing approval for the large
number of separation and transmutation faculties that would be re-
quired as compared with an expansion of Yucca Mountain. Reproc-
essing  has  been  fiercely  opposed  for  decades,  and  there  would  be
stiff  opposition  to  having  taxpayers,  or  ratepayers,  subsidize  this
enterprise at the rate of several billion dollars per year.

Thank you, Madame Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Fetter follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVE FETTER

Madam Chairwoman and Members of the Committee:
It is an honor to be invited here today to discuss the economic aspects of nuclear
fuel  reprocessing.  Together  with  colleagues  at  Harvard  University,  I  recently  com-
pleted an in-depth study of this issue,1 the results of which were published recently
in the journal Nuclear Technology.2 In the course of this study we conducted an ex-
haustive search for information on historical and projected costs of reprocessing and
other nuclear fuel-cycle services. We also examined previous studies of fuel-cycle ec-
onomics by the Nuclear Energy Agency of the Organization of Economic Cooperation
and Development (OECD), the governments of France and Japan, the U.S. National
Academy  of  Sciences,  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology,  and  others.  Our
conclusions are therefore well-grounded, and we have made our results transparent
by  documenting  all  of  our  assumptions  and  methods  and  by  making  spreadsheet
versions of our economic models available on the web, so that anyone can reproduce

1 Matthew  Bunn,  Steve  Fetter,  John  P.  Holdren,  and  Bob  van  der  Zwaan,  The  Economics  of
Reprocessing  vs.  Direct  Disposal  of  Spent  Nuclear  Fuel  (Cambridge,  MA:  Project  on  Managing
the  Atom,  Belfer  Center  for  Science  and  International  Affairs,  John  F.  Kennedy  School  of  Gov-
ernment,  Harvard  University,  December  2003),  available  at  http://www.puaf.umd.edu/Fetter/
2003-Bunn-repro.pdf.

2 Matthew  Bunn,  Steve  Fetter,  John  P.  Holdren,  and  Bob  van  der  Zwaan,  ‘‘The  Economics  of
Reprocessing  versus  Direct  Disposal  of  Spent  Nuclear  Fuel,’’  Nuclear  Technology,  Vol.  150,  pp.
209–230 (June 2005), available at http://www.puaf.umd.edu/Fetter/2005-NT-repro.pdf.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

and  check  our  results.  With  this  background,  let  me  turn  to  the  specific  questions
raised in your letter to me.
Under  what  conditions  would  reprocessing  be  economically  competitive
with the once-through fuel cycle?

In  the  once-through  fuel  cycle,  spent  nuclear  fuel  discharged  from  light-water  re-
actors is placed in a deep geological repository, such as the one being built at Yucca
Mountain  in  Nevada.  The  main  alternative,  as  practiced  in  France  and  planned  in
Japan,  is  to  reprocesses  spent  fuel  to  separate  the  unburned  plutonium  and  ura-
nium  from  other  radionuclides.  The  recovered  plutonium  is  used  to  produce  mixed-
oxide  (MOX)  fuel  for  existing  light-water  reactors,  and  the  high-level  radioactive
wastes  are  vitrified  and  stored  pending  disposal  in  a  deep  geologic  repository.  It  is
important  to  note  that  reprocessing  does  not  eliminate  high-level  wastes  or  negate
the need for a repository.

There  is  widespread  agreement,  in  the  United  States  and  abroad,  that  reprocess-
ing  currently  is  significantly  more  expensive  than  direct  disposal.3 This  is  because
reprocessing itself is an expensive process, and also because the MOX fuel produced
using  the  recovered  plutonium  is  more  expensive,  at  current  uranium  prices,  than
the  low-enriched  uranium  (LEU)  that  is  normally  used  to  fuel  reactors.  Last  year,
operators  of  U.S.  nuclear  reactors  on  average  paid  $33  per  kilogram  for  uranium.4
At this uranium price, reprocessing would have to cost less than $400 per kilogram
of  spent  fuel  in  order  to  be  competitive  with  direct  disposal.5 For  comparison,  we
estimate  that  reprocessing  in  a  new  U.S.  facility,  similar  to  those  in  the  United
Kingdom and France, would cost over $2,000 per kilogram.6 But even if reprocessing
costs  could  be  halved,  to  $1,000  per  kilogram  of  spent  fuel,  the  price  of  uranium
would have to rise to nearly $400 per kilogram in order to break even with the once-
through fuel cycle. It is extremely unlikely that uranium prices will rise to this level
in the next 50 years, even if worldwide use of nuclear power expands dramatically.
Substantial reductions in the cost of reprocessing would be needed even to achieve
the  $1,000  per  kilogram  mentioned  above.  The  Plutonium  Redox  Extraction
(PUREX)  process  used  in  existing  facilities  has  been  perfected  over  more  than  five
decades, and it seems unlikely that dramatic cost reductions could be achieved using
this  or  similar  aqueous  technologies,  such  as  UREX+.  Moreover,  increasingly  strin-
gent  environmental  and  safety  regulations  will  put  countervailing  pressures  on
costs.  The  experience  at  the  Rokkasho-Mura  reprocessing  facility  in  Japan,  which
has  seen  initial  capital  cost  estimates  triple  to  $18  billion,  should  serve  as  a  cau-
tionary tale for any country contemplating going down this road.

A range of alternative chemical separations processes have been proposed over the
years.  Recently,  attention  has  focused  on  electrometallurgical  processing  or
‘‘pyroprocessing.’’  A  1996  review  by  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  concluded,
however,  that  ‘‘it  is  by  no  means  certain  that  pyroprocessing  will  prove  more  eco-
nomical’’  than  PUREX.  Indeed,  recent  official  reviews  have  concluded  that  such
techniques are likely to be substantially more expensive than PUREX.7

It  is  conceivable,  of  course,  that  at  some  point  in  the  long-term  future  research
and development could lead to a fundamentally different approach that might have

3 See,  for  example,  J-M.  Charpin,  B.  Dessus,  and  R.  Pellat,  ‘‘Economic  Forecast  Study  of  the
Nuclear Power Option,’’ Office of the Prime Minister, Paris, France (July 2000); ‘‘Interim Report
Concerning the Nuclear Fuel Cycle Policy,’’ New Nuclear Policy-planning Council, Japan Atomic
Energy  Commission  (November  2004),  summary  available  at  http://cnic.jp/english/topics/policy/
chokei/longterminterim.html;  The  Future  of  Nuclear  Power  (MIT,  2003);  available  at  http://
web.mit.edu/nuclearpower.

4 Energy  Information  Administration,  Uranium  Marketing  Annual  Report,  2004  Edition,  29

April 2005; available at http://www.eia.doe.gov/cneaf/nuclear/umar/umar.html.

5 Computed with the spreadsheet available at http://www.puaf.umd.edu/Fetter/programs/COE-
LWR.xls, using reference assumptions that are favorable to reprocessing, including a 50 percent
reduction in waste-disposal costs.

6 Assumes  a  plant  throughput  of  800  tons  of  spent  fuel  per  year  for  30  years;  an  overnight
capital cost of $6 billion, repaid at interest rates appropriate for a regulated private entity with
a  guaranteed  rate  of  return;  annual  operating  costs  of  $560  million  per  year,  and  standard  as-
sumptions about construction time, taxes and insurance, and contingency, pre-operating, and de-
commissioning  costs.  For  a  government-financed  facility  with  very  low  cost  of  money,  the  cor-
responding  cost  would  be  $1,350/kg;  for  an  unregulated  private  venture,  the  cost  would  be
$3,100/kg. See Bunn, et al., ‘‘The Economics of Reprocessing versus Direct Disposal of Spent Nu-
clear Fuel,’’ p. 213.

7 Generation  IV  Roadmap:  Report  of  the  Fuel  Cycle  Crosscut  Group,  U.S.  Department  of  En-
ergy,  Office  of  Nuclear  Energy,  Washington,  DC  (March  2001);  ‘‘Accelerator-Driven  Systems
(ADS) and Fast Reactors (FR) in Advanced Nuclear Fuel Cycles: A Comparative Study,’’ OECD/
NEA  03109,  Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development,  Nuclear  Energy  Agency
(2002).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

lower  costs.  But  it  does  not  appear  likely  that  the  cost  of  reprocessing  will  be  re-
duced  to  levels  that  would  be  economically  competitive  with  direct  disposal  in  the
foreseeable future.
What  would  it  cost  to  manage  nuclear  waste  through  a  system  that  in-
cludes reprocessing, recycling, and transmutation?

Traditional  approaches  to  reprocessing  and  recycle,  as  practiced  in  France  and
planned  in  Japan,  do  not  significantly  reduce  the  amount  of  repository  space  re-
quired for the disposal of high-level radioactive wastes. The required repository area
is determined by the heat output of the wastes, not by their mass or volume. If the
plutonium recovered during reprocessing is recycled in existing light-water reactors,
the build-up of heat-generating minor actinides would result in a greater total heat
output  from  wastes  than  if  the  same  amount  of  electricity  was  generated  using  the
once-through fuel cycle.

Substantial  reductions  in  repository  requirements  can  be  achieved  only  if  all  of
the major long-lived heat-generating radionuclides are separated from the spent fuel
and recycled as fuel for fast-neutron reactors, which can transmute these long-lived
radionuclides.  This  separation-and-transmutation  system  would,  however,  almost
certainly  be  far  more  expensive  than  the  direct  disposal  of  spent  fuel,  per  unit  of
electricity generated. This is because reprocessing is expensive, because the costs of
fabricating  and  using  the  highly  radioactive  fuel  would  be  high,  and  because  the
fast-neutron  reactors  required  to  transmute  the  long-lived  radionuclides  will  cost
significantly more than light-water reactors.

How  much  more  expensive?  The  National  Academy  of  Sciences  examined  this
question  in  a  1996  report  and  concluded  that  the  excess  cost  for  a  separation-and-
transmutation system over once-through disposal would be ‘‘no less than $50 billion
and easily could be over $100 billion’’ for 62,000 tons of spent fuel (the current legis-
lated  limit  on  Yucca  Mountain).8 This  conclusion  remains  valid  today;  there  have
no  technical  breakthroughs  or  dramatic  cost  reductions  in  either  separation  or
transmutation  technologies.  Again,  the  separation-and-transmutation  system  would
generate high-level wastes requiring geologic disposal and therefore would not elimi-
nate the need for the Yucca Mountain repository.
What  government  subsidies  might  be  necessary  to  introduce  a  separation-
and-transmutation fuel cycle in the United States?

Today,  nuclear  reactor  operators  pay  a  small  fee—$1  per  megawatt-hour  of  elec-
tricity produced (about two percent of the wholesale price of nuclear-generated elec-
tricity)—for the geologic disposal of spent fuel. This fee, which is deposited into the
Nuclear  Waste  Trust  Fund,  is  considered  adequate  to  pay  for  the  full  costs  of  geo-
logic disposal.

As  noted  above,  a  separation-and-transmutation  system  would  be  considerably
more expensive than direct disposal. Because there is no commercial incentive to de-
velop  a  more  expensive  system  for  the  disposal  of  disposal  of  wastes,  the  U.S.  Gov-
ernment would, at a minimum, have to assume the entire costs of research and de-
velopment, which would likely total several billion dollars. Given the lack of market
incentives,  the  U.S.  Government  might  also  have  to  build  and  operate  the  required
separations  and  transmutation  facilities.  If  the  National  Academy’s  estimate  is  cor-
rect,  the  total  extra  cost  would  be  $50  to  $100  billion  to  process  the  62,000  tons  of
fuel  planned  for  Yucca  Mountain.  If  the  licenses  of  all  currently  operating  reactors
are extended, the amount of spent fuel and the total extra cost would be about twice
as  large—$100  to  $200  billion—and  would  be  still  larger  if  new  reactors  are  built.
These extra costs could be funded by tripling or quintupling the nuclear waste fund
fee,  thereby  passing  the  extra  costs—$1.5  to  $3  billion  per  year  at  current  levels  of
nuclear  generation—along  to  the  rate  payer.  Alternatively,  Congress  could  create  a
legal  framework  that  would  require  reactor  operators  to  reprocess  their  spent  fuel,
thereby artificially stimulating a market for private reprocessing and transmutation
facilities. The final result would be the same, however: nuclear-generated electricity
would become more expensive.
How  would  a  decision  to  reprocess  affect  the  economic  future  of  nuclear
power?

No  nuclear  reactors  have  been  ordered  in  the  United  States  since  1978,  and  no
reactor ordered after 1974 was completed. Although public concern about reactor ac-

8 U.S.  National  Research  Council,  Committee  on  Separations  Technology  and  Transmutation
Systems,  Nuclear  Wastes:  Technologies  for  Separations  and  Transmutation,  National  Academy
Press,  Washington  DC  (1996);  executive  summary  available  at  http://books.nap.edu/html/nu-
clear/summary.html.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

cidents  had  a  role  in  the  stagnation  of  nuclear  power,  it  was  driven  primarily  by
economic considerations: in particular, the high capital costs and high financial risk
of  nuclear  power  compared  to  alternative  methods  of  generating  electricity  or  man-
aging demand for electricity.

Increasing natural gas prices, and especially efforts to mitigate climate change by
reducing  emissions  of  carbon  dioxide  from  the  burning  of  fossil  fuels,  will  increase
the  attractiveness  of  nuclear  power.  But  nuclear  power  will  still  have  to  compete
with other alternatives, including wind power, biomass, and coal-fired power plants
with carbon sequestration. Traditional reprocessing would likely add three to seven
percent  to  the  wholesale  price  of  nuclear-generated  electricity,  depending  primarily
on  the  cost  of  reprocessing;9 a  full  separation-and-transmutation  system  would  add
still more. This can only hurt nuclear power in the economic competition with alter-
native  methods  of  generating  electricity,  and  could  make  the  difference  between  a
revitalized industry and continued stagnation and decline.

Advocates of reprocessing often point to the difficulty in licensing Yucca Mountain
as  a  barrier  to  the  expansion  of  nuclear  power.  As  noted  above,  reprocessing  would
not eliminate the need for Yucca Mountain. A separation-and-transmutation system
could,  however,  greatly  delay—and  might  even  eliminate—the  need  to  expand  the
capacity  of  Yucca  Mountain  or  to  build  a  second  repository.  (As  a  purely  technical
matter,  it  is  likely  that  the  Yucca  Mountain  repository  could  be  expanded  to  hold
all of the waste that will be discharged by current reactors, even with license exten-
sions.)  Advocates  of  a  separation-and-transmutation  system  implicitly  assume  that
it would be easier to gain public acceptance and licensing approval for a large num-
ber of complex and expensive separation and transmutation facilities than for an ex-
pansion of Yucca Mountain or a second repository. This assumption is likely wrong.
Reprocessing  of  spent  fuel  has  been  fiercely  opposed  by  a  substantial  section  of  the
interested  public  in  the  United  States  for  decades,  and  there  would  stiff  opposition
to having taxpayers or ratepayers subsidize this enterprise at the rate of several bil-
lion dollars per year.

BIOGRAPHY FOR STEVE FETTER

Steve Fetter is Dean of the School of Public Policy at the University of Maryland,
College  Park,  where  he  has  been  a  Professor  since  1988.  His  research  interests  in-
clude  nuclear  arms  control  and  nonproliferation,  nuclear  energy  and  health  effects
of radiation, and climate change and carbon-free energy supply.

Fetter  serves  on  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences’  Committee  on  International
Security  and  Arms  Control,  the  Department  of  Energy’s  Nuclear  Energy  Research
Advisory  Committee,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  WMD  Infrastructure
Experts  Team,  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  Sustainable  Energy  Institute  and  the
Arms  Control  Association,  the  Board  of  Governors  of  the  RAND  Graduate  School,
the Advisory Board of Human Rights Watch’s Arms Division, the University of Chi-
cago’s  Advisory  Committee  on  Nuclear  Non-Proliferation,  and  the  Board  of  Editors
of  Science  and  Global  Security.  He  is  a  fellow  of  the  American  Physical  Society,  a
recipient of its Joseph A. Burton Forum Award, and a member of its Panel on Public
Affairs.

Fetter served as special assistant to the Assistant Secretary of Defense for Inter-
national  Security  Policy  (1993–94),  and  as  an  American  Institute  of  Physics  fellow
(2004)  and  a  Council  on  Foreign  Relations  international  affairs  fellow  (1992)  at  the
State  Department.  He  has  been  a  visiting  fellow  at  Stanford’s  Center  for  Inter-
national  Security  and  Cooperation,  Harvard’s  Center  for  Science  and  International
Affairs, MIT’s Plasma Fusion Center, and Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory.
He  has  served  as  Vice  Chairman  of  the  Federation  of  American  Scientists,  and  as
Associate Director of the Joint Global Change Research Institute.

Fetter received a Ph.D. in energy and resources from the University of California,

Berkeley, in 1985 and a S.B. in physics from MIT in 1981.

His  articles  have  appeared  in  Science,  Nature,  Scientific  American,  International
Security,  Science  and  Global  Security,  Nuclear  Technology,  Bulletin  of  the  Atomic
Scientists,  and  Arms  Control  Today.  He  has  contributed  chapters  to  nearly  two
dozen  edited  volumes,  is  author  or  co-author  of  several  books  and  monographs,  in-
cluding  Toward  a  Comprehensive  Test  Ban,  The  Future  of  U.S.  Nuclear  Weapons
Policy, The Nuclear Turning Point, Monitoring Nuclear Weapons and Nuclear Explo-

9 Assuming  reprocessing  costs  of  $1,000  to  $2,000  per  kilogram  of  spent  fuel,  uranium  at  $50
per  kilogram,  and  other  costs  that  are  generally  favorable  to  reprocessing,  the  additional  cost
of reprocessing and recycle is $1.3 to $3.5 per megawatt-hour; the assumed wholesale electricity
price is $50/MWh for direct disposal.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

sive Materials, Effects of Nuclear Earth-Penetrator and Other Weapons, and Climate
Change and the Transformation of World Energy Supply.

29

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much.
And now, Mr. Fertel, you are recognized for five minutes.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  MARVIN  S.  FERTEL,  SENIOR  VICE  PRESI-
DENT  AND  CHIEF  NUCLEAR  OFFICER,  THE  NUCLEAR  EN-
ERGY INSTITUTE
Mr.  FERTEL.  Thank  you.  Madame  Chairman,  Ranking  Member
Honda,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  on  behalf  of  the  Nuclear
Energy  Institute,  more  than  250  members,  I  thank  you  for  the  op-
portunity  to  testify  today  on  the  economic  aspects  of  nuclear  fuel
reprocessing.  I  would  also  like  to  thank  this  subcommittee  for  its
leadership  in  addressing  other  issues  important  to  the  nuclear  in-
dustry,  like  support  for  university  programs  and  workforce  activi-
ties. Thank you very much.

With  specific  regard  to  reprocessing,  I  would  like  to  emphasize

the following key points to start.

First,  reprocessing  could  play  an  important  role  in  the  future  of
nuclear  energy  by  providing  needed  nuclear  fuel  supplies,  but  it
must be integrated into the overall nuclear fuel cycle.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

Second, current reprocessing technology offers limited short-term
benefits to use nuclear fuel disposal but has the future potential to
provide benefits that will make disposal more efficient and cost ef-
fective. Under all circumstances, however, we will still need a deep
geologic  repository  to  dispose  of  the  residual  waste  and  Yucca
Mountain will still be necessary.

Third,  potentially,  reprocessing  in  the  United  States  and  other
reliable nations could further non-proliferation goals, but the addi-
tional  costs  associated  with  Federal  Government  reprocessing  to
achieve  those  goals  should  not  be  borne  by  the  electricity  cus-
tomers.

And  fourth,  and  important  to  this  subcommittee,  I  think,  the
Federal  Government  should  put  in  place  firm,  long-range  policies
that  support  reprocessing  and  pursue  the  research,  development,
and  demonstration  of  new  improved  proliferation-resistant  reproc-
essing technologies.

In  preparing  for  this  hearing,  the  Committee  asked  me  to  ad-
dress  three  questions.  First,  is  there  a  consensus  position  among
the  nuclear  plant  owning  utilities  regarding  whether  the  United
States  should  introduce  reprocessing  into  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle
within the next five to 10 years?

Within  the  U.S.  nuclear  industry,  a  dialogue  on  the  benefits  of
reprocessing is really just beginning. However, what seems clear at
this  time  is  that  the  long-term  benefits  to  fuel  supply  and  waste
management of improved recycling technologies warrants a system-
atic  research  and  development  program.  And  that  R&D  program
should certainly be well-developed and producing results within the
next  five  to  10  years.  The  actual  deployment  of  new  reprocessing
facilities in this country would take more than a decade to license,
construct,  and  commission  after  the  R&D  was  completed  and  then
appropriate technologies were selected.

The  decision  of  when  to  actually  deploy  recycling  technology
should  be  based  upon  a  combination  of  considerations,  including
the growth of nuclear energy in this country, the market economics
of the fuel supply system, government decisions regarding the man-
agement  and  ultimate  disposal  of  used  nuclear  fuel,  and  non-pro-
liferation  strategies,  which  could  involve  the  taking  of  used  fuel
from outside the United States and/or the provision of mixed oxide
fuel to users outside the United States.

The  second  question  asked  by  the  Committee  related  to  what
government investment might be necessary to introduce a more ad-
vanced nuclear fuel cycle in the United States.

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  from  a  commercial  industry  perspective,
the  dialogue  and  assessments  of  reprocessing,  transmutation,  and
the  use  of  fast  reactors  is  at  an  early  stage,  and  we  have  not  per-
formed  any  economic  evaluations  of  the  alternatives  and  have  just
begun to study the experience of other countries, like, France, Eng-
land, and Japan.

However,  in  the  countries  that  have  reprocessing,  the  decision
was  based  on  government  policy.  And  the  resources  committed  to
develop,  deploy,  and  operate  the  technology  were  all  government
funded. Assuming similar policy decisions in the United States and
the  actual  deployment  of  new  recycling  technology,  the  need  for
federal  investment,  if  any,  would  be  determined  by  the  difference

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

between  the  cost  of  producing  reactor  fuel  versus  the  market  price
for  fuel  at  that  time.  While  no  others  are  willing  to  provide  the
Committee  with  such  estimates,  the  industry  has  not  performed
the  evaluations  necessary  to  provide  such  estimates  with  any  de-
gree of confidence.

The  last  question  asked  was  how  would  the  United  States  move

to reprocessing impact utilities’ long-term business planning.

First,  it  is  important  to  recognize  that  decision  on  reprocessing
impact  more  than  the  long-term  business  planning  for  utilities.
Such  decisions  would  have  direct  and  potentially  profound,  though
not  necessarily  negative,  impacts  on  the  fuel  supply  sector,  includ-
ing  uranium  producers,  converters,  enrichers,  and  fabricators.  For
both  utilities  and  fuel  suppliers,  certainty  in  government  policy,
certainty  in  performance  of  the  technology  and  in  its  deployment
and economics will be the factors that would impact long-term busi-
ness planning the most.

As  currently  demonstrated  by  Duke  Power,  the  use  of  mixed
oxide fuel is clearly an acceptable fuel supply option, therefore, ac-
commodating  fuel  produced  after  reprocessing  is  neither  a  major
technical  nor  regulatory  issue  that  couldn’t  be  accommodated  into
long-term  planning.  The  greater  planning  challenges  relate  to  con-
sistent, long-term, stable government policy, high reliability of per-
formance  of  stability—of  facilities  and  stability  in  the  price  of  that
fuel produced.

In closing, President Bush’s energy plan in 2001 called for devel-
opment of, and I will quote, ‘‘reprocessing and fuel treatment tech-
nologies  that  are  cleaner,  more  efficient,  less  waste  intensive,  and
more proliferation-resistant.’’ The nuclear energy industry supports
that  goal.  Now  40  years  later  and  with  the  growing  recognition  of
the need for more nuclear plants in this country and worldwide, it
is even more imperative that our nation move forward to complete
the  research  on  reprocessing  technology  and  to  define  the  govern-
ment policies affecting the use of that technology.

We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee,  others  in  Con-

gress, and the Administration towards achieving those goals.

Thank you for the opportunity to appear here today, and I would

be pleased to answer any questions you may have.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Fertel follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARVIN S. FERTEL

The  Nuclear  Energy  Institute  (NEI)  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  provide  this
testimony  for  the  record  on  reprocessing  used  fuel  from  commercial  nuclear  power
plants.  The  nuclear  energy  industry  recognizes  that  safe,  secure  and  efficient  man-
agement of the Nation’s used nuclear fuel is critical to ensuring nuclear energy’s fu-
ture contribution to our nation’s energy supply.

NEI is responsible for developing policy for the U.S. nuclear energy industry. Our
organization’s  250  member  companies  represent  a  broad  spectrum  of  interests,  in-
cluding  every  U.S.  energy  company  that  operates  a  nuclear  power  plant.  NEI’s
membership  also  includes  nuclear  fuel  cycle  companies,  suppliers,  engineering  and
consulting  firms,  national  research  laboratories,  manufacturers  of  radiopharma-
ceuticals, universities, labor unions and law firms.

America’s  nuclear  power  plants  are  the  most  efficient  and  reliable  in  the  world.
Nuclear energy is the largest source of emission-free electricity in the United States
and our nation’s second largest source of electricity after coal. Nuclear power plants
in 31 states provide electricity for one of every five U.S. homes and businesses. More

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

than eight out of 10 Americans believe nuclear energy should play an important role
in the country’s energy future.1

Given  these  facts  and  the  strategic  importance  of  nuclear  energy  to  our  nation’s
energy security and economic growth, NEI encourages Congress to maintain policies
that  ensure  continued  operation  of  our  nation’s  nuclear  plants,  and  to  provide  the
impetus  required  to  expand  emission-free  nuclear  energy  as  a  vital  part  of  our  na-
tion’s diverse energy mix.

This testimony makes four important points:

• Reprocessing  could  play  an  important  role  in  the  future  of  nuclear  energy  by
providing  needed  nuclear  fuel  supplies,  but  it  must  be  part  of  an  economic
nuclear fuel cycle;
• Current reprocessing technology offers limited assistance to used nuclear fuel
disposal,  but  has  the  future  potential  to  provide  benefits  that  will  make  dis-
posal more efficient and cost effective;
• Potentially, reprocessing in the United States and other reliable nations could
further  non-proliferation  goals,  but  the  additional  costs  associated  with  re-
processing  to  achieve  these  goals  should  not  be  borne  by  the  electricity  con-
sumer; and
• The  Federal  Government  should  put  in  place  firm,  long-range  policies  that
support  reprocessing  and  pursue  the  research,  development  and  demonstra-
tion of new, improved, proliferation-resistant reprocessing technologies.

INDUSTRY CONSENSUS

The  fuel  used  by  nuclear  power  plants  in  the  United  States  comes  from  newly
mined  uranium  or  uranium  that  has  been  derived  from  nuclear  weapons  from  the
former  Soviet  Union  and  blended  down  to  a  much  lower  enrichment  level  that  is
appropriate for commercial reactors. The cost of nuclear fuel is an important compo-
nent and it accounts for 25 percent of the production cost of electricity from nuclear
plants.  Uranium  must  be  processed  through  milling,  conversion,  enrichment,  and
fabrication to be made into nuclear fuel usable in power reactors.

The  safe  and  efficient  management  of  used  nuclear  fuel  rods  is  a  critical  compo-
nent of the nuclear energy industry’s exemplary record of safety and environmental
stewardship.  The  Federal  Government  is  developing  a  specially  designed,  under-
ground  repository  at  Yucca  Mountain,  Nev.,  to  manage  used  fuel  from  our  nation’s
commercial reactors and defense sites. The Yucca Mountain program has made sig-
nificant progress over the past few years and is expected to move into the licensing
phase in the near future.

The consensus in the nuclear energy industry is that nuclear fuel costs should be
kept  as  low  as  possible,  consistent  with  the  need  for  a  competitive  long-term  fuel
supply. Doing so may require reprocessing nuclear fuel to provide fuel supplies well
into the future, but that period is difficult to predict. There are numerous unknown
factors,  such  as  future  demand  and  cost  of  uranium,  the  cost  of  reprocessing  and
the reprocessing technology to be used.

The  re-emergence  of  nuclear  energy  in  the  United  States,  together  with  rapidly
expanding nuclear energy sectors in nations such as China and India, will place ad-
ditional  pressure  on  uranium  supplies  and  increase  uranium  prices  still  further.
This could increase the attractiveness of reprocessing, but would do so only at prices
that  are  well  above  today’s  market.  Reprocessing  also  would  increase  access  to  fuel
supplies  by  making  recycled  fuel  available  and  thereby  reduce  the  volume  of  ura-
nium imported by the United States.

In a ‘‘closed’’ fuel cycle, fuel from reprocessing would be another avenue of supply
for the nuclear fuel market. Utilities would evaluate supplies from reprocessed fuel
and  the  use  of  mixed-oxide  fuel  in  the  same  way  they  consider  the  variety  of  sup-
pliers  of  new  fuel  today.  These  factors  include  cost,  reliability  and  diversity  of  sup-
ply; quality of fuel; and the effect of the fuel on reactor core design. Long-term busi-
ness planning would be affected in terms of supplier and fuel design, but only if the
overall costs are equal to or lower than fuel from current suppliers.

Developing  new  reprocessing  technologies  for  used  nuclear  fuel  in  the  United
States  also  offers  the  long-term  potential  for  aiding  used  nuclear  fuel  disposal  and
furthering global non-proliferation goals. At the moment, the United States does not

1 Bisconti  Research  Inc./NOP  World,  May  2005,  Survey  of  1,000  U.S.  adults  with  a  margin  of
errors  at  +/-  three  percentage  points.  Question:  ‘‘How  important  do  you  think  nuclear  energy
will be in meeting this nation’s electricity in the years ahead? Do you think nuclear energy will
be very important, somewhat important, not too important, or not important at all?’’ Responses:
83 percent important, 13 percent not important, four percent don’t know.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

have the policies, the technologies nor the infrastructure in place to support reproc-
essing.

In 2001, President Bush’s energy plan called for development of ‘‘. . .reprocessing
and fuel treatment technologies that are cleaner, more efficient, less waste intensive
and  more  proliferation  resistant.’’ 2 The  nuclear  energy  industry  supports  this  goal.
U.S. leadership in nuclear energy research and development is vital to our national
interests and will result in a safer world by safeguarding nuclear weapons material
and technologies.
REPROCESSING  IS  A  WORTHY  FUTURE  GOAL,  BUT  HAS  CHALLENGES

TO OVERCOME

Of  the  33  nations  that  use  nuclear  power,  12  reprocess  used  nuclear  fuel  for  a
variety of reasons. France, Japan and the United Kingdom use Purex technology for
their  reprocessing  programs,  which  recycle  used  reactor  fuel  safely  and  securely.
Japan  will  continue  to  use  reprocessing  facilities  in  France  and  Britain  until  its
Rokkasho Reprocessing Plant opens in the near future at a reported cost of $18 bil-
lion.  It  is  worth  noting  that  all  these  facilities  were  paid  for  through  some  form  of
government funding.

Future  reprocessing  of  used  nuclear  fuel  is  a  worthy  goal,  but  it  must  overcome
several  challenges  before  it  can  be  used  in  the  United  States.  Currently,  the  cost
of nuclear fuel from reprocessing is more expensive than new production of fuel. Any
reprocessing also requires massive and expensive facilities, similar to large chemical
plants, that the public or private sector must develop and license with the U.S. Nu-
clear  Regulatory  Commission.  In  the  end,  the  use  of  reprocessing  would  not  lessen
the  need  for  a  national  repository,  but  it  would  reduce  the  volume  of  material  to
be managed at the facility. Other byproducts, radioactive and non-radioactive, from
the  reprocessing  plant  also  must  be  managed.  In  addition,  reprocessing  poses  secu-
rity considerations that governments worldwide must address.

Current  reprocessing  technology  makes  it  possible  to  recycle  and  reuse  uranium
and plutonium from commercial nuclear fuel. This is done by separating radioactive
waste from uranium and plutonium that still contain energy. The reusable fuel can
be returned to reactors, but only after significant additional processing and fuel fab-
rication in specially designed and licensed facilities. In addition, the same long-lived
radioactive  waste  products  remain  and  ultimately  require  disposal.  With  current
technology, the recycled material has a limited life time and will eventually require
disposal. Countries that currently reprocess nuclear fuel also are working to develop
geologic repositories.

Until  the  mid-1970s,  the  U.S.  Government  encouraged  reprocessing  using  the
Purex process, which chemically separates plutonium from uranium in the fuel rods.
This process was first used to produce plutonium for the nuclear weapons program.
Later, commercial reprocessing facilities were established in Barnwell, S.C.; Morris,
Ill.;  and  West  Valley,  N.Y.  President  Gerald  Ford  suggested  suspending  the  use  of
reprocessing  in  1976  in  view  of  nonproliferation  concerns  relating  to  plutonium.
President  Jimmy  Carter  acted  on  the  ban  the  following  year.  President  Ronald
Reagan  lifted  the  ban  on  reprocessing  in  the  1980s,  but  economic  factors  prevented
any new investment in the technology. The ban was reinstated under President Bill
Clinton and remains in effect today.

Early commercial reprocessing ventures in the United States were not successful.
The  West  Valley  facility  operated  for  a  short  period  of  time  in  the  late  1960s  and
early  1970s,  then  was  shut  down  because  of  rising  costs  and  regulatory  uncertain-
ties. It took a federal program and funding to clean up the facility. The Morris facil-
ity  never  operated  because  of  technical  difficulties  and  serves  today  as  a  used  nu-
clear fuel storage facility. The Barnwell facility was not completed because of rising
costs, falling uranium demand in that era and regulatory uncertainty.

The difficulties encountered by these early efforts need to be addressed in any re-
processing program going forward. Foremost among these is the need for a firm, un-
changing national policy that supports development of reprocessing and a set of reg-
ulatory standards and implementing guidelines tailored to reprocessing plants.
REPROCESSING  CAN  REDUCE  WASTE  VOLUME,  BUT  YUCCA  MOUN-

TAIN IS STILL NEEDED

No  technology  can  destroy  radioactivity  from  used  nuclear  fuel  and  other  high-
level  radioactive  wastes,  nor  is  there  a  proven  means  to  shorten  the  time  that  the
material  is  radioactive.  Reprocessing  can  only  separate  the  various  radionuclides
and  change  their  chemical  and  physical  form.  Scientists  are  studying  technologies,

2 ‘‘National  Energy  Policy—Report  of  the  National  Energy  Policy  Development  Group,’’  May

2001.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

such  as  accelerator-  and  reactor-based  transmutation,  that  may  eventually  reduce
the radioactivity in used nuclear fuel. However, none of these could eliminate radio-
activity  altogether.  Any  program  involving  reprocessing,  transmutation  or  related
technologies must be undertaken in conjunction with a federal repository.

Disposal capacity for used nuclear fuel should not be a deterrent to future expan-
sion of nuclear energy. Depending on future industry expansion, additional used nu-
clear fuel disposal capacity will be needed, but it is impossible at this time to know
when and how much capacity will be needed. Federal policies must consider all con-
tingencies and remain flexible.

The  Nuclear  Waste  Policy  Act  limits  Yucca  Mountain’s  capacity  to  70,000  metric
tons  (MT)  of  used  nuclear  fuel  or  the  high-level  radioactive  waste  derived  from
70,000  MT  of  used  nuclear  fuel.  Current  plans  call  for  63,000  MT  of  commercial
used fuel and 7,000 MT of defense used nuclear fuel or the high-level waste derived
from  used  fuel.  The  Department  of  Energy  estimates  that  there  will  be  at  least
70,000 MT at various sites throughout the United States when the Yucca Mountain
repository opens.

Congress  established  the  capacity  limitation  on  Yucca  Mountain  artificially,  not
by technical analysis. If the capacity of Yucca Mountain were to be increased to its
technical limit, it still might not be enough to preclude the need for a second reposi-
tory  given  the  expected  expansion  of  nuclear  energy.  However,  reprocessing  could
reduce  the  volume  of  waste  and  possibly  make  additional  repositories  unnecessary.
In  addition,  current  reprocessing  of  used  fuel  from  commercial  nuclear  power
plants  could  reduce  the  number  of  used  fuel  containers  needed  to  store,  transport
and dispose used nuclear fuel, which would lower the cost of DOE’s waste manage-
ment  program.  This  needs  to  be  explored  further  as  a  possible  benefit  from  reproc-
essing.
REPROCESSING  MUST  OVERCOME  COST,  BUT  NOT  AT  THE  EXPENSE

OF NUCLEAR ENERGY

The  debate  over  reprocessing  of  used  nuclear  fuel  in  the  United  States  is  long-
standing. Reprocessed fuel is more expensive than new uranium oxide fuel. In addi-
tion,  reprocessing  requires  new  capital-intensive  facilities  and  other  infrastructure
that must be licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

The use of reprocessing would require significant investment. New fuel fabrication
and enrichment facilities also will be needed. Federal agencies, such as the Nuclear
Regulatory  Commission,  must  license  and  provide  independent  government  over-
sight of these new facilities. All of this will take many years to accomplish.

If  the  Federal  Government  determines  that  used  nuclear  fuel  should  be  reproc-
essed,  nuclear  energy  consumers  should  not  bear  the  additional  costs  of  reprocess-
ing.  Unlike  other  energy  sources,  the  nuclear  power  sector  covers  the  costs  of  its
‘‘externalities,’’  including  nuclear  power  plant  decommissioning  and  used  nuclear
fuel disposal. Under the Nuclear Waste Policy Act, the Federal Government collects
fees  (one-tenth  of  a  cent  per  kilowatt-hour  from  consumers  of  electricity  generated
at  nuclear  power  plants)  that  are  intended  to  pay  for  Yucca  Mountain  and  associ-
ated  programs.  No  other  energy  source  covers  its  waste  management  costs  in  this
manner.  Assessing  an  additional  fee  for  reprocessing  would  unnecessarily  raise  the
cost  of  nuclear-generated  electricity  and  create  an  inequitable  situation  that  would
harm the competitiveness of the U.S. energy sector.
NON-PROLIFERATION  GOALS  CAN  BE  ADVANCED  BY  REPROCESSING

DEVELOPMENT IN THE UNITED STATES

Non-proliferation is the other principle challenge facing reprocessing, because cur-
rent reprocessing technology yields separated plutonium. In sophisticated hands and
with the right expertise and facilities, plutonium recovered from commercial reactor
fuel can be made into a crude nuclear weapon. Opposition to the reprocessing initia-
tives  in  North  Korea  is  based  on  concerns  over  the  production  of  plutonium  for  nu-
clear weapons. However, after being used in mixed oxide reactor fuel (MOX), pluto-
nium  is  less  suitable  for  weapons  applications.  The  United  States  recently  began
testing  weapons-grade  plutonium  fabricated  into  MOX  fuel  as  a  means  of  elimi-
nating plutonium.

The United States should pursue proliferation-resistant reprocessing technologies.
By  developing  reprocessing  in  the  United  States  and  other  reliable  nations,  we  can
better  assure  a  fuel  supply  for  the  global  nuclear  energy  sector  and  limit  the  risks
associated with reprocessing.

DOE is investigating several new technologies as part of its Advanced Fuel Cycle
Initiative.  These  include  the  Urex  process,  which  recovers  the  uranium  for  disposal
as  low-level  radioactive  waste.  Another  technology  now  undergoing  research  is
pyroprocessing,  which  retains  the  uranium  and  plutonium  for  use  in  a  fast  reactor.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

The  industry  fully  supports  the  development  of  advanced  fuel  cycles  to  improve
the efficiency of nuclear power facilities. Further research in reprocessing and other
technologies  could  yield  important  benefits.  It  is  important  that  the  government
begin laying the foundation now for future nuclear fuel supply and waste treatment
processes, as these take many years to develop and implement. However, DOE and
other  federal  agencies  should  carry  out  this  research  in  addition  to  existing  waste
management programs.
CONCLUSIONS AND RECOMMENDATIONS

Reprocessing  used  nuclear  fuel  has  the  potential  to  provide  numerous  benefits,
but  also  poses  multiple  challenges.  The  implications  of  resuming  reprocessing  the
United  States  must  be  fully  understood  before  embarking  on  any  large-scale  initia-
tive. The industry fully supports the Administration’s goal of developing nuclear fuel
that  is  yet  safer,  more  efficient  and  more  proliferation-resistant.  The  Federal  Gov-
ernment  is  well-served  by  the  development  of  fuel  technologies  that  support  these
objectives, including technologies pursued as part of the Advanced Fuel Cycle Initia-
tive. However, the government must develop these technologies parallel with the de-
velopment of Yucca Mountain and in a manner that will make the Yucca Mountain
repository more efficient. Reprocessing could help avoid or delay the need for a sec-
ond repository.

Development of these technologies in the United States and other reliable nations
will make the world safer. However, despite its advantages, reprocessing has several
key  challenges  that  must  be  overcome,  including  cost  and  non-proliferation  issues.
Even with significant increases in uranium prices and the rising costs of on-site fuel
storage,  reprocessed  fuel  is  still  more  expensive  than  nuclear  fuel  from  current
sources. Reprocessing will require investment in new infrastructure, but this invest-
ment  should  not  be  borne  by  a  tax  on  consumers  of  nuclear  energy.  Consideration
of  reprocessing  technologies  also  must  take  into  account  the  proliferation  risks  of
separated plutonium.

Congress must ensure that federal agencies are conducting research and develop-
ment programs in areas such as reprocessing that help prepare for our nation’s en-
ergy  future.  The  government  must  do  all  it  can  to  ensure  that  Americans  continue
to have access to affordable and environmentally friendly sources of electricity. Nu-
clear energy plays an important role in providing this power reliably, efficiently and
without producing greenhouse gases.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MARVIN S. FERTEL

Marvin  S.  Fertel  is  Senior  Vice  President  and  Chief  Nuclear  Officer  at  the  Nu-
clear  Energy  Institute  (NEI),  the  industry  organization  responsible  for  establishing
unified nuclear industry policy on matters affecting the nuclear energy industry.

He  has  35  years  of  experience  consulting  to  electric  utilities  on  issues  related  to

designing, siting, licensing and management of both fossil and nuclear plants.

He has worked in executive positions with organizations such as Ebasco, Manage-
ment Analysis Company, and Tenera. In November 1990 he joined the U.S. Council
for  Energy  Awareness  as  Vice  President,  Technical  Programs.  With  the  formation
of  NEI  in  1994,  he  became  NEI’s  Vice  President  of  Nuclear  Economics  and  Fuel
Supply. He assumed his current position as head of the Nuclear Generation Division
at NEI in March 2003.

Currently,  Mr.  Fertel  is  responsible  for  leading  NEI’s  programs  related  to  ensur-
ing an effective and safety-focused regulatory process. He is responsible for directing
industry-wide  efforts  to  ensure  adequate  security  is  provided  at  nuclear  power
plants and for addressing generic technical issues related to commercial nuclear fa-
cilities.  The  Nuclear  Generation  Division  is  responsible  for  NEI’s  activities  related
to  improving  the  economic  performance  at  existing  facilities  through  industry-wide
benchmarking  activities;  the  promotion  of  policies  to  achieve  a  long-term  reliable
and  economic  supply  of  nuclear  fuel;  and  for  policy  initiative  and  industry  pro-
grammatic  activities  that  support  the  development  of  new  commercial  nuclear
projects.  Mr.  Fertel  is  also  responsible  for  overseeing  NEI’s  activities  related  to  the
management of used nuclear fuel and other waste products, including achieving suc-
cess in the U.S. Government’s program for the storage and ultimate disposal of used
nuclear fuel.

Mr.  Fertel  holds  a  Bachelor  of  Science  degree  in  civil  engineering  from  North-
eastern University, Boston; a Master of Science in Civil Engineering from the Poly-
technic  Institute  of  Technology,  New  York;  and  has  participated  in  the  doctorate  of
public administration program at New York University.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

DISCUSSION

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much, Mr. Fertel.
We  will  now  start  our  questioning,  and  I  will  yield  myself  five

minutes.

Dr.  Lester,  50  years  is  a  long  time.  If  I  had  to  be  able  to  know
whether you were correct in saying we should postpone any reproc-
essing  for  50  years,  I  won’t  be  around  to  know  if  you  were  correct
or not, which would be very disappointing. Fifty years ago, a gallon
of gasoline cost less than a dime, and so I wonder, does your anal-
ysis assume that there are no changes in the market for electricity
in the next 50 years, like the impact of global warming and the ef-
fect on the price of electricity produced from fossil fuels?

Dr.  LESTER.  Madame  Chairman,  our  analysis  did  try  to  address
a  series  of  changes  that  may  take  place  over  that  time  frame  that
you  mentioned.  One  of  the  big  questions,  obviously,  over  that  time
frame, is what is likely to happen to the demand for uranium, and
how  is  that  affected  by  the  future  expansion  of  nuclear  power.  On
that issue, we assumed a three-fold increase, approximately, in the
installed  capacity  of  nuclear  power  plants,  both  in  the  United
States and globally. And even on that basis, and of course what we
are talking about is something like a 300 gigawatt, or 300 large nu-
clear  power  plants,  operating  by  mid-century.  Even  on  that  basis,
our  conclusion  was  that  the  demand  for  uranium  would  not  drive
the  price  of  uranium  to  the  level  at  which  the  introduction  of  re-
processing and mixed oxides recycle could be or would be economi-
cally warranted.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. But—and this would be for Dr. Jones, too.
Is  the  potential  cost  of  carbon  capture  and  disposal  for  fossil-gen-
erated electricity comparable on a per-kilowatt-hour basis with the
waste disposal costs of nuclear energy?

Dr.  LESTER.  Well,  we  certainly—we  did  make,  or  have  tried  to
make,  a  consistent  comparison  of  fossil  and  nuclear  costs,  in  par-
ticular  coal-fired  generation  with  nuclear  costs.  And  we  estimated
that  with  plausible,  although  optimistic,  reductions  in  nuclear
power  plant  capital  costs,  combined  with  the  introduction  of  some
form of penalty or tax on carbon emissions——

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  But  was  that  taken  into  account?  And
what  we  are  hearing  now  is,  you  know,  the  impact  of  the  climate
change and how we are going to have to deal a lot more with those
fossil fuels and the increase in the pollution in our air quality. And
that takes into account that we will probably be doing more in that
area?

Dr. LESTER. Yes.
Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Do  more  regulation  or  restrictions  on——
Dr. LESTER. I think we would anticipate that, yes.
Dr. JONES. Madame Chairman?
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Yes, Dr. Jones?
Dr.  JONES.  We  estimated  the  cost  of  coal-fired  generation  with
carbon  sequestration  would  rise  to  the  range  of  $83  to  $91  per
megawatt  hour  from  the  level  of  $33  to  $41,  and  gas-fired  genera-
tion costs to rise to $58 to $68 range from current $35 to $45.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Okay.  Is—what  about  the  market  price
for  electricity?  Would  that  include  climate  change  and  carbon
taxes?

Dr.  JONES.  Only  if  those  things  are  priced,  and  the  government

is in a position to price that.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Okay.  Then,  Dr.  Fetter,  what  would  the
economic  cost  of  delaying  a  decision  on  selection  of  a  reprocessing
technology—what would be the economic cost of delaying that deci-
sion?

Dr.  FETTER.  I  don’t  think  there  would  be  any  economic  cost  at

all of a delay to reprocess—a delay in the decision to reprocess.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Is  there  a  particular  threshold,  for  exam-
ple,  at  the  point  where  a  second  disposal  site  would  be  necessary?
Would that change the cost?

Dr.  FETTER.  It—based  on  the  cost  of  Yucca  Mountain,  which  is
funded  by  a  small  fee  added  to  the  price  of  nuclear  electricity,  nu-
clear-generated  electricity,  I  would  think  that  one  could  easily  ex-
pand the Yucca Mountain site, up to doubling its capacity, or open
a  new  facility  for  about  the  same  fee,  for  about  the  $1  per  mega-
watt hour.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Of  course,  we  haven’t  even  been  able  to

get this one open yet, so that is a small problem.

But thank you. My time has expired.
Mr. Honda.
Mr.  HONDA.  The  cost  of  reprocessing  has  been  something  that
has been a reminder of whether it is going to be economical or not,
and I have heard some comments about the economy—the econom-
ics  of  it  would  have  to  be  plausible.  I  guess  I  have  been  hearing
that  the  extent  of  two  or  three  or  four  decades  out.  Was  that  cor-
rect information that I heard? Did I hear it correctly?

Dr.  LESTER.  I  think  my  comment  was  that  over  the  next  two  or
three  or  four  decades,  it  would  be  hard  to  imagine  that  it  would
be economic.

Mr.  HONDA.  And  could  you  help  me  to  understand  why  that
would  be?  Is  it  a  lack  of  our  funding  more  research  and  develop-
ment or what are the dynamics in that?

Dr.  LESTER.  The  question  of  whether  it  is  economical  or  not
hinges  on,  obviously,  the  cost  that  one  would  have  to  pay  to  do  it,
on the one side——
Mr. HONDA. Yeah.
Dr.  LESTER.—and  on  the  other  side,  the  amount  of  money  that
one would save by not having to buy as much uranium, not having
to  buy  as  much  uranium-enrichment  services,  and  potentially  also
having  to  pay  less  to  dispose  of  the  reprocessed  high-level  waste
that  one  would  be  producing  instead  of  disposing  directly  of  the
spent fuel. So the issue of whether it is economical or not depends
on  balancing  those  extra  costs  with  the  savings,  and  it  is  on  that
basis  that  I  concluded  that  over  the  next  three  or  four  decades,
even  with  real  investment  in  reprocessing  research  and  develop-
ment, which I do certainly support, it would be very unlikely to see
a  situation  in  which  the  costs  would  be  outweighed  by  those  eco-
nomic benefits.

Mr.  HONDA.  And  that  is  taken  in  the  context  of  the  nuclear
power  arena.  If  you  look  at  that  in  the  context  of  other  fuels,  in-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

creasing  fuels  in  other  areas,  is  there  impact  there?  I  mean,  the
reason  why  the  Administration  is  looking  at  reprocessing  and
building  more  plants,  I  suspect,  is  because  it  is  an  opportune  time
to  do  that,  given  the  picture  of  the  cost  of  petroleum,  the  cost  of
crude oil and things like that. What are the dynamics there?

Dr.  LESTER.  Well,  as  you  know,  the  electricity  industry  in  this
country  is  becoming  more  and  more  competitive,  at  least  in  some
parts  of  the  country.  And  therefore,  the  situation  of  nuclear  power
in  those  markets  depends  upon  its  ability  to  compete  on  a  price
basis  with  the  alternatives.  At  present,  its  ability  to  compete  with
coal,  which  is  the  main  alternative  today  to  nuclear  for  baseload
generation,  its  ability  to  compete  is,  at  best,  marginal.  And  there-
fore,  any  action  that  we  take  that  would  result  in  an  increase  in
the generation cost of nuclear electricity would make it less able to
compete.  And  so  I  think  we  need  to  be  very  careful  before  advo-
cating a course of action that would result in a significant increase
in  the  nuclear  generation  cost.  Now  it  is  likely,  if  we  do  introduce
a  cap-and-trade  scheme  for  dealing  with  carbon  emissions  or  a  tax
or  whatever  we  may  choose  to  do  as  a  nation,  it  is  likely  that  the
cost  of  coal-fired  generation  will  increase  over  time.  But  still,  the
ability  of  nuclear  to  compete  and  to  penetrate  these  competitive
markets will depend on our success in keeping the costs down. And
so  again,  we  need  to  be  cautious  about  advocating  a  course  of  ac-
tion that would result in an increase in those costs.

Mr.  FERTEL.  Mr.  Honda,  maybe  I  could  add  a  slightly  different

perspective and then build upon what Dr. Lester has said.

Putting aside the economics for just a minute, though that is the
purpose  of  this  hearing,  there  is  a  practicality  of  implementing  re-
processing  effectively  in  our  country  within  the  next  five  or  10
years, and that is what we are looking at. The current reprocessing
technology,  as  I  think  everybody  else  on  the  panel  has  eluded  to,
while  it  works,  it  doesn’t  do  all  of  the  things  you  would  like.  It
doesn’t  dramatically  help  us  on  the  waste  side,  because  it  doesn’t
take  the  fission  products  out.  It  doesn’t  do  transmutation,  which
gets rid of the long-lived radioisotopes that cause you a problem in
the repository. It does reduce the volume, but it doesn’t necessarily
change  the  size  of  my  repository.  And  in  fact,  the  repository  right
now, which has a 70,000 Congressionally-mandated limit, not phys-
ical  limit,  that  is  a  Congressional  limit  that  Congress  can  deal
with, basically says it is limited by the spent fuel that we generate.
Even  if  we  changed  the  nature  of  that  fuel  to  be  reprocessing,  we
would still be limited unless you change the law.

So  we  need  to  go  to  the  next  evolution  of  technology,  which  I
think  you  heard  about  at  the  previous  meeting.  That  is  going  to
take  some  time.  And  one  thing  this  committee  can  do  is  hold  our
government,  our  Administration  accountable  to  get  something
done. Madame Chairman spoke about Yucca Mountain not moving
along.  We  don’t  move  along  in  R&D  all  that  fast  either,  let  alone
something like a big project. So getting the R&D done is one thing,
and  that  is  why  we  are  thinking  that  is  a  five-year  to  10-year
project to get to technologies you want to deploy, putting aside eco-
nomics.

At that point, and assuming the economics even make sense, and
they  may  make  sense  for  looking  at  it,  it  is  at  least  a  decade  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

deploy  facilities.  These  are  very,  very  large  complex  chemical  and
laser facilities, if you go to transmutation. They will require signifi-
cant licensing and construction and commissioning. And so you are
into—I  hate  to  say  it  this  way.  You  are  into,  almost,  a  couple  of
decades  to  honestly  deploy  the  facilities  that  you  want,  assuming
they  are  economic,  assuming  they  really  are  the  things  you  want
to do.

On  the  economics,  the  reason  we  haven’t  given  you  numbers  is
we are—we don’t believe we are smart enough to tell you what the
markets  look  like  in  20  years.  Madame  Chairman  asked  a  good
question about sequestration. I just saw a study that said that that
could be about exactly what Dr. Lester said, it was about 1.7 cents
per  kilowatt-hour.  What  is  probably  not  in  the  best  interest  of  our
consumers, whether they are a residence or they are commercial or
they are industrial customers, is to just raise the price of electricity
everywhere.  Okay.  Electricity  is  the  lifeblood  of  our  economy  and
our  quality  of  life.  And  what  you  would  like  to  do  is  not  raise  it,
if  you  don’t  have  to,  or  temper  it  somehow.  Conservation  can  do
that.  Efficiency  can  do  that.  But  you  have  to  generate  electricity.
One  of  the  attributes  of  nuclear  energy  that  the  financial  commu-
nity  and  big  customers  like  is  we  have  very  good  price  stability,
and we have very low marginal costs. Our capital costs are our big
thing.  Our  marginal  costs  are  low.  So  we  would  look  to  try  and
keep  marginal  costs  lower  to  keep  the  average  electricity  prices
down.  That  doesn’t  mean  you  shouldn’t  be  reprocessing.  It  just
means you have got to go about it smarter. And I think we are not
at a point of knowing how to do that quite yet, even though every-
body  may  have  numbers  and  thoughts.  And  you  shouldn’t  wait  50
years.  You  should  begin  to  develop  the  technology  and  make  deci-
sions over the next 10 to 20 years on its use.

Mr. HONDA. Thank you.
And thank you, Madame Chair. And my time is up, but I appre-
ciated  your  comment,  Mr.  Fertel,  and  I  was  trying  to  also  get  out
of  the  discussion  not  only  the  economics,  because  it  doesn’t  seem
smart just to be talking about that if we have a larger picture that
we  have  to  deal  with  in  the  future,  too.  And  what  is  the  cost?
What—you know, what other costs do we pay if we don’t pay atten-
tion to the other kinds of things?

So thank you very much.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. And the gentleman yields back.
The gentleman from Michigan, Dr. Ehlers.
Mr. EHLERS. Thank you, Madame Chair.
Before I ask a question, I would just comment.
Mr.  Fertel,  you  asked  for  some  less  uncertainty  in  the  behavior
of  the  Congress,  if  I  understood  you  correctly.  That  is  a  lot  to  ask
for.

Mr. FERTEL. Well, the Administration, too.
Mr.  EHLERS.  You  would  include  that,  too.  The  Congress  and  the
Administration are certainly less predictable than nuclear reactors.
The  reason  is  simple.  I  can  write  the  equations  covered  in  the  nu-
clear reactor. I can’t write any equations predicting what Congress
will do. If I did, I could certainly make more money than I am now.
The question I have for all of you is what do you believe are the
biggest  unknowns?  I  am  surprised  at  the  disagreement  here  about

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

the cost. What do you think are the biggest unknowns and any cost
predictions  for  the  advanced  fuel  cycle  or  for  reprocessing  in  gen-
eral?  What—why  is  it  so  uncertain  that  you  can’t  agree?  What  is
going on here?

We will start with Dr. Lester.
Dr.  LESTER.  Actually,  I  am  not  sure  that  the  level  of  disagree-
ment  between  us  is  that  great.  I  think  there  are  some  disagree-
ments  about  how  to  interpret  those  numbers,  but  the  actual  num-
bers,  if  I  understood  what  my  colleagues  said,  are  not  that  far
apart.

If  we  take  reprocessing,  which  is  the—probably  the  biggest  area
of  cost  uncertainty  of  all  of  the  elements  that  go  into  figuring  out
the  overall  economics  of  the  fuel  cycle  or  closed  fuel  cycle,  I  think
what  we  have  heard  this  afternoon  is  that  optimistically—a  rel-
atively  optimistic  estimate  of  reprocessing  costs  is  about  $1,000  a
kilogram.

The  consequence  of  that  cost  for  the  consumer,  in  terms  of  the
amount that would be paid by the consumer of electricity, depends
on  whether  you  do  the  calculation  in  terms  of  the  average  over  all
of  the  nuclear  power  plants  in  the  country  or  whether  you  assign
the cost of reprocessing and also the fabrication of the mixed oxide
fuel only to the power plants that are actually availing themselves
of  those  services.  And  depending  on  how  that  calculation  is  done,
if you take the averaging approach, the calculation would lead you
to  conclude  that  the  impact  on  the  consumer  would  be  about  an
extra 2/10 of one cent per kilowatt-hour. If, on the other hand, you
ascribe  all  of  these  costs  only  to  the  reactors  that  are  availing
themselves  of  these  services,  the  impact  on  the  consumer  would
probably  be  a  little  over  one  cent,  perhaps  1.2  cents  per  kilowatt
hour.

So I think, perhaps, the difference that you—we have been hear-
ing  has  to  do  with  how  to  apply  these  basic  cost  numbers  for  re-
processing.

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you.
Dr.  Jones,  it  seemed  to  me  you  were  a  little  more  optimistic

about the costs, or did I misunderstand you?

Dr. JONES. No, you didn’t misunderstand me.
We  are  all  using  the  same  cost  numbers.  And  when  we  examine
the  generating  cost  of  a  single  plant,  using  those  same  numbers,
reprocessing that adds $2.65 per megawatt hour, it is going to add
about 4.3 percent to the generation cost of that plant that uses that
fuel. That was our conclusion.

Mr. EHLERS. Okay. Dr. Fetter, you seemed to have assigned fair-

ly high costs to this. What is your comment?

Dr.  FETTER.  Well,  I  think  the  reason  there  is  so  much  uncer-
tainty  is,  at  least  partly,  for  traditional  reprocessing,  there  has
been no open market either for the reprocessing services or for the
MOX  fuel  fabrication.  The  contracts—the  prices  paid  have  been
confidential  and  proprietary  information.  So  mostly  one  has  to
work backwards to figure out how much it costs.

But for separation and transmutation, the uncertainties are even
greater,  because  those  separation  processes  have  not  even  been
done yet and would almost certainly be more complicated and more
expensive.  The  fuel  fabrication  would  almost  certainly  be  more  ex-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

pensive than MOX. And finally, the transmutation facilities, if they
are  fast  reactors  or  accelerators,  would  almost  certainly  be  more
expensive,  but  exactly  how  much  more  expensive  than  light  water
reactors  is  hard  to  say.  But  the  experience  around  the  world  with
fast reactors has not been encouraging.

So  I  think  one  can  say  fairly  confidently  that  it  would  be  more
expensive  than  the  once-through  fuel  cycle,  but  it  is  hard  to  say
just how much more expensive.

Mr. EHLERS. And Mr. Fertel, you were smart enough not to give

any numbers.

Mr.  FERTEL.  Well,  actually,  I  would  agree.  Your  question  was
what  are  the  biggest  unknowns,  and  I  think  Steve  hit  on,  in  my
mind, what the biggest unknowns are. It is the performance of the
facilities.  We  have  not  operated  accelerators  for  transmutation  on
any  large  scale.  We  haven’t  done  the  separation.  We  do  know  how
to  do  PUREX,  but  we  don’t  know  how  to  do  a  lot  of  the  advanced
reprocessing technologies yet. And to be honest, that is why our po-
sition is: what we need to do is go with a meaningful R&D program
and  figure  out  what  makes  sense.  And  then  it  does  take  govern-
ment  policy  decision.  And  my  illusion  to  certainty  is  if  you  look  at
our  nation  and  the  whole  concept  of  reprocessing,  it  was  the  way
we  started.  It  was  stopped  during  the  Ford-Carter  Administration.
It was restarted during the Reagan Administration. It was stopped
during the Clinton Administration. The Bush Administration would
restart  it.  It  is  very  hard  on  the  business  side  for  people  to  make
decisions.  And  it  is  not  just  decisions  of  the  reactor  owners  on
where  they  buy  their  fuel  or  what  they  do,  it  is  decisions  on  the
fuel  suppliers  to  invest  in  properties  and  their  facilities.  So  there
has to be some stability. And it is government policy in those areas,
sir, that plays a key role.

But I would agree with where Steve was. It is operation of facili-
ties  that  cause  us  the  most  concern  right  now  to  make  sure  they
are going to work. Then you can do the numbers. Then you can get
better numbers.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Okay.  For—just  to—it  sounds  to  me  like  the  only
way to resolve this is to—that the government has to make a policy
decision as to whether or not reprocessing is or is not a good thing
to  do,  as  compared  to  trying  to  deal  with  the  carbon  problem  in
some  other  way.  And  once  you—once  that  decision  is  made,  we
have  to  stick  by  it,  and  we  have  to—our  citizens  have  to  pay  the
costs or—in order to receive the benefits.

I  would  like  to  have  your  reaction  to  that,  but  my  time  is  ex-

pired, so I won’t.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Well, perhaps we will have time for that later.
The  gentlelady  from  Texas,  Ms.  Johnson,  is  recognized  for  five

minutes.

Ms. JOHNSON. Thank you very much.
Let me thank the panel. It has been informative to listen to you.
I live in two places. I am more here than I am some other place.
And one place that I live does have nuclear—have a nuclear plant.
It  costs  me  five  times  more  for  the  electricity  where  I  spend  less
time,  than  what  it  costs  up  here.  How  long  does  it  take  to  pay  for

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

those?  Any  estimate?  It  has  been  over  20  years  that  we  have  been
paying. Anybody willing to comment?

Mr.  FERTEL.  Well,  the  only  comment—I  am  not  sure  where  in

Ms. JOHNSON. Dallas.
Mr.  FERTEL.  Dallas?  Okay.  So  you  get  your  power  from  Coman-

Texas you live.

che Peak.

Ms. JOHNSON. Yes.
Mr.  FERTEL.  Comanche  Peak  was  an  extremely  expensive  plant
due  to  delays  and  other  things  that  it  ran  into.  And  as  I  am  sure
you know, the way the market works in Texas, or worked in Texas,
the  rates  were  set  by  the  Public  Utility  Commission,  not  by  the
market itself. So basically, they have set rates and they work it off.
Other  parts  of  the  country  it  is  much  better.  I  hate  to  say  that,
but——

Ms. JOHNSON. I think you are right.
Mr.  FERTEL.  And  clearly,  the  intent  for  anybody  looking  to  build
plants  going  forward  is  to  make  sure  the  plants  not  only  come  in
at  a  competitive  capital  price,  but  they  get  built  on  schedule  and
on time, because the markets won’t take them otherwise. So I hate
to  say  it  this  way,  but  I  think  that,  in  the  future,  this  won’t  be  a
problem,  but  I  am  not  sure  how  to  solve  your  problem  right  now.
Ms.  JOHNSON.  Well,  I  know  how  to  solve  it,  I  just  don’t  know
whether  I  have  the  wherewithal  to  get  enough  people  to  go  down
to the Public Utility Commission and complain.

I  am  concerned  about  the  reprocessing.  I  think  I  heard  two  dif-
ferent  versions.  Some  said—I  think  one  said  they  didn’t  think  it
was  safe  or  practical,  and  someone  else  said  they  thought  it  was
okay. Now what—am I hearing wrong?

Dr. LESTER. I think that there were different—I think you heard
different  things  about  the  economic  consequences  of  reprocessing.
I am not sure that—certainly I didn’t address the issue of the safe-
ty  of  reprocessing.  I  think  that  is  an  important  consideration  and
an important issue, but it was not the subject of my testimony.

Ms. JOHNSON. Okay. Did anyone mention safety?
Mr. FERTEL. In my comment, I quoted the President’s statement
that  he  was  looking  to  get  new,  safer  technology—new,  safer,  and
more  proliferation-resistant,  but  there  is  no  reason  reprocessing
can’t be done safely, the same way you can operate reactors safely.
You need to pay attention and do it right.

Ms.  JOHNSON.  What  would  be  the  effect  on  the  environment  to

reprocess? Would it be any different?

Dr. LESTER. Well, I think that there are two parts to the answer
to  that  question.  One  has  to  do  with  the  operational  safety  of  the
plant  itself.  The  other  has  to  do  with  the  relative  ease  or  relative
difficulty of handling the wastes that are produced by the plant rel-
ative  to  what  you  would  have  to  deal  with  if  you  didn’t  do  reproc-
essing at all, which is spent fuel. When it comes to the operational
safety issues, the fact of the matter is that if we have reprocessing
plants,  they  will  present  safety  challenges,  just  like  any  large  in-
dustrial facility would present, in this case, of course, greatly com-
plicated  by  the  fact  that  one  would  have  very  large  inventories  of
radionuclides  in  the  plant,  and  one  would  have  to  be  concerned
about  occupational  safety,  environmental  health,  and  so  on.  The

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

record  that  we  have  to  look  at  on  the  basis  of  reprocessing  plants
that  have  operated  in  France  and  in  the  United  Kingdom,  Japan
also,  is  it  has  to  be  said  somewhat  mixed.  The  performance  of  the
French  reprocessing  plants  has  been,  from  a  safety  point  of  view,
environmental  point  of  view,  very  strong.  The  performance  of  the
plant  in  the  United  Kingdom  and  the  performance  of  a  smaller
plant  in  Japan  has  been,  over  the  years,  somewhat  mixed.  I  think
the  lesson  there  is  that  we  have  to  work  very  hard  to  ensure  that
these  big  reprocessing  plants  perform  safely,  and  from  an  environ-
mental point of view, benignly.

The other part of the question has to do with the waste manage-
ment implications of reprocessing. And there, I think what we have
heard  is  that  for  advanced  reprocessing  schemes,  there  is  at  least
the potential to reduce the long-term risk from the high-level waste
that  we  produce  relative  to  the  disposal  of  spent  fuel,  which  is
what we would have to deal with if we didn’t reprocess.

Ms. JOHNSON. Thank you very much. My time is up. Thank you.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. The gentlelady’s time has expired.
Dr. Bartlett, you are recognized for five minutes.
Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much.
With  some  obvious  limitations,  energy  is  fungible.  It  is  unlikely,
then,  that  one  source  of  energy  can  be  enormously  increased  in
costs  while  other  sources  of  energy  remain  at  a  low  cost.  Looking
ahead  two,  three,  or  four  decades,  what  kind  of  assumptions  are
you—were you making about what oil would cost?

Dr.  JONES.  Oil,  in  fact,  doesn’t  have  that  much  to  do  with  elec-
tricity  generation.  We  looked  more  at  the  future  of  gas  prices  and
coal prices, and of course, uranium prices. With the—when we were
doing  our  study,  it  was  the  summer  of  the  big  gas  price  spike.  We
did  not  assume  that  that  price  would  stay  up  at  that  level  for  the
next 40 years. We assumed it would come back down, according to
the EIA forecasts.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Yeah.  I  would  caution  that  I  would  not  be  overly
optimistic  about  judging  what  is  going  to  happen  in  the  future  by
the Energy Information Agency prognostications.

There  is  a  big  article  in  the  New  York  Times  today  on  oil  and
several  statements  in  there  of  some  significance  to  the  problem
that  you  all  are  addressing.  They  said  that  the  oil  production  has
probably  plateaued,  that  there  are  an  increasing  number  of  au-
thorities who believe that the world’s demand for oil is going to ex-
ceed  the  world’s  ability  to  produce  oil.  Oil  today  is  over  $60  a  bar-
rel. The Chairman of our Transportation Committee says it will be
$80 a barrel by the end of the year. Goldman Sachs says it will go
to $105 a barrel. I don’t remember, they had a time period on that.
I  would  suggest,  gentlemen,  that  in  four  decades  from  now  the
availability of oil will be markedly less than it is now and the price
through the ceiling.

Do  you  know  the  name  M.  King  Hubbard?  His  prediction  that
the United States would peak in oil production in 1970 was correct.
We  did.  It  has  been  downhill  ever  since.  He  predicted  the  world
would  peak  in  oil  production  about  now.  Considering  he  was  ex-
actly  right  about  the  United  States,  is  there  any  reason  to  believe
that  we  shouldn’t  have  had  some  concern  that  he  might  be  right
about the world?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

Dr. LESTER. I certainly would agree with the general gist of your
comments  that  we  are  facing  a  long-term  imbalance  between  sup-
ply  and  demand  of  oil.  I  think,  to  some  degree,  that  imbalance,
which  with  all  of  its  profound  consequences  for  our  society,  can  be
separated from the question of nuclear technology, because, at least
to a first order, nuclear technology competes in the electricity mar-
ket,  oil  is  largely  absent  from  the  electricity  market.  Now  at  some
level, in some parts of the economy, of course, these two things co-
incide.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  But  if  oil  sort  of  got  very  expensive  and  gasoline
was $8 or $10 a gallon, don’t you think there would be some incen-
tive  to  maybe  go  to  some  electric  use  in  transportation?  And  don’t
you  think  that  these  uses  of  energy  will  change  so  that  the  costs
will  not  be  all  that  much  different  for  any  one  source  of  energy?
Isn’t energy reasonably fungible? We are now running cars on gaso-
line. Couldn’t we run them on electricity?

Dr.  LESTER.  I  think  we  certainly  could.  Indeed,  as  you  know,
some  vehicles  already  are  using  electricity.  So  yes,  it  is  certainly
correct  to  say  that  the  influence  of  very  high  oil  prices  may  be  to
increase the demand for electricity in parts of the economy.

Dr.  FETTER.  Could  I  just  also  comment  that  there  is  an  inter-
esting  connection  between  M.  King  Hubbard  and  the  economics  of
reprocessing?  One  of  the  disciples  of  Hubbard  is  Kenneth  Deffeyes
at  Princeton  University  who  wrote  a  book  called  ‘‘Hubbard’s  Peak’’
and  a  recent  book,  ‘‘Beyond  Oil.’’  It  was  actually  the  work  of
Deffeyes  on  the  availability  of  uranium  resources  at  various  prices
that  we  used  in  our  study  to  determine  what  the  likely  uranium
price  would  be  as  nuclear  power  grew  over  the  next  50  to  100
years. And based on that work, which is based on data collected by
the  Department  of  Energy,  it  appears  that  there  is  plenty  of  inex-
pensive—relatively  inexpensive  uranium  available  at  a  price  less
than  $130  per  kilogram  to  fuel  a  greatly  expanded  nuclear  power
industry through at least the next 50 years.

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you, Madame Chairman.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
The gentleman from Texas, Mr. Green.
Mr.  GREEN.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chair,  and  thank  you,  Mr.

Ranking Member.

And thank you, friends, for visiting with us today.
This  is  not  the  best  picture  that  we  are  having  painted  for  us,
and  it  does  cause  a  great  amount  of  consternation.  So  I  would  ask
each of you, how do you recommend we proceed? Let me just start
with  Mr.  Lester.  How  do  you  recommend  that  we  proceed?  Should
we  proceed  with  the  building  and  storage,  assuming  that  certain
things  will  happen  with  storage  or  that  we  will  find  a—some  new
technology for reprocessing? Or should we stagnate and wait? How
do you recommend we proceed?

Dr.  LESTER.  I  think  that  we—it  is  of  great  importance  to  our
country  that  we  prepare  the  ground,  so  to  speak,  for  a  major  ex-
pansion  in  nuclear  power  generation,  because  I  don’t  see  any  way
that we can address the problem of carbon emissions without doing
that.  And  so  the  question  really  is  what  is  the  best  thing  that  we
could  do  or  what  are  the  best  things  that  we  could  do  to  prepare
the ground for a major expansion of nuclear power.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

Our  assessment  of  the  technological  choices  leads  us  to  the  con-
clusion,  when  I  say  ‘‘our,’’  I  am  referring  to  the  MIT  study  that  I
was  a  participant  in,  leads  us  to  the  conclusion  that  our  govern-
ment  and  our  industry  should  give  priority  to  the  deployment  of
the  once-through  nuclear  fuel  cycle  involving  direct  disposal  of
spent  fuel  rather  than  the  development  of  more  expensive,  closed-
fuel  cycle  technology  involving  reprocessing  and  new  advanced
thermal  or  fast  reactor  technologies  for  at  least  the  next  few  dec-
ades.  We  are  not  able  to  see  beyond  that.  I  think  there  is  some
skepticism that we can even see that far ahead, but to our—to the
best  of  our  ability,  we  do  believe  that  the  best  way  to  ensure  a
major—not  ensure,  but  make  at  least  possible  a  major  expansion
of  the  nuclear  power  industry  in  this  country  would  be  for  govern-
ment  and  industry  to  focus  on  making  the  open,  once-through  fuel
cycle as competitive as possible.

Mr. GREEN. Let me hear, if I may, from Dr. Jones.
Dr. JONES. Our study’s conclusion was very limited on reprocess-
ing. It was simply that it didn’t seem to be an important economic
consideration  in  the  generation  cost  of  electricity.  That  frees  up
other motivations for considering reprocessing.

Mr. GREEN. So your recommendation is that we do what?
Dr. JONES. I would be going outside what we actually studied to
make  any  specific  recommendations  on  reprocessing  or  not,  what
type  of  reprocessing  to  pursue,  but  if  there  are  other  motivations
for considering reprocessing, you should not stumble over the extra
cost of it on generation cost of electricity.

Mr. GREEN. All right. Let us move to our next panelist, Mr. Fet-

ter.

Dr. FETTER. Yes, I would recommend that there be no near-term
decision to reprocess spent fuel and that for the near-term we pro-
ceed  with  the  once-through  fuel  cycle.  I  do  support  research,  just
research,  not  research  and  development,  on  advanced  fuel  cycle
technologies  with  a  view  to  making  them  cheaper,  but  more  par-
ticularly  with  a  view  to  making  advanced  fuel  cycles  more  pro-
liferation-resistant,  not  more  resistant  to  proliferation  than
PUREX,  but  more  proliferation-resistant  than  the  once-through
fuel  cycle,  because  I  think  if  any  expansion—well,  I  think  any  ex-
pansion  of  nuclear  power  in  the  United  States,  or  in  the  world,
should  not  increase  the  potential  for  the  spread  of  nuclear  weap-
ons.  I  think  that  is  the  overriding  consideration  beyond  waste  or
economics.

Mr. GREEN. The final panelist, please, Mr. Fertel, is it?
Mr. FERTEL. Yes, thank you.
Congressman  Green,  I  think  that  it—my  suggestion  would  be,
first  of  all,  move  forward  on  implementing  the  current  obligation
the government has with Yucca Mountain. Okay. You need to take
the  used  fuel  from  the  sites  and  move  it  to  Nevada  and  move  for-
ward on doing what we need to there.

Second,  I  think  that  I  would  go  further  than  Steve.  I  think  that
we should go forward and develop a road map or a project plan for
both  the  research  and  development  for  reprocessing,  and  I  am
thinking beyond just reprocessing. I think you need to look at sepa-
ration  and  transmutation  so  you  can  make  conscious  decisions.  I
think,  Congressman,  you  don’t  have  to  make  the  commitment  yet,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

but I think you do need to think about the policies the government
should have as part of the road map so that somewhere by the end
of  this  decade  our  government  is  in  a  position  of  knowing  what
technologies they think they would like to pursue and whether they
end  up  being  commercialized  or  not  is  still  an  open  question,  and
also what policies you need to put in place. And I think that doing
that, you are still accepting—you are not going to be deployed and
implementing  them  before  2025.  I  mean,  you  are  not—you  know,
you  could  start  today,  and  you  will  not  get  facilities  of  the  mag-
nitude we are talking about in commercial commissioned operation
for 20 years.

Mr. GREEN. Thank you, Madame Chair. I yield back the balance

of my time.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
I  think  that  there  is  a  clause  in  the  appropriation  bill,  which—
in  the  energy  and  water,  which  requests  that  they  make—a  deci-
sion  be  made  by  2007  and  what  process  to  pursue,  so  I  think  that
this is something that is upon us.

Mr.  Reichert  from  Washington,  you  are  recognized  for  five  min-

utes.

Mr. REICHERT. Thank you, Madame Chair.
I  just  want  to  make  sure  I  understand.  I  come  from  a  law  en-

forcement background, so this is all new and exciting stuff.

Nuclear  fuel  reprocessing,  so  we  have  stopped  and  started  the
process  several  times.  We  must  complete,  at  least  research,  maybe
development, according to some on the panel, and that is a five- to
10-year  process.  So  far,  am  I  on  track?  And  then  if  we  deploy,  it
is  at  least  another  decade  after  that?  The  people  that  I  talk  to—
and  I  know  you  have  probably  had  similar  conversations,  and  I
know Members of the Committee have—we just want cheap power,
efficient  power,  environmentally-friendly,  and  safe.  So  that  is  your
assignment. No heavy burden there at all.

Just a real simple question. What is the biggest reservation that
each of you have about the possible U.S. transition to nuclear spent
fuel  reprocessing?  The  biggest  reservation?  The  single  most—the
biggest reservation that you have.

Dr. FETTER. Could I jump in?
Mr. REICHERT. Sure.
Dr.  FETTER.  It  is  the  example  that  it  would  send  to  other  coun-
tries.  As  you  know,  it  has  been  the  policy  of  the  United  States  to
oppose the spread of reprocessing technologies, because of concerns
about  the  use  or  misuse  of  that  technology  to  separate  plutonium
for  nuclear  weapons.  And  it  is  also  the—has  been  the  position  of
this  Administration  to  oppose  the  spread  of  reprocessing  tech-
nologies.  And  I  think  it  would  be  difficult  if  the  United  States  de-
cided to reprocess for its own waste disposal management concerns
to  maintain  what  would  essentially  be  a  double  standard:  to  say,
‘‘Well,  we  can  do  it  and  certain  other  responsible  countries,  like
Japan and France, can do it, but no other country, or no countries
of  concern  can  do  it.’’  So  that  would  be  my  primary  concern  with
the decision to move to reprocessing.

Dr. LESTER. May I comment?
Mr. REICHERT. Yes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

Dr.  LESTER.  My  major  concerns  are  that  it  is  going  to  be  costly,
that it may not lead to the benefits on the waste management and
disposal  from—that  are  claimed  for  it,  and  as  Steve  has  indicated,
that  it  will  complicate  our  efforts  to  prevent  other  countries  from
exploiting plutonium for malign uses.
Mr. REICHERT. Others on the panel?
Mr. FERTEL. Yes. Let me take a slightly different view. My major
concern is we will debate it for decades and never do it while every-
body  else  does  their  thing.  This  is  what  we  did  in  the  ’70s.  Steve
is  expressing  the  belief  that  we  had  in  the  ’70s,  and  I  am  as  com-
mitted as he is to making sure other people don’t get nuclear weap-
ons and bad people don’t get nuclear material. But there is a lead-
ership  role  the  United  States  needs  to  play.  I  think  we  made  a
strategic  mistake  when  we  stopped  research  in  the  ’70s.  We  didn’t
have  to  deploy,  but  we  could  have  done  research  to  have  better,
safer, more proliferation-resistant technology, and what we did was
we  said,  ‘‘If  we  don’t  do  it,  no  one  else  will,’’  and  everybody  else
that wanted to went and did it. And I think the President has said
what Steve said, that he doesn’t want other countries doing it, but
he  has  also  said  that  the  way  he  will  get  them  not  to  do  things,
like  build  enrichment  facilities,  is  by  providing  them  fuel.  Well,  if
they want to use MOX fuel and we have no capability of providing
MOX fuel, we can’t provide MOX fuel. So I think that you can look
at this as either you are setting an example that is bad or you can
look at it that you are setting an example that is good. And I think
that  what  we  will  do  is  we  will  debate  this  for  years  and  go  no-
where  with  it  if  we  are  not  careful,  and  that  would  be  my  biggest
concern.

Mr.  REICHERT.  Thank  you.  And  you  have  said  that  the  French,
British, and Japanese, if I understood correctly again, pay for their
systems—the government pays for their systems. Do you think the
costs  are  comparable,  as  we  look  at  those  systems  here  in  the
United  States?  Could  we  learn  something  from  those  three  coun-
tries as far as cost goes?

Dr.  LESTER.  We—I  am  sorry.  We  do  learn  a  number  of  things.
One  of  the  striking  things  about  that  experience  is  that  the  Japa-
nese,  who  are  the  most  recent—which  is  the  most  recent  country
to  move  towards  reprocessing,  using  more  or  less  the  same  tech-
nology  that  the  French  and  the  British  have  used,  have  completed
a  reprocessing  plant  that  is—estimates  vary,  but  almost  certainly
at least three times more expensive than the plants that were built
some  years  earlier  in  France  and  the  United  Kingdom.  So  that
enormous cost range is one of the things that makes this discussion
so  complicated  or  so  difficult,  because  we  have  this  vast  range  of
costs,  with  the  Japanese  plant  approaching  $20  billion,  or  perhaps
even  more,  in  capital  costs  for  a  plant  that,  you  know,  from  a  dis-
tance, looks rather like the French plant and the British plant.

Mr. REICHERT. Thank you, Madame Chair.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
The gentleman from Utah, Mr. Matheson.
Mr. MATHESON. Thank you, Madame Chairwoman.
I have got four points to do in five minutes, so I will try to move

quickly.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

Just  one  quick  comment.  Mr.  Fertel,  I  think  you  are  right  on  in
talking about we need to emphasize moving ahead with R&D. And
for  this  subcommittee,  that  is  the  relevant  role  we  can  play,  and
so I appreciate those comments.

Secondly,  Dr.  Jones,  did  you  say  your  levelized  costs  were  over

a 40-year period?
Dr. JONES. Yes.
Mr. MATHESON. I just—I would agree with Dr. Bartlett in saying
that  the  Energy  Information  Administration  data  is  probably  not
reliable, and while if the most relevant cost comparison is going to
be  reprocessing  through—compared  to  the  once-through  fuel  cycle,
if we have a levelized cost of natural gas plants for capital and op-
erating costs that you got over 40 years, I sure hope you are right,
but I would bet you are not. I bet it is going to be more expensive,
and  I  just—look,  we  all  have  trouble—I  mean,  it  is  a—when  you
are  projecting  the  future,  nobody  knows  what  is  going  to  happen,
but  I  think  gas  prices  are  going  to  jump  up  a  lot  more  than  this
reflection of this levelized cost.

Two quick questions, though, I want to ask.
Dr.  Fetter,  in  your  testimony,  you  talked  about  the  concern  of  if
we  do  a  separation  and  transmutation  system  that  there  is  going
to  be  a  real  problem  in  terms  of  public  acceptance  about  locating
these  facilities  compared  to  a  repository.  And  I  just  was  curious  if
you  are  aware  that  the  Federal  Government  right  now  is  moving
ahead with not just looking at Yucca Mountain. In fact, the Federal
Government  is  looking  at  licensing  privately-owned,  above-ground
facilities  to  store  high-level  nuclear  waste.  And  as—coming  from  a
state  where  they  are  doing  that,  I  can  tell  you  public  acceptance
isn’t  very  big  on  this  idea.  So  I  know  this  was  a  discussion  of  eco-
nomics  and—but  since  you  raised  this  issue  in  your  testimony,  I
guess,  did  you  consider  the  notion  of  comparing  separation  and
transmutation system locations compared to doing various locations
of above-ground, high-level nuclear waste?

Dr.  FETTER.  Well,  in  fact,  I  do  think  that  the  above-ground  stor-
age of high-level waste—of spent fuel is an excellent option for the
next 50 to 100 years. In fact, I think the Nuclear Regulatory Com-
mission  recently  said  this  was  a  safe  and  effective—and  it  is  also
a  relatively  inexpensive  option  that  would  last  up  to  100  years.
And it is done at several locations already——

Mr. MATHESON. Sure.
Dr. FETTER.—around the United States with dry cask storage.
Mr. MATHESON. I guess this is not the forum to do it, but the fact
that they didn’t consider a terrorist risk and it is in the flight plan
to  a  test  and  training  range  where  F–16s  crash,  I  am  not  so  sure
that  putting  it  into  Tooele  County,  Utah  is  the  right  place  to  be
doing an above-ground storage facility.

Let  me  move  on  now  to  Dr.  Lester.  You  cite,  in  your  testimony,
MIT’s Future of Nuclear Power report, and it mentions some alter-
natives  to  a  mined  geologic  repository.  You  mentioned  the  term
‘‘nuclear  boreholes.’’  Could  you  explain  to  us  what  they  are  and
what  the  pros  and  cons  might  be  of  disposing  of  nuclear  waste  in
this manner?

Dr.  LESTER.  Yes.  The  proposal  here  is  instead  of  constructing
mined  structures  a  few  hundred  meters  below  the  Earth’s  surface,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

we  would,  instead,  drill  several  kilometers  below  the  surface  and
essentially  stack  canisters  of  waste,  one  on  top  of  the  other,  for,
perhaps,  one  or  two  kilometers  of  the  hole  depth  and  then  backfill
the upper two to three kilometers, whatever it is, with sealing ma-
terial.  The  advantage  of  going  to  that  depth  is  that  at  that  depth,
you—it  is  not—the  kind  of  near-surface  processes  that  we  have  to
worry  about  when  we  build  repositories,  in  particular  the  move-
ment  of  ground  water,  is  simply  not  a  factor.  So  one  avoids  the—
at least some of the complexities, by no means all, but some of the
complexities  that  are  associated  with  the  attempt,  for  example,  to
license  the  Yucca  Mountain  facility.  And  after  looking  at  this  op-
tion, we do believe that the deep borehole strategy does have some
attractive  features  that  would  warrant  a  serious  research  effort  to
try to answer some of the key questions about it.

Mr.  MATHESON.  I  guess  you  were  anticipating  my  next  question,
which  is  what  are  the  next  steps.  How  much  is  known  about  this
now  or  what—if  we  were  doing—if  we  were  to  pursue  this  alter-
native  in  whatever  form,  what  would—what  are  the  next  steps  we
need to be taking?

Dr.  LESTER.  Well,  clearly,  the  deeper  you  go  into  the  Earth’s
crust,  the  less  you  know.  And  so  there  are  important  research
issues  that  have  to  be  dealt  with  about  the  characteristics  of  the
crust  at  that  depth  as  well  as  engineering  issues  that  involve,  you
know, what would be involved in then placing a canister at a depth
of three or four kilometers. What would happen if it hung up in the
hole,  and  would  it  be  possible  to  retrieve  it?  There  are  a  series  of
questions. Our estimate is that a five- to 10-year research program
would  be  effective  at  relatively  modest  cost,  I  should  say,  in  an-
swering at least a number of those questions.

Mr. MATHESON. Okay. Thank you.
Dr. LESTER. At least in the United States.
Mr. MATHESON. Thank you, Madame Chairwoman.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Dr. Schwarz from Michigan is recognized for five minutes.
Mr.  SCHWARZ.  Just  to  kind  of—to  clear  that  up  a  little  bit,  this
is  the  second  hearing  that  we  have  had  on  what  to  do  with  spent
nuclear  fuel  and  nuclear  reprocessing,  which  I  am  sure  someone
has mentioned today. A friend of mine said it took 30 million years
to get all of that carbon into the ground and it has only taken 300
years  to  get  it  out,  so  we,  indeed,  have  a  problem  as  to  what  we
are  going  to  use  for  fuel  to,  probably  more  than  anything  else,
produce electricity. Is the changeover in the next 50 to 75 years to
nuclear  power  inevitable,  question  number  one?  Question  number
two,  and  then  just  put  on  your  Buck  Rogers  hats  for  a  minute,  as
we move away from carbon-based fuels, is there any other fuel out
there  that  can  be  harvested  or  produced  in  adequate  volume  to  be
an alternative to nuclear fuel? And my third question is, if, in fact,
there  is  a  mass  transition  to  nuclear  fuel,  which  I  believe,  in  fact,
there  will  be  and  to  nuclear-produced  electricity,  is  there  an  ade-
quate  uranium  supply  worldwide,  as  far  as  we  know,  to  do  pre-

Mr.  MATHESON.  And  is  any  of  that  research  going  on  now,  to

Dr. LESTER. No, essentially not. Nothing of that kind is going on

your knowledge?

at the moment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

cisely that and to keep producing electricity from nuclear processes
over  the  next  century  or  two?  Anybody  that  wants  to  pick  that  up
and run with it, go ahead.

Dr.  FETTER.  Well,  I  don’t  think  that  a  transition  to  nuclear  is
necessary  an  inevitable.  Nuclear  is  certainly  one  of,  I  count,  five
main carbon-free energy sources.

Mr. SCHWARZ. Please elucidate on the other four.
Dr.  FETTER.  Well,  there  are  enormous  resources  of  fossil  fuels,
unconventional fossil fuels and coal, which could be used in an en-
vironmentally-responsible  manner  with  carbon  sequestration.
There is also solar, which is quite expensive now. Photovoltaics are
very expensive, but could become much cheaper in the future. Bio-
mass  fuels  could  be  used  on  a  large  scale.  And  then  finally  wind
power,  which  is  already  economically  competitive  in  some  areas  of
the country.

Mr.  SCHWARZ.  Well,  let  me  interrupt  you  for  just  a  second.  We
are  told  by  people  who  profess  to  be  experts  that  neither  solar
power  nor  wind  power  could,  in  any  way,  produce  enough  energy
to really be effective in our world.

Dr.  FETTER.  Well,  certainly  solar  power  could  produce  far  more
than  enough  energy  to  supply  the  world  economy.  The  main  ques-
tion  is  the  cost,  right  now,  the  cost,  in  particular,  of  photovoltaics.
And there is also the issue of the cost of energy storage in the case
of  solar,  because  the  sun  only  shines  during  the  daytime,  so  one
would have to find a way to——

Mr.  SCHWARZ.  In  Michigan,  sometimes  not  even  in  the  daytime.
Dr.  FETTER.  Now  with  regard  to  uranium  supply,  this  is  some-
thing  that  I  and  my  colleagues  have  looked  fairly  closely  at,  and
we are convinced that there is plenty of relatively inexpensive ura-
nium  to  fuel  a  major  expansion  of  the  nuclear  industry  worldwide
for  at  least  the  next  50  years  based  on  a  once-through  fuel  cycle.
So there is no need, on this time scale, I think, to go to a reprocess-
ing and recycle option.

Mr. SCHWARZ. Anyone else who wants to pick that one up, please

go ahead.

Dr. LESTER. Very briefly, I think we are going to need all of these
things,  and  I  see  no  possibility  that  we  will  be  able  to  achieve  our
goals  for  restricting  carbon  emissions  globally  without  a  major  ex-
pansion  of  nuclear  power.  We  will  need  solar.  We  will  need  wind.
We  will  need  more  efficient  energy  use.  We  will  need  carbon  se-
questration  with  coal.  We  will  need  all  of  those  things,  but  I  see
no  possibility,  based  on  my  assessment  of  supply  and  demand  and
global  climate  change  issues,  I  see  no  possibility  that  we  will  be
able to get by without a major expansion of nuclear power over the
next 50 to 75 years. Beyond that time, I don’t know. But over that
kind of period, that is to say between now and the end of this cen-
tury,  I  see  no  possibility  of  managing  this  problem  of  climate
change without a major expansion of nuclear power.

Mr. FERTEL. Congressman Schwarz, I would agree with what my
two colleagues said, and the only thing I would add is that we see
hydrogen  as  becoming  a  player,  and  we  actually  see  nuclear  as  a
player  in  producing  hydrogen,  not  necessarily  through  electrolysis,
but through chemical processes at high temperatures.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

The  other  thing,  on  the  adequacy  of  uranium  supply,  there  are
a  lot  of  projections  on  the  adequacy  of  the  uranium  supply.  Ura-
nium  prices  are  up  150  percent  in  the  last  year  because  of  ques-
tions about uranium availability, and that is today. So there is ura-
nium  out  there,  but  that  doesn’t  mean  you  shouldn’t  be  looking  at
smarter recycling techniques. And I think that that is important to
do, not just from fuel supply, but from the way that the gentleman
started,  which  is  fundamentally  from  a  waste  management  per-
spective. You can’t keep building large repositories worldwide. And
yes, you can store it above ground, but ultimately our responsibility
to  the  people  living  today,  our  children,  and  our  grandchildren  is
to dispose of it. And we ought to deal with it. Okay. We are smart
enough  to  deal  with  it.  We  ought  to  get  on  with  it  and  deal  with
it. And that would seem to be the thing that responsibly this coun-
try, again, could provide leadership on.

Congresswoman  Biggert,  you  mentioned  what  Chairman  Hobson
put  in  the  energy  and  water  appropriations  bill,  and  we  certainly
respect  Chairman  Hobson’s  desire  to  get  it  done  by  2007.  We  only
wish we could. What we would like to do is take his leadership and
leverage  off  of  that  and  say  that  if  we  can  move  forward  with  the
government,  the  DOE  looking  at  a  road  map  or  whatever  that  can
move  the  R&D  down  the  road  quicker,  that  would  be  very  good.  I
still think deployment is a long way off, just practically.

Mr. SCHWARZ. Thank you, gentlemen.
Thank you, Madame Chair.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
And certainly, Chairman Hobson is the appropriator, but we are
the  authorizing  committee,  and  so  this  is  something  that  we  need
to address and I, for one, you know, would want to push that.

The gentlelady from Texas, Ms. Jackson Lee, for five minutes.
Ms.  JACKSON LEE.  I  thank  the  Chairwoman  very  much  and  the
Ranking  Member  for  the  opportunity  for  such  an  important  hear-
ing.

And  I  would  ask  unanimous  consent  that  my  opening  statement

be allowed to be submitted into the record in its entirety.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Without objection.
Ms.  JACKSON LEE.  I  think  that  there  is  a  large  question  on  the
idea of nuclear energy and nuclear waste. I have, for a long period
of  time,  challenged  Yucca  Mountain  as  to  whether  or  not  that  is
the  best  approach.  My  concern,  of  course,  is  that  anything  that  is
geographically  or  population-wise  geographically  bare,  meaning
that  it  is  an  open,  unused  area,  with  the  growing  population  that
we  have  in  the  United  States,  one  can  never  tell,  as  populations
grow and expand, what may be an unpopulated area today may be
a populated area tomorrow.

With  that  in  mind,  this  whole  question  of  reprocessing  poses  a
great  deal  of  interest,  particularly  if  it  has  some  economic  benefit
to  it  and  as  much  if  it  has  some  ability  to  be  secure,  because  one
of  the  concerns  those  of  us  who  serve  on  the  Homeland  Security
Committee, and we have a Subcommittee dealing with the issue of
nuclear materials, is the question of security, certainly in the back-
drop of the recent tragic incident in London, England.

Dr. Fetter, I would like to query you on if you would point to the
viability  of  reprocessing  from  the  points  that  I  have  just  made.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

One,  we  can  never  guarantee  areas  that  may  remain  unpopulated.
I  am  sure  that  the  fans  of  the  Yucca  Mountain  process,  of  course,
will  argue  of  its  deep  embeddedness  and  that  it  does  not  pose  a
threat,  but  you  might  want  to  comment  on  that,  not  on  the  Yucca
Mountain  per  se,  but  the  fact  is  that  wherever  you  put  nuclear
waste,  there  may  be  the  possibility  of  it  being  near  population
sites.  But  I  think  I  am  interested  in  this  whole  question  of  the
processing  being  secure,  the  processing  being  a  ready  technology
that  is  comparable  and  ready  to  move  on  now,  and  the  kind  of  ex-
pertise  that  would  be  needed  to  engage  in  reprocessing  in  a  mas-
sive scale. And I thank the witnesses for their testimony.

Dr.  FETTER.  Well,  I  think  it  is  important  to  note  that  reprocess-
ing  does  not  eliminate  the  waste,  and  it  doesn’t  remove  the  need
for  a  deep  geologic  repository.  Even  with  a  complete  separations
and transmutation system, there would still be the need for a deep
geologic  repository,  like  the  one  at  Yucca  Mountain.  And  while  I
am  not  an  expert  on  geologic  disposal,  I  know  there  have  been
many  studies  by  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  on  the  safety
of  Yucca  Mountain,  which  have  concluded  that  one  can  adequately
protect  public  health  and  safety  through  the  geologic  disposal  of
waste at Yucca Mountain.

The  issue  of  security  is  one  that  I  do  worry  about.  Even  in  the
United  States,  I  worry  about  the  security  of—the  security  implica-
tions  of  reprocessing  and,  in  particular,  the  transport  and  use  of
mixed  oxide  fuel  around  the  United  States,  because  that  material,
if it were stolen and diverted, could be used to build nuclear weap-
ons. And as I have also said, I worry particularly about the security
implications  of  a  move  by  the  United  States  toward  reprocessing
and the example that it would set for other countries.

Ms.  JACKSON LEE.  Did  you  answer  the  question  about  expertise
in the reprocessing area, the amount of trained personnel that you
need  to  train  more  personnel,  the  process  that  would  be  needed?
Dr. FETTER. Well, one would need a fairly extensive research pro-
gram  to  develop  the—these  technologies  more  fully,  and  in  the
process  of  conducting  that  research  and  development,  one  would
naturally,  I  think,  develop  the  necessary  expertise  that  would  be
needed  to  do  this  well.  I  think  that  can  be  done  with  the  existing
university infrastructure that we have in the United States.

Ms.  JACKSON LEE.  Anyone  else  want  to  comment  quickly  on  the

training aspect over the expertise needed in the reprocessing?

Dr. LESTER. Well, if I may just add a word about that. I—because
a  purely  private  initiative  in  reprocessing  would  be  unviable  eco-
nomically, it would necessitate a federal intervention, which would
involve a commitment of funds, obviously, but perhaps equally im-
portantly would place heavy demands on the government’s own nu-
clear-trained  human  resources,  who  would  necessarily  have  to  be
involved in the selection of sites and the development of a licensing
framework and the management of contractors and so on. And the
resources, both human and financial, that are potentially available
to  the  Federal  Government  to  support  the  development  of  nuclear
power, are not unlimited, and therefore, a new initiative in reproc-
essing  could  risk  diverting  resources  from  other  policy  initiatives
that might make a greater positive contribution to the future of nu-
clear power over the next few decades.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

Mr.  FERTEL.  Again,  a  slightly—twist  on  what  Dr.  Fetter  just

said.

The  government  is  spending  resources  right  now  looking  at  ad-
vanced  fuel  cycle  initiatives,  which  include  looking  at  transmuta-
tion  and  reprocessing.  What,  again,  this  committee  can  do  is  help
make  sure  that  they  are  using  their  resources  most  effectively  in
doing  that  as  opposed  to  piece  meal  in  different  laboratories  and
different parts of the bureaucracy. So there are resources currently
being  committed.  Your  question  is  a  very  good  one,  and  I  think
Richard’s  answer  is  a  good  one,  but  there  are  bodies  and  minds
working  this  right  now.  And  what  could  be  looked  at  is:  are  they
working  it  as  smart  and  as  efficiently  as  they  can  be  and  in  as  an
integrative way as possible?

Ms. JACKSON LEE. I appreciate that answer.
Madame  Chairperson,  I  thank  you.  I  think  the  two  prior  speak-
ers  gave  me  the  gist,  which  is  if  we  take  a  lot  of  dollars  and  take
away from another effort, we have a problem, but we already have
dollars,  and  if  we  organize  them  better,  we  might  be  able  to  move
forward on what may be important research.

I thank the Chairwoman, and I yield back my time.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much.
I  think  if  we  can—briefly,  if  there  are  other  people  that  have
what—further questions, and I do, or maybe it is going to turn out
to  be  more  of  a  statement,  but  I  recognize  myself  for  five  minutes.
And I would agree with Mr. Fertel when he talked about how we
tried to set an example 30 years ago that really nobody paid atten-
tion  to  it  and  the  nuclear  non-proliferation,  and  we,  obviously,
thought  we  were  being  the  leaders  and  shut  down  everything,  and
everybody  else  went  ahead.  And  what  has—but  the  research  has
not  died  on  this,  and  it  never  did.  I  was  over  in  France  to  look  at
the research over there, and all they did is talk about how they had
gotten  their  research  from  Argonne  in  Illinois,  and  that  is—they
were using that process that was developed 20 to 30 years ago. And
they  are  still  using  an  old  process.  But  since  I  have  been  in  Con-
gress  and  I  have  worked  on  this  committee,  Argonne  has  been
working  on  the  reprocessing  starting  with  the  electrometallurgical
process  and  then  into  the  pyroprocessing,  which  was  the—looking
at the EBR to the breeder reactor and that—and then going further
to the spent fuel pyroprocessing and transmutation. So it is not as
if there has been a void here in looking at reprocessing at all, and
I  think  that  is  very  important,  because  this  is—this  committee
looks at basic science, looks at the research, basic research and de-
velopment,  and  this,  I  think,  is  another  area  that  we  cannot  just
look  to  industry  and  say,  ‘‘Well,  you  go  out  and  do  it,’’  because  it
is  a  very  expensive  process.  But  in  the  long  run,  to  me,  reprocess-
ing goes along with the advanced fuel cycle and the closed—and we
are—we  haven’t  built  a  reactor  in  how  many  years,  30  years,  and
it is going to take a while to do that. So why can’t we do the whole
thing  at  once  and  have  something  that  is  going  to  last,  that  is
going to cut out the fuel? And we heard in testimony the last time
that if we had reprocessing—take all of the materials that we have
now,  that  we  would  never  have  to  build  another  Yucca  Mountain.
We  would  be  able  to  use  one  that—for  hopefully  centuries,  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

would  be  the  place  to  put  the  spent  fuel  that  would  remain—it
would not—and it would only last 300 years and et cetera.

So  anyway,  that  is  my  soapbox.  But  do  you  think,  and  I  will—
and I come back to this again. I think it is the way that we started.
Do  you  think  with  what  we  are  developing  and  the  time  that  it  is
going  to  take  us  to  do  the  whole  process,  that  we  will  be  able  to
do  that  in  less  than  50  years  and  yet  we  will  be  able  to  do  all  of
this?

So  I  am  going  to  start  with  Mr.  Fertel.  Start  the  other  way  this

time.

Mr.  FERTEL.  Yeah,  I  actually  think  that  you  could  be  deploying
by  2025,  if  that  is  what  the  government  decided  was  the  right
thing to do. I think that what you need to get there, but—is a con-
scious  plan  going  forward,  which  is  technology  and  policy,  because
if  it  doesn’t  include  the  policy  decisions,  you  are  going  to  have  a
problem  on  what  happens  on  the  buying  side,  on  the  implementa-
tion  side.  I  don’t  think  there  is  any  question  about  the  growth  of
nuclear energy in the world and in our country as an integral part
of  what  is  going  to  help  satisfy  both  energy  and  environmental
needs,  and  therefore,  whether  we  have  a  uranium  problem  or  not,
we  are  going  to  have  to  do  something  smarter  with  the  used  nu-
clear  fuel,  and  doing  it  smarter  with—and  I  am  totally  cognizant
of what Steve said about the examples we set and from a non-pro-
liferation  standpoint,  making  sure  that  we  are  not  creating  prob-
lems, particularly in the world we live in today.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Well,  I  think  we  heard  that  at  our  last
hearing that really the new process would really reduce, reduce, re-
duce the nuclear proliferation problem.

Mr. FERTEL. Done right and done with the right leadership.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Dr. Fetter.
Dr.  FETTER.  Well,  as  I  said,  I  do—even  though  I  don’t  support
any  near-term  reprocessing,  I  do  support  research  on  advanced  re-
processing  and  recycle  technologies,  ones  that  would  be,  hopefully,
cheaper,  but  most  importantly,  would  be  more  proliferation-resist-
ant. It is my understanding that the proposals that have been cur-
rently  put  forward,  though,  are  not  more  proliferation  resistant.
For  example,  the  UREX+  process,  which  was  part  of  the  program,
I think, Bill Magwood would testify that that, in fact, was not more
proliferation-resistant  than  the  PUREX—or  didn’t—maybe  he
didn’t  testify.  Perhaps  he  stated  that  this  was  not  more  prolifera-
tion-resistant.  So  I  think  that  in  future  research,  much  attention
and  perhaps  real  team  effort  should  be  devoted  to  ensuring  that
any  new  process  that  is  developed  is  more  proliferation-resistant.
Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  I  think  what  he  said  was  that  there  is—
that it hasn’t been—any large reprocessing that has not been done
yet, but it is—the research is there. Now it just needs the applica-
tion.

Dr. Jones.
Dr.  JONES.  The  reprocessing  technology  alternatives  were  really

outside the scope of our study, so I didn’t——

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Dr. Lester.
Dr.  LESTER.  Well,  Madame  Chair,  your  question  is  essentially,  I
think, how long will it take. And the answer is it depends on what

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

you  want.  If  you  want  a  PUREX-type  of  modest  modification  to  a
PUREX-type reprocessing——

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  No,  I  think  we  are  talking  about  the  re-
processing  that  has  transmutation  that  is  not  nuclear—or  there
will not be nuclear proliferation.

Dr.  LESTER.  If  you  want  that,  and  if  you  want,  moreover,  a  con-
figuration,  a  scheme,  that  would  remove  all  of  the  troublesome
radionuclides  from  the  waste,  the  long-lived  ones,  and  moreover,
figure out how to fabricate them into appropriate targets and then
transmute  them  so  that  there  is  very  little  left,  if  you  want  to
achieve  all  of  that  and  have  a  proliferation-resistant  scheme,  I
think  this  is  not  going  to  take  one  decade.  I  am  not  even  sure  it
is going to take less than two decades. I think we are talking about
a  long-term  program  for  which  I  certainly  believe  that  we  should
be doing serious, careful, long-term research. But I don’t think this
is  something  that  would  be  available  to  us  by,  for  example,  the
year 2020.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Thank you.
Mr. Honda, do you have any questions? Okay. Thank you.
Dr. Ehlers is recognized.
Mr. EHLERS. Just a few, Madame Chair.
First  of  all,  one  thing  that  we  haven’t  mentioned  at  all,  which  I
think  is  a  very  important  part  of  the  current  energy  needs,  is  to
improve  our  efficiency  of  energy  use.  That  is  the  single  biggest,
cheapest  thing  we  can  do  immediately  to  solve  our  short-term  en-
ergy  problem.  And  I  realize  it  is  a  one-term  bump,  but  it  is  some-
thing  that,  once  established,  will  pay  off  tremendously  over  many
years.

Secondly,  I  wanted  to  support  my  colleague  from  Maryland,  Dr.
Bartlett’s comments about fossil fuel, although there is—appears to
be  ample  coal  at  the  moment.  Certainly,  there  are  some  environ-
mental  side  effects,  and  we  need  a  lot  of  work  on  trying  to  resolve
that  problem  if  we  are  going  to  use  it.  Oil  is  not  a  factor,  as  you
said,  simply  because  the  costs  are  going  to  escalate.  I  think—and
I believe the same thing is true of natural gas. I—we have—I firm-
ly  believe  natural  gas  is  too  valuable  to  burn.  It  is  an  incredibly
good  feed  stock  for  the  petrochemical  industry,  and  we  are  basi-
cally,  because  of  its  good  environmental  effects  now,  we  are  burn-
ing  it  to  produce  electrical  energy  when  there  are  other  alter-
natives available.

I  would  also  disagree  with  the  comments  about  photovoltaics,
and  I  would  refer  you  to  an  article  in  the  APS,  American  Physical
Society,  newsletter  not  too  long  ago,  a  very  good  review  of  photo-
voltaic  technology  and  much  more  optimistic  than  you  testified
about.  It  doesn’t  solve  the  storage  problem,  of  course,  but  I  have
a friend who has built a house in northern Michigan, which is cer-
tainly  not  a  warm  and  friendly  climate,  and  he  is  five  miles  from
the  nearest  power  line,  and  it  is  totally  solar-powered.  They  have
never  had  a  problem  of  any  sort  with  it,  in  spite  of  our  miserable
weather, both cloudy and cold.

The proliferation issue I don’t think is an issue anymore as it re-
lates  to  the  fuel  cycle.  I  think  the  greatest  risk  right  now  is  the
plutonium  floating  around  in  the  former  Soviet  Union  and—which

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

is  not  being  properly  accounted  for  and  cared  for.  We  also  have  a
number  of  other  nations  producing  plutonium,  and  I  think  that
genie is out of the bottle. There are a lot of good reasons not to cre-
ate  more.  I  understand  that.  But  it  is  not  a  stopper,  in  my  mind.
And  finally,  just  a  little  pet  peeve  of  mine,  which  I  developed
years ago as a county commissioner and Chairman of the Board of
Public Works. I proposed we rename our county landfill, which was
called the ‘‘Kent County Waste Disposal System,’’ and rename it as
the  ‘‘Kent  County  Waste  Storage  System.’’  Just  because  you  put  it
in  our  ground  doesn’t  mean  it  is  gone.  It  is  still  there.  You  have
not disposed of it. It is stored there, and as our county commission
found out when it began leaking into rivers and ponds, and we had
to spend millions of dollars in remediation. The same is true of nu-
clear  waste.  You  are  not  disposing  of  it.  The  question  is  how  can
we  most  carefully  and  properly  store  it,  and  particularly,  how  can
we  most  economically  retrieve  the  materials  and  correct  the  prob-
lem when problems will occur, because they will occur. And I think
the emphasis on disposal at Yucca Mountain is a major part of the
problem. And recording a 10,000-year guarantee is a major part of
the  problem.  Monitored  retrievable  storage,  I  believe,  is  safer  and
likely to be less expensive and certainly more acceptable politically.
And  I  think  if  we  had  gone  that  route,  I  believe  we  would  have
Yucca Mountain operating at this point.

With that, I yield back.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Dr. Bartlett, the gentleman from Maryland.
Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much.
Dr.  Ehlers  mentioned  coal.  We  have  about  250  years  of  coal  re-
serves in our country at current use rates. But yet, to ramp up the
use  of  coal,  as  we  certainly  will,  as  other  energy  sources  become
less  available,  if  the—you  increase  only  two  percent  exponentially,
that  now  shrinks  to  about  85  years.  And  when  you  recognize  that
for many purposes, you are going to have to transform the coal into
a gas or a liquid, now you have shrunk to about 50 years. So there
is  about  50  years  of  coal  left  with  a  two-percent  growth,  expo-
nential growth, if you are transforming it to a form where you can
put it in your car or do other things with it.

One of you mentioned that there were five sources, four in addi-
tion  to  nuclear  energy.  The  other  alternatives  are  going  to  require
very large investments of time and energy, and we are running out
of both of those.

I  would  just  like  to  comment  very  briefly  on  two  of  them  you

mentioned.

One  was  unconventional  fossil  fuels.  The  Tar  Sands  of  Canada,
I  am  going  up  there  this  summer  to  look  at  those,  I  believe,  they
are now producing oil out of those at about $30 a barrel, and with
oil today more than $60 a barrel, gee, that sounds good. And there
is  lots  of  oil  there,  and  so  we  will  just  harvest  that.  But  I  am  also
told  that  there  is  a  net  energy  deficit  in  doing  that.  They  are  get-
ting  the  oil  out  of  the  ground  by  drilling  two  wells,  ultimately—
they  are  horizontally.  In  the  upper  well,  they  put  a  lot  of  steam,
hot  water,  which  they  generate  with  gas,  and  that  they,  in  fact—
and  then  it  softens  the  oil  and  it  can  flow  down  and  be  picked  up
by  the  second  well,  which  is  drilled  under  that,  that  they  are,  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

fact,  using  more  energy  from  the  gas  that  they  are  getting  out  of
the  oil.  Now  if  that  is  true,  this  is  not  a  solution  to  our  energy
problem.  As  long  as  gas  is  cheap  and  it  is  there  and  you  can  put
oil  in  a  pipeline  and  move  it  here,  that  may  be  justified,  but  I
would  really  like  to  second  what  Dr.  Ehlers  said.  Gas  is,  in  fact,
too good to burn. As a matter of fact, nearly half the energy in pro-
ducing  a  bushel  of  corn  is  represented  by  the  gas  that  is  used  to
make nitrogen fertilizer. Very few people recognize that.

The  other  potential  source  is  biomass.  Until  we  learned  how  to
do  no-till  farming,  we  were  losing  the  battle  with  maintaining  our
topsoils.  They  are  now  all  down  in  the  Mississippi  Delta  from  the
central part of our country. Now we are barely able to maintain our
topsoils, and that is permitting much of this, what you call biomass
to  go  back  to  become  humus.  If  you  take  that  away,  then  the  soils
become, in effect, a soup when it is wet and a brick when it is dry,
so  you  make  brick.  You  take  soil  that  has  no  humus  in  it,  it  is
called  clay,  and  you  put  it  in  an  oven  and  bake  it,  and  that  is  a
brick.

So  although  we  can  certainly  get  some  energy  out  of  biomass,  I
would  caution  that  our  ability  to  do  that  is  very  limited  compared
to the amount of energy that we get from fossil fuels that we have
got to replace.

Just one little illustration of the enormous energy density in fos-
sil  fuels.  One  barrel  of  oil,  the  refined  product  of  which  gasoline
you  can  now  buy  at  the  pump,  42  gallons,  roughly  $100  will  buy
that for you at the pump, right. That will buy you the work output
of 12 people working full-time for you one year.

To  give  you  another  perspective  of  the  enormous  energy  density
in  fossil  fuels,  if  you  go  out  this  weekend  and  work  very  hard  in
physical labor all day long, I will get more mechanical work out of
an electric motor with less than 25 cents worth of electricity. Your
worth  for  manual  labor,  less  than  25  cents  a  day.  And  that  is  the
challenge  we  have  in  transitioning  from  these  fossil  fuels  to  these
alternatives. Enormous energy density.

We  have  5,000  years  of  recorded  history.  We  are  not  a  bit  over
100  years  into  the  age  of  oil.  In  another  100  years,  we  will  be  out
of the age of oil. If not massive nuclear, what then? I am glad that
you  were—you  are  a  great  audience.  Most  of  the  audiences,  less
than two percent of the people know anything about M. King Hub-
bard  and  ‘‘Hubbard’s  Peak,’’  and  all  of  you  seem  to  know  about
that. Congratulations.

Madame  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much  for  hosting  this  meet-
ing, because it gives us an opportunity to look at the overall energy
problem we face. And again, I would counsel that I wouldn’t bet the
ranch on the prognostications of the Energy Information Agency.

back.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Okay.  Thank  you.  The  gentleman  yields

Before  we  close  the  hearing,  I  would  like  to  recognize  Bill  Car-
ney, a former Science Committee Member, is sitting in the back of
the room. Do you want to raise your hand? Welcome. I am glad you
came back to see how we are doing.

I  want  to  thank  our  panelists  for  testifying  before  this  sub-
committee today. It has really been enlightening, and thank you for

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

spending the time with us and really helping us in our policy delib-
erations. We really appreciate all that you have had to say.

And if there is no objection, the record will remain open for addi-
tional  statements  from  Members  and  for  answers  to  any  follow-up
questions the Subcommittee may ask the panelists.

Without objection, so ordered.
This hearing is now adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 4:15 p.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(59)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Richard  K.  Lester,  Director,  the  Industrial  Performance  Center;  Pro-
fessor of Nuclear Science and Engineering, Massachusetts Institute of Technology

Questions submitted by Chairman Judy Biggert
Q1. What  steps  are  available  to  reduce  the  costs  associated  with  an  advanced  fuel
cycle?  Specifically,  which  steps  or  technologies  have  fixed  costs  that  can’t  be  re-
duced and which steps or technologies might see significant cost reductions with
further research and development?

A1. Every  stage  in  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle  has  the  potential  for  cost  reduction
through  the  implementation  of  new  technologies  as  well  as  the  exploitation  of  in-
sights  from  accumulated  operating  experience.  This  is  true  of  the  front-end  stages,
including uranium resource exploration and production and uranium enrichment, as
well as back-end stages such as interim spent fuel storage, reprocessing, and waste
disposal.  Uncertainties  in  cost  are  greatest  at  those  stages  of  the  fuel  cycle  where
there  is  a  lack  of  significant-scale  practical  operating  experience,  including  actinide
partitioning and transmutation schemes. Research and development can play an im-
portant  role  in  reducing  these  uncertainties,  as  well  as,  potentially,  reducing  costs.
Most  current  research,  development,  and  analysis  on  back-end  fuel  cycle  stages  is
focused  on  providing  information  about  the  operation  of  a  single  process,  set  up  in
one  way.  While  these  activities  produce  knowledge,  they  do  not  allow  for  transfer-
ring  information  to  new,  related  situations  and  thus  provide  no  foundation  for  the
accumulation  of  information  about  how  variations  in  the  operation  of  plants  and
other  parts  of  the  fuel  cycle  affect  costs,  safety,  waste  and  proliferation  resistant
characteristics.  A  modeling,  analysis,  and  simulation  program  is  needed  that  will
permit  evaluations  of  how  changes  in  one  feature  of  a  design  for  the  sake  of,  say,
safety may affect other aspects of the design, the overall performance of the system,
and  the  cost  of  operation.  Laboratory-scale  research  on  new  separations  methods
with  the  goal  of  developing  technologies  that  are  less  costly  and  more  proliferation
resistant  is  also  important.  However,  expensive  projects  for  development  and  dem-
onstration  of  advanced  back-end  fuel  cycle  technologies  carried  out  too  far  in  ad-
vance  of  any  credible  deployment  opportunity  and  without  benefit  of  the  technical
basis provided by analysis and research can be counterproductive for cost reduction
efforts.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Donald  W.  Jones,  Vice  President  of  Marketing  and  Senior  Economist

at RCF Economic and Financial Consulting, Inc.

Q1. Dr.  Lester,  in  his  testimony,  makes  the  point  that  fleet-wide  averaging  of  costs
isn’t possible in the U.S. industry as it is in France, for example. Do you agree?
In the complicated situation here in the U.S., with some States regulated, others
deregulated, and all setting their own policies, how easy or difficult is it to pass
the costs of reprocessing on to the consumer in the form of higher rates?

A1. Electricity  pricing  is  much  more  complex  in  the  United  States  than  in  France.
Deregulation  has  separated  generators  from  retail  distribution,  where  consumer
pricing occurs. Some generators may have customers in both regulated and deregu-
lated markets, and the constraints on retail pricing in regulated markets may affect
wholesale pricing to those markets in ways that are not applicable in sales to retail-
ers in deregulated markets.

However,  the  estimates  of  the  additional  cost  of  reprocessing  indicate  that  those
costs are so small that consumers simply will not notice them. This result in no way
depends on a utility being able to spread reprocessing costs across all of its genera-
tion facilities, conventional as well as nuclear. The full fuel cycle cost of new nuclear
plants,  without  reprocessing,  our  study  calculated  to  be  about  c  cent  per  kilowatt
hour.  Publicly  available  estimates  from  the  Harvard  study,  the  Nuclear  Energy
Agency, and a report by Simon Lobdell suggest that reprocessing would increase the
full  fuel  cycle  cost  to  about  six-tenths  of  a  cent  per  kilowatt  hour.  Adding  this  cost
to  a  generation  cost  of  6.2  cents  per  kilowatt  hour,  which  is  a  wholesale  price  that
excludes  any  transmission  and  distribution  costs  which  final  consumers  face,  I  be-
lieve would not have an appreciable effect on consumers.

The  United  States  currently  does  not  have  commercial  reprocessing  infrastruc-
ture,  and  the  cost  calculations  presented  above  do  not  take  into  consideration  any
broader costs required to bring such an infrastructure into existence.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Responses by Steve Fetter, Dean, School of Public Policy, University of Maryland

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chairman Judy Biggert
Q1. Why  do  you  think  the  cost  estimates  for  the  Japanese  Rokkasho  plant  tripled
from  the  original  estimates?  What  economic  lessons  can  we  learn  from  their  ex-
perience?

A1. In  the  late  1980s,  when  the  construction  plan  for  the  Rokkasho  reprocessing
plant  was  approved,  the  estimated  construction  cost  was  about  $7  billion  and  esti-
mated  operating  date  was  December  1997.  Because  the  design  was  based  on  the
French UP3 plant, which was built at a cost of about $5 billion, this initial estimate
seemed  reasonable.  It  now  appears  that  the  plant  will  not  begin  commercial  oper-
ation  before  2007,  and  that  the  total  construction  cost  will  be  over  $21  billion.  A
full  explanation  for  the  tripling  in  cost  would  require  a  detailed  investigation.  The
plant  operator,  Japan  Nuclear  Fuels,  Ltd.  (JNFL),  has  cited  construction  delays  re-
sulting  from  a  series  of  design  changes  to  comply  with  increased  seismic  and  other
safety requirements. Others have suggested poor project management by JNFL and
a lack of competition among plant contractors and vendors as major reasons for the
dramatic cost escalation.

One  lesson  that  could  be  learned  from  the  Japanese  experience  is  that  a  lack  of
domestic experience with the construction and operation of commercial reprocessing
plants can lead to substantial cost overruns. The only commercial reprocessing facil-
ity  to  operate  in  the  United  States,  at  West  Valley,  New  York,  closed  in  1972  after
a few years of troubled operation. (The site is still the location of an ongoing, multi-
billion dollar, government-funded radioactive waste cleanup project.) The lack of do-
mestic  experience,  combined  with  a  relative  lack  of  competition  among  the  few  for-
eign firms with the necessary experience, are bound to drive up costs for a new U.S.
reprocessing facility substantially above initial estimates.
Q2. You  say  that  increasing  natural  gas  prices  and  that  costs  of  carbon  dioxide
emission  reductions  will  make  nuclear  more  competitive,  but  that  it  will  still
have  to  compete  with  wind,  biomass  and  coal-fired  plants  with  sequestration.
Biomass  and  sequestration  in  particular  are  not  mature  technologies  with
known  costs  and  will  require  government  research  subsidies  to  become  so.  In
terms of incremental cost per kilowatt-hour, how might those subsidies compare
to the subsidies we are talking about for reprocessing?

A2. Government funding for research and development for new technologies cannot
be  directly  compared  to  subsidies  for  the  operation  of  existing  types  of  facilities.
Government  funding  to  develop  new  technologies  is  required  when  the  financial
risks  are  too  great  and  the  time  scales  too  long  to  allow  private  firms  to  recover
their  investments  in  research  and  development  in  a  timely  manner.  The  develop-
ment of light-water nuclear reactor technology is one example from the past; the de-
velopment of advanced technologies for biomass, solar photovoltaics, and carbon se-
questration are current examples. If basic research yields a new, economically com-
petitive  method  of  energy  production,  private  firms  can  adopt  and  deploy  the  tech-
nology  with  no  ongoing  subsidy.  If  the  technology  is  successful,  the  initial  federal
investment  in  research  and  development  can  be  a  very  small  compared  to  the  ulti-
mate benefits to the U.S. economy.

The  management  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  is  fundamentally  different.  Utilities  cur-
rently  are  expected  to  pay  the  full  cost  of  the  geological  disposal  of  spent  fuel  in
the Yucca Mountain repository. Reprocessing using current technologies will double
or  triple  total  spent-fuel  management  costs,  while  having  no  waste-disposal  advan-
tages and increasing risks of nuclear theft and proliferation. New approaches to re-
processing,  which  promise  to  decrease  requirements  for  geological  repository  space,
are certain to be even more expensive and to be less proliferation-resistant as direct
geological  disposal.  Even  if  demand  for  nuclear  power  increases  rapidly,  reprocess-
ing would require an ongoing subsidy for the next 50 to 100 years.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Marvin S. Fertel, Senior Vice President and Chief Nuclear Officer, The

Nuclear Energy Institute

Question submitted by Chairman Judy Biggert
Q1. In  your  testimony,  you  state  more  than  once  that  the  consumers  of  nuclear  en-
ergy should not bear the additional costs of reprocessing. If we make a transition
to reprocessing, how should the costs be covered?

A1. Electricity consumers should only be charged for the reasonable costs of services
that  benefit  them  directly  as  part  of  the  cost  of  electricity.  The  Nuclear  Waste  Fee
($0.001  per  kWhr)  is  such  a  cost  appropriately  charged  to  electricity  consumers.
There is no evidence that the costs of used nuclear fuel disposal by the Federal Gov-
ernment  under  the  Nuclear  Waste  Policy  Act  should  lead  to  an  increase  in  the  Fee.
If  reprocessing  is  carried  out  to  serve  a  national  objective,  but  would  raise  the  cost
to  electricity  consumers  beyond  what  consumers  would  pay  without  reprocessing,
then  the  costs  should  fairly  be  borne  by  the  Federal  Government  on  behalf  of  the
Nation.

There  are  three  reasons  that  the  Nation  might  re-engage  in  reprocessing:  fuel
supply,  waste  disposal,  and  non-proliferation.  To  the  extent  that  the  cost  of  reproc-
essing raises the cost of either nuclear fuel supply or used fuel disposal beyond the
cost without reprocessing, the additional cost should rightfully be borne by the Fed-
eral  Government,  because  the  only  reason  to  carry  out  reprocessing  would  be  for
some  broader,  national  benefit.  Non-proliferation  is  clearly  a  broader,  national  ben-
efit and any costs of reprocessing associated with non-proliferation should rightfully
be borne by the Federal Government.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(65)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 17:06 Jan 20, 2006 Jkt 022295 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\071205\22295 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

